Hehe. Looks like SBCL has the edge in numerics [on the shootout](http://shootout.alioth.debian.org/gp4/benchmark.php?test=all&amp;lang=ghc&amp;lang2=sbcl) but otherwise its a bit of a wash ('cept the memory overhead of SBCL programs...).  Hmm, we really should submit some ByteString-based entries.
Redneck Philosophy: 1.  If it moves, shoot it. 2.  If it's sudsy, drink it. 3.  If it's related, fuck it.
I should add that the Pringle list was made in 1984, and was specifically limited to "modern" (post-WWII) science fiction, so if your favorite H.G. Wells or Iain Banks novel is missing, that's why. 
&gt; I disagree with her definition of "culturally and politically black", and I think most blacks would as well. I can see where you're coming from there. It seems from looking at some of the interviews and reviews of her book online, she's a fairly controversial figure, and possibly embraced by the right-wing/conservative establishment that wants to bury racial issues or any discussion of social justice. Anyway, I appreciate the discussion. I'm not sure where I stand but the distinctiveness of her point of view made me curious.
For having so many people that love xkcd and having such an interesting comment thread for todays cartoon, I actually want an up arrow for reddit as a whole.
Err . . . no. Buying allows for use, which includes both legal and *illegal* use.  Licensing allows for (or, more accurately, limits) legal use.  The collection of privately owned and licensed objects is a subset of the collection of privately owned objects.  To say that licensing is equivalent to ownership in this debate is akin to saying that coasters with holograms on them are equivalent to doilies of all designs and colors when trying to prove that doilies are more common that coasters.
I posted an earlier story about this story posing the question [Sextuplets born to Jehovah's Witnesses; May need transfusions, should the government step in?](http://reddit.com/info/xzso/comments)
To anyone with an activist, poster-gluing bent: Tired of this sort of officially sanctioned panic? Propagandize the true nature of [Security Theater](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Security_theater) to the unwashed masses.
&gt; There's ABSOLUTELY NO WTF whatsoever with that code. You mean, besides really not doing anything useful?
asshat
ya its much better to be a coward.  Post from behind your computer, don't say anything too bold or anti-establishment best to just comsume and reproduce.
More info here: http://extreme-geek.blogspot.com/2006/11/fire-starter-flashlight.html
Uh... Sure. Listen, we stopped arguing this 11 days ago. We can repeat the same things over and over, but I know I'm right, because my logic holds up, and yours doesn't. You've got problems if 1)You believe the bullcrap you're spilling out, and 2)You're still arguing with me about this a week later. On the internet. Where NOTHING MATTERS. Seriously, dude. Please, leave me in piece.
Post surgery she still weighs almost 400 pounds, i'd say she still needs to figure out how to lose weight.
I thought this was so great first time it was on reddit, I'm upvoting again.
&gt; Thanks for the suggestion.  &gt;   &gt; I choose my titles carefully. Sometimes I use the original  article's title. Sometimes I write my own. Sometimes I use an excerpt. I found this excerpt to be so striking I had to post it. Sorry if it breaks the visual flow, or whatever.  &gt;  &gt; If enough people hate the title, the story will sink.  &gt;  &gt; If enough people like the title and the content behind it, the story will rise.  &gt;  &gt; [Thems the breaks.](http://reddit.com/info/125u8/comments/c128d5) 
I don't see how that is at all relevant to the experiment.
The title is misleading, it should say "shut down IN Boston".  For some reason I was thinking some LED board drained all the city's power and was really disappointed to see what awaited me after clicking.  I guess I should have realized that if Boston went totally black, I'd probably hear about it on the front page.
I just checked mine, when you click view at original size, it is bit for bit the same file.
&gt; Despite the slightly racist undertones I totally missed them.  Can you elaborate?
Got it. Nelson Mandela, Ghandi, Boston Tea Party, all felons.
When my wife veils in Moslem countries, it is because she is sick of being spit on and her ass grabbed. So maybe when you see a woman in a scarf, maybe it means she doesn't want to be molested. (She is not fond of being molested in non-Muslim countries either, but it is much less common.)
It isn't hard to notice that some parts of the world reliably generate stories like this one, and remain black holes for all forms of foreign aid, without ever showing a blip of improvement. I'm going to speak the unspeakable (in liberal circles, anyway.) Some cultures are broken far beyond their capacity for self-repair. The smart choices, for those on the outside, are: 1) Attempt to inject civilization at gunpoint, a la British Empire at its heyday. Two excellent case studies are the forceful suppression of Sutee and Thuggee in India. 2) Leave it the hell alone. Enforce containment if you have to - walls, dogs, machine guns. Of course, all of this this has been [said before.](http://www.theothersideofkim.com/index.php/essays/36/)
Dude, come off the ledge. I was there. It was horrible. Tanks on Flagler, undercovers, stun shields, media blackout, the whole nine. But it wasn't no 10,000 cops.
That's not a coma.  That's paralysis.  In a coma, you can't blink your eyes back.
Weird... I would have imagined they'd compile to the same thing, but they don't. const char* indeed involves an extra variable (pointer) and a relocation. Noted.
You just proved my point. "Leprechauns, fairies, the Loch Ness monster" -- those aren't religious denominations. Why don't you ridicule other non-Christian denominations? Because you can't. You can just mod me down. Fascinating. People are waking up.
It looks like a slipper.  But with a nuke engine that is pretty sweet.  Until you get cancer or grow the third arm sitting that close to all that radiation. Actually its probablyl a valid idea when cars used to run on hemp oil and ethanol people woudl pread propaganda that petroleum engines would explode.  I say if we go nuclear our action movies will be that much cooler.
http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/controversial  A thing can be controversial and true. Or do you mean that Tuvalu isn't a teeny tiny island.
I disagree, fixing the noise problem should be relatively cheap and simple.  If everyone used a bit of common sense there wouldn't even be a problem.
Unfortunately, that may never happen.
[I quoted you over here](http://reddit.com/info/128pc/comments)
This is gonna be a huge blow to the easy-bake oven industry.  It will take about 8 times as many compact fluorescents to produce the same heat as one incandescent.
I think it is fair to say that the key problem with concurrent programming is managing state. And "prominent" libraries might not have big thread-safety issues but that's because they are debugged on the way to becoming prominent. I would not feel at all comfortable picking up a random module that someone on my team created for use in a threaded situation. I'd need to do an audit. The posters point is that the Haskell compiler can greatly simplify those audits for you.
and food.
modded up for absurdity.
Why do I bother? http://reddit.com/info/11fpz/comments
&gt;I haven't seen the textbook. I don't know if it contains the required subject matter.  I quoted the premamble by the authors of the book, as it appears in the book.  It clearly states that science is secondary to the purpose of the book--intentionally so. &gt;The viewpoint of the people who prepared the book is irrelevant to the content of the book. Agreed.  However the preamble describes the writing of the book and the presentation of information in the book, not the viewpoint of the writers.   &gt;You are making the same mistake the college says it is not making -- determining what views of reality are true/false. That is not the function of a college. A colleges function is to teach students. The college isn't doing this at all; what they are actually determining is what is acceptable vs. unacceptable preparation for college-level science.  A student lacking knowledge of the fundamentals of science would not be prepared for college-level science classes.  Period. &gt;A colleges function is to teach students. Yes, this is true, however the function of a university is to teach knowledge above and beyond the bare basics, the understanding of which is presumed prior to matriculation--hence the prerequisites.  I doubt someone who couldn't add or subtract would be ready for a college-level math class; likewise someone unfamiliar with the scientific method or evolution would not be ready for a college-level biology class. &gt;What knowledge or misinformation a student may hold outside the teaching requirements of the college is irrelevant. Agreed, however there are only two ways in which the student can demonstrate that they have met the requirements for admission.  Either they take a science course using an accredited textbook that is acceptable to the university to which they are seeking admission, or they take a standardized test of the subject matter.  The university is under no obligation to assume that the student is prepared when they have not yet taken the appropriate classes.  In this case the University goes one step further, because university officials have already vetted the book and determined that it "fails to meet the University’s standards for effectively teaching the required subject matter."  &gt;(You presume that the students do not receive appropriate training in the required subject matter. Why do you presume that?) Students who are not schooled in evolution lack appropriate training in science to matriculate to a university.  I say this as someone who has actively studied the science in question and as someone holding a degree in microbiology from a university.  A theological education may be fine for a seminary, but a student who has been intentionally miseducated to deny the scientific method and to accept faith-based falshood is woefully unprepared to study a hard science.  This is my own, informed, opinion and has no bearing on this case.  It does appear that this policy of rejecting faith-based fiction in lieu of science for purposes of admission to the university demonstrates that UC officials agree with me.  However, I think that all serious scientists agree with me as well. &gt;If the textbook lacks the information necessary to prepare the students for college level courses, the college should plainly state that as the reason for rejecting the textbook. Since they don't, it appears that the college (like yourself) are judging the textbook on information which is irrelevant to the college preparation. Again, the book clearly states that it is not a science book; it's authors say in the preamble that they have actively attempted to put theology first and science second.  They went a step further and said that when the two were in conflict, they have sided with theology.  This is the equivalent of a History of Europe textbook stating in the preamble: "The people who have prepared this book have tried consistently to put the Lord of the Rings first and History second. To the best of the author’s knowledge, the conclusions drawn from observable historical record that are presented in this book agree with the Lord of the Rings. If a mistake has been made (which is probable since this book was prepared by non-Numenorians) and at any point Tolkien's word is not put first, the author apologizes"  Obviously, such a textbook would be entirely unacceptable, as it is based on a work of fiction first and actual History second.  Similarly, when conflicts between fiction and actual History have arisen, the authors have arbitrated in favor of fiction.  Ought the university to accept such a class as fulfilling their History requirement for admission?  I think not.
sadly, you're probably correct.  they did it to allende
tokyo police club rocks!
I understood you, and I understand you. I just disagree with you. "Do we have free will?" isn't an ill-formed question, and it's not undecidable. It's just undecidable *by logic*. You claim familiariarity with Goedel's theroem:  Any formal system complete enough to model number theory can be used to create a statement that is true, but impossible to prove using that system. The world is more complex than number theory, since number theory is part of the world.  Thus, logic, a formal system, cannot produce all true statements about the world. So your logical approach has holes, truths it can't reach.   You yourself recognize the existence of free will in your self and others as one of these holes. And it's a dangerous hole.  Faith in the reality of other people is the basis of empathy. If you don't really believe that other people are real, your only basis for moral behavior is submission to external authority.  And if the prevalent authority structures become corrupt, you're in the deep shit. "Do we have free will?" is one of the most important questions the world asks us.  And it's a question that doesn't *stay answered*.  Every intentional act answers "yes".  Every automatic act answers "no". Eternal vigilance is the price of liberty.
&gt; So if it's the case that there's a vibrant libertarian party that has always been ready to oust Bush, how is it that you let media figures use your name to define the national perception of your politics. I know for example the Hosner endorsement was the first and last word I heard from the LP's short of Lew Rockwell and this conversation. Two points: 1. Nobody "lets" them.  If you're seeing a dismal representation of characters pretending to be Libertarians in the mainstream press, you might want to look to the influence of the dominating right- and left-wing parties in this country as the culprits, not the Libertarian Party being so badly misrepresented. 2. I've heard as many complaints about the LP being left-wing extremists as I have about the LP being right-wing extremists.  The problem isn't that the LP hangs out in one wing or the other, but that people dedicated to either the right or left wing of politics see everything that disagrees with some of the core principles of that wing of politics as inhabiting the other end of the spectrum.  Consider whether you, and the people in your little circle, might have succumbed to that mistake of reasoning. &gt; Now while the Democratic Party has lots of problems, within the last 4 years there's been a net revolution to take it back. Yeah, I've noticed, what with the very imperialistic political impulses of the Democratic Party's last two Presidential nominees.  You're parroting marketing materials, not speaking of proven facts. &gt; What you guys need to do is defend yourselves. I can't speak for everyone, but I've certainly been telling *you* at great length how wrong *you* are. &gt; Now while whatever few people attend your meetings where ever they are, (you still haven't given any specifics) Currently, Northern Colorado.  Previously, Tampa Florida.  Before that, Southern California. &gt; You can't let people call themselves libertarian when they are opposed to most of what you seem to think are the core ideas of your party. I can't stop them.  All I can do is inform you that you're way out in left field.  I've done that.  How's it working for you? &gt; Man I have been waiting for 6 years to hear the outcry from libertarians. Where have you been listening -- in left-wing political blogs?  In right-wing press releases? &gt; That I had to get in to a discussion on a reddit thread to hear it is a huge statement to how co-opted your party has become. No . . . it's a statement about how ignored the LP is in the mainstream press. &gt; Further where are the State house, State Senate, and local town campaigns? In my own town, three Libertarian candidates ran for local public office in November.  These candidates constituted about half the county party's Board of Directors, which adds up to a far greater percentage of people actually standing up for what they believe in and throwing their hats in the rings amongst those active in the party than you get from either Republicans or Democrats.  We left the House of Representatives race alone because there was someone outside the LP with a better chance of winning running against Musgrave that could easly have worn the LP colors (so to speak), based on the campaign platform. The problem isn't that Libertarians aren't trying -- it's that others are: 1. buying crap like you're spewing 2. buying the "don't want to waste my vote" line If not for a family medical emergency that caused me to move from California to Florida in 2003, I would probably have run for national House of Representatives in 2004 myself.  I'm considering running for local office this fall, after working on a campaign for someone else in the local party this spring. That's where you can find the State and local campaigns. &gt; And if I, check my reddit profile, can get the impression that libertarians are nothing but a republican proxy group, what does the average person that doesn't get into things at the level of detail that I do think? They buy what you're shoveling, when you're the only person speaking in a given venue.  Maybe if you stopped pushing the impression that the LP is just a right-wing conspiracy you'd stop being part of the problem. &gt; In fact if your organization has any value at all it should be actively policing Instapundit to discredit him, or force him to renounce his self-description. I, for one, have other projects on my plate -- such as putting together a commercial liberty-oriented news analysis and commentary website, helping put together local advocacy campaigns, managing the migration of the county party organization's website from one (bad) webhost to another (good) webhost, and helping with local campaigns.  Perhaps I should give up either sleep or working for a living -- or the girlfriend -- just so I can do the exact, precise task you've assigned.
Those who don't learn from history are doomed to repeat it, doomed I say.
I don't know about you guys but I can't work under fluorescent lights. They hurt my eyes.
Try the business section. I can't image Dell forcing businesses to use Vista.
Exactly what single principle do you perceive libertarians to use as the basis for a new society?
It sounds like Courtney doesn't make much money off of her music.  Of course, she still makes a TON of money off of Kurt's music.
I read a book about this once:  http://www.amazon.com/Diving-Bell-Butterfly-Vintage-International/dp/0375701214 Actually written by some guy who had it, I think.
Home premium is pretty nice though, all things considered. A good bit better then the sodomized cousin XP home was compared to XP pro.
Why don't you just increase the minimum wage to $10,000/hr?
hifuckinglarious also 100% true  Bush is a tard i mean cmon even if he was making good policy he still stammers like porky pig! badeep badeep badeep s-s-send more t-t-troops.
No, I am saying you shouldn't dismiss what this guy has to say because he has been arrested as a protester in the past. If you disagree with what he says, bring up one of his points and counter it, and leave out the ad hominem attack.
Read it again but instead of Multivac or AC, substitute Google everywhere it occurs in the story. Makes you think, doesn't it?
I'm gonna go with ohno on this one and say, asshat.
&gt;&gt; libertarians aren't trying to come up with some alternative system to deal with human action. &gt; Yes they are. They've developed a whole economic model based on an invented concept of "private property" and an ethical model of "negative rights" which forms the basis of their entire system of thought. No they aren't.  The economic model to which you refer is a natural state of free exchange, unmolested by government.  One might make a case for the "capital" in "capitalism" being an invention, but it's really just a naturally arising means of abstracting the system of free exchange in a free market, necessary to the macroeconomic scalability of the free market.  Thus, we have free market capitalism.  There's no invention in that -- just description.
You're misreading the spec.  It's saying that the *host* portion of a URL can either be a FQDN *or* an IP address in dotted quad notation.  It is *not* saying that FQDNs and IP addresses are the same thing or that they match each other, but merely that you can use either in the *host* portion of URLs. 
it's hard not to love a ranter when they can back up all their grievances will solid, well-researched facts and citation.  oh, and hilariously written too.
But they do interpret Catholic doctrine literally, which is unfortunate, because it has obviously been slowly built up over the years as a collection of allegories.
Some among libertarians believe that government isn't necessary.  Others believe that a minimal, very limited form of government is necessary to prevent an oppressive, self-maximizing government from filling a power vacuum.  In the latter case, your statement about eliminating all government is inapplicable.  In the former, there are a lot of very logical arguments to refute you -- but I won't present them right now, since I'm the latter (minarchist) sort of libertarian, not the former (anarchist) sort.
Funny. Considering how much he and Bush seem to hate each other, they really share similar interests.
So, basically... `$index = $selected` Edit: My bad. An input of 5 wouldn't produce the required value of 0.
I don't know how serious you're being, but economies were nowhere near as dependent on whale oil as our modern economies are on oil.  Petroleum oil is used not only for transportation and heating, but also for many industrial processes and the production of plastics used in nearly everything.  If you think that the advent of peak oil will be a fizzling story because we'll easily move on to the next thing (whatever that is) then I think you're mistaken.  Peak oil will have a huge impact because we haven't been preparing - we should have been readying alternatives 20 or 30 years ago in order to avoid trouble.  Now there's lots of talk about alternatives, but it's too late to avoid economic disaster.
Show me one single example of someone jailed for a hate crime that was similar to this.
Most "PHB"s don't even know what bug-tracking software is. I've never used Fogbugz, but if it saves just a few developer hours per installation, then it pays for itself, and is worth it. If it manages to solve even one customer problem per installation, then it is worth it. "PHB"s and even some developers are aware of such things as "ROI". "making the Right Thing happen" I suppose the right thing involves installing bugzilla, which is a monstrous piece of garbage if there ever was one.
Well Google obviously had a tough time after launching a free search engine.
I'm totally for blowing up advertisements when it comes down to it.  This campaign should extend it's reach into the billboard area.
&gt; the male seeks above all else to ejaculate quickly, and once he has done it with one female, he is eager to move on to new partners. I never knew I had so much in common with a rat!
WTF is a *magnetic light*?
[a link to the makers of the signs?](http://www.interferenceinc.com/) (currently no content, trying to find a cache that works) as found via [this blog comment](http://toddvanderlin.com/blog/2007/01/16/adult-swim-ad/)
Piano work circa 1996
My thought exactly! I guess everyone will have a favourite that isn't on here, but come on - Iain M. Banks has written some of the best and most imaginative sci-fi of the past 20 years.
"misinformed" would imply that they're wrong - but there are links throughout (both this and fuckthesouth.com - though a few of those are broken) that lead you straight to the sources. southernmyths is interesting, but it doesn't actually seem to argue against what it says its arguing about.
Fukuyama *is* a neocon. He's trying to save his career by distancing himself from... himself. Ignore him.
Yes, let's gear up the "War on Peace Activists." Because we keep coming up empty on this War on Terror. Pop quiz: How many actual terrorists do these new security measures actually catch?
Oh no, [alert the authorities](http://images.google.com/images?q=lite%20brite)! What a stupid response by the Boston police and a waste of taxpayers money. Way to go.
What a buffoon.
If I absolutely had to pick a favourite of those two, it would be the second one. But it would be hard, as those two are firm favourites of mine. Shame Ilium and Olympos were so disappointing...
I just wanted to let you know that if your digital gadget does not have a place to hold charms, you can put them in a cute bag like the ones found at http//www.rueinc.com ... they have a special D-ring designed specially for charms!
um.  history 'experts'.  a more apt analogy than hitler would be allende.  both leftist.  both south american.   godwin's law holds. btw - just because the u$a has a nominal democracy doesn't mean that democracy is necessarily the best system. the venezuelan people _democratically_ elected chavez.  the representatives voted to allow his rule by mandate.   just b/c you're cold war era civics classes have told you anything (gasp) socialist is evil, doesn't make it so. after all, the u$ has many 'socialist' programs - social security, medicaid, minimum wage, workers' comp laws, etc. oh, and it was FDR's nasty commie style programs that pulled the u$ out of the depression.
was useful for me in choosing camcorder format
was useful for me in choosing camcorder format
Also, try to fly domestically without ID. Papers, please.
Agreed.  Necrotizing fasciitis is usually localized to the site of infection, since it grows subcutaneously.  I would think perhaps if the bacteria were introduced into the blood stream and then perhaps carried to and deposited in the limbs, such a prognosis may be possible (I'm not an MD).  Maybe a dirty needle stick or improperly sanitized IV/nurse who didn't change gloves between patients, etc. could have introduced the organism into the blood stream.   She definitely has a strong case with the right MD's and microbiologists testifying.
Bunkie joined the numerous cities throughout the United States with a “dark” Wal-Mart that has been closed when the company moved to a larger space. Wal-Mart critic and activist Al Norman pegs the number of dark stores at around 380
The odd mechanisms and assembly remind me of a different kind of [Cube](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0123755/).
The "we" in the post I am responding to maybe? Yeah. Yeah, that one.
the New York Times has become no better than a grocery tabloid for the anti american crowd. What a joke.
When I first read this story, about 25 years ago, I was quite moved by it. It now seems quainter, as we have something like Microvac (only smaller!), but it hasn't lost its power for me.
This must be the "Al Franken" decade.
It is a great site!
No. I mean this: in Python, you can do `some_var = some_obj.methodname`, and `some_var` will contain a reference to the method. In Ruby `some_var` will contain the _return value_ of the method, because referring to it by name calls it. You have to do a little bit more work to actually get the method itself.
Yes I know the headline is over the top. I was bored and stuck debuging someone else javascript.
so kool
wow, sexy girls! 
just silly. reddit has become the last refuge for the wackosof  the world to be heard. I dont believe a word of it.
Peewinkle, I think you miss the point that John was trying to make about video email companies like Vidagram, Sightspeed and Springdoo and even the newly acclaimed Eyejot.  The silly artist would use video email simply to spam, but the smart artist will take the technology of a Vidagram or Eyejot and hold an exclusive record release party.  If you knew, Richie Sambora, Diddy, Jimmy Iovine, Lyor Cohen or some other major music executive, even as an indie, video email used correctly allows you to personalize something for them (a song, email, thank you card etc.) Everybody in the music industry either knows somebody or knows the somebody to get at who they are trying to get the attention of. Video email helps you customize, tighten and help you expand your network base. Bottomline you have to network in the music industry. For example, an artist or band will shoot and upload some exclusives to his or her fan base.  A band could do a song on the video email live, email it to their fan base, maybe a song they did not feel was right for the album.  Artists can take more chances with video email, they are not restricted.  A lot of times an artist or band go through label problems, wouldn't you prefer a direct email from the artist to let you know about what's going on, instead of rumors from magazines or other things. The smart artist or band will understand the power of video email companies like Eyejot, Springdoo, Sightspeed or Vidagram and use video email to make their fan base feel closer and united with them. Indies rule!
one word, awesome adult dating site.
Actually that was my first response:).Impressive none the less.
just spam
Great site, sexy singles, thanks for the submit!
Except not at all. He took it off a bridge. A few weeks ago.
*"...and a lot of people – myself included – have been perfectly happy with XP for some time now."* What was wrong with W2K? I only use W2K and Outlook at my office to catch mail because of Microsoft's proprietary Exchange Server (...that goes down a lot and is too slow). Everything else I do is done with [Ubuntu](http://ubuntu.com/) both at home and office and over VPN. (Yeah, for those of you in the know about Linux, I did attempt Evolution (Linux app) with MS Exchange, but I had funky calendar problems, it would crash on Tasks, the addressbook lookup was annoying, and it would absolutely not work over VPN when I tried to reach my Evolution on my desktop at the office rather than use Evolution from home. I have to scratch my head and ask why offices don't just do what the ISPs do -- switch to NNTP/POP3/SMTP + LDAP, hosted on Linux, and let people use Thunderbird w/ Lightning plugin to handle everything else.) 
I chuckle how all stories read along the lines of "ad campaign backfires". That's pretty rich. It's the damn media and lame law enforcement policy that backfired if anything. These LED signs have been up for weeks without inducing widespread panic. It was probably Mayor McMuffin who saw one and got homeland security dollar-signs in his eyes as he fumbled for his cell phone. Or maybe just an evangelical who was offended by ignignot's middle finger and said "quick, print some colored ribbon stickers and call the mayor". As for ATHF, hell now everybody wants to see it.
Why can't we all be sensitive to their culture? If rape is the way they do things over there who are we to impose our Western values on them? Just kidding. It is time for some Western style mass-castrations over there.
See, I've heard this, and I understand that this is the case...but I've never understood it. If an average person's understanding, or lack thereof, of the law plays no part in the lagality, then clearly everyone should understand every law that is applicable to them.  For example, the mentally retarded aren't held to the same standards as the mentally stable. So, knowing this, why are lawyers and judges required to go to law school to learn the law?  If ignorance is no excuse, then any average joe should be able to understand and argue law. Now, if the judiciary system truly wants me to know and understand every law, they can foot the bill for my law degree.  Until then, I'm going to use my common sense to try not to trod on the rights of those around me.
Authors sell publication rights to their books. So for a given, say...short story? You have first international rights, first electronic rights, reprint rights for both. The author retains the copyright.
we lived about 20 miles from new orleans in slidell we lived in a apartment and we lost everything we have two children 6 and 8 months we really need help we are staying in a small trailer and its hard thank you and god bless!
Buffalo, New York
Or maybe Chavez more than other latin american leaders have a larger impact on your average american.  Or are we "marketed" Blair, Putin, Jintao, Castro and Calderón as well?
I'll make my points pithy -no one is specifically listening to anyone; that is, this so called "wire tapping" is a computer algorythm that screens calls for key words (like bomb, nuclear... etc.) -only calls originating from outside the United States, and from specific regions are screened -if a key word (more like sets of key phrases) is caught it begins to trace the call -this is NOT NEW... this has been going on for 30+ years -other forms of tapping, in fact all other forms without a specific warrent, require you to turn off the machine when an american voice is online, but this uses computers with key phrase originating outside the US -obviously the algorythm is much more complex than this, and honestly more involved than I care to comprehend -those out spoken against it are misrepresenting it to push a political agenda
Cultures can be destroyed and replaced by a more catchy foreign culture. They call it "cultural imperialism" for a reason. The British empire used to be a master at this, and American consumer capitalism is also fairly capable - it used to be more so before multiculturalism.
And if you never see a Muslim woman wear an itsy-bitsy, teeny-weeny yellow polka dot bikini, it doesn't mean she's not wearing or cannot wear one.
I think that people are jumping up at what you say because they want you to appreciate Asimov. They want to *help* you.  I recommend I, Robot by the way. Don't be fooled by the film, which was a terrible abuse of the title and character names.  His work is all noticeably dated, but the way in which it dates gives it great charm, and adds to the insight to be gained by reading it now. The stories retain their surprises, and entertaining puzzles. It's like fine old wine.
I've rarely read anything so condescending. I don't think I like her.
It's a device that emits light and is held in place by magnets.
Ditto. The fanboys seem especially bitter these days.
My favorite there is the "Mitch"
It says that network hosts have FQDN and they have IP addresses. You can use either to map to that particular host. If it meant what you say, it would read: &gt;Host: The fully qualified domain name of a network host, or **an** IP address as a set of four decimal digit groups separated by ".".
here is a much better list.  updated a couple of times a year.  dune IS #1  has 2 Bank's novels  [Top Science Fiction](http://home.austarnet.com.au/petersykes/topscifi/index.html)
Ah, good for you!  You've started to unpack the definition of the term "complex", and thus probably are actually quite smart, instead of faking it.  Let me give you a little bit more about this to chew over. Math and computer science define the complexity of a piece of information as its compressiblity. In other words, "how small can you make the zip file?". The smaller that file can be, the less complex the data is.  So, to answer your question specifically, a blueprint of a hard drive can store a description of a blank hard drive. But not a description of a hard drive full of data. (Think about it like this: can you take that blueprint, and, from it alone, figure out what's on that hard drive?). Thus, the hard drive becomes more complex (less compressible) as it stores data. 
Haha horrible brand association.  The 33 MS logo with 7 suites in front.  They have no idea to rock a product.  When you go to rock concerts do they bring out the suits to help the show? Focus on the people using the product.  Have a developer, a designer and a business person and how they plan to use it or something at least that makes a personal connection to the product.  Sad.
Fantastic wording.
Hmm .. .maybe I'll have to reread. I thought Hyperion was one of the best SF novels I've read, and that the Endymion books were very entertaining - but I thought Fall was just average at best.
My day job annoys me. They use the proprietary MS Exchange Server and Active Directory LDAP. It goes down frequently, has no redundancy and therefore I hear about occasional maintenance outages, and it is slow occasionally when I type keystrokes into fields. However, there's a faction of us in the company who bootup on Linux at the office, have all our systems at home on Linux, and we support Linux servers and programming projects in the office. However, to catch mail, we have to switch over to a W2K box through a Terminal Service connection, and bring up MS Outlook because it's really the only way that works the fastest, especially when we want to keep our mail in one place and VPN to it from home. The Evolution program in Linux just didn't quite cut it for us because the calendar had bugs, the tasks would lockup, the addressbook would often get things wrong when I typed addresses on messages, it was hard to download mail from the server and keep it on my local hard drive, and there was no way I could VPN and work with SSH's -X option from home and attach to this mailbox without getting Kerberos bugs that prevented me from sending/receiving email. So then I have to think, why do most major companies go with this screwy junk that has these issues, but ISPs do not? Why does a company want to paint itself into a corner with only one vendor they can go to for technical support on this lousy product? The strongest alternative is to go the route of the ISPs. Bring up a Linux cluster on RAID5, stick POP, SMTP, NNTP, LDAP, Apache, and SquirrelMail on it, along with spam filters, virus scanners, and syndicate this same arrangement via LDAP in multiple office locations across your company's geographical coverage. Then, just tell users to use Thunderbird with the Lightning Calendar plugin. All these ISPs can't be wrong. And they get to choose from a larger selection of vendors to provide tech support. Plus, because it's based on standards, if they choose to migrate from one vendor to another, it's not a very big deal. 
Exactly, they have a larger impact on your life.  But would they if they weren't marketed to you?  You won't hear about anyone they dont' want you to know about if all you do is passive consumption.  You have to seek out why it is that these guys are being marketed. Chavez is actually our guy, dont' fall for the marketing.  A venezuelan company recently bought in to 19 states voting machines (Sequoia) and essentially it is owned by a business club from VEnezuela including Chavez.  Why didn't the news tell you that?  You would have if you seeked it out. Chavez also controls the oil from Venezuela and is in OPEC. http://www.nytimes.com/2006/10/29/washington/29ballot.html?ex=1319774400&amp;en=e52b50315a24d3f8&amp;ei=5090 When's the last time America ran a coup de tat where the ejected leader got back into power?  One that was run that way ON PURPOSE to get internal Venezuelan support.  Yes coup de tats are evolving, see sept 11th 2001.  
It was just an acorn, peeps. 
or just turn on output buffering and redirect wherever you want.
How many?  5,000, 8,000?  Why not focus on the message instead of squabbling over inconsequential details?
"It's not your or others fault laws esp copyright ones often contradict common sense." It is definitely someones fault.
Compassinon and understanding should be the agenda of man.
depending upon the crime and certainty of guilt, i think that is a great way for convicts to repay their debt to society. all truly guilty murderers, rapists, and child-molesters should become live organ donors immediately. what good do they do locked away in a hole until they die? (or worse, unleashed upon civil society to prey again upon the unwary).
You're right. I definitely wanted to give it a solid go and free myself from having to stare at another Microsoft logo ever again. You should see my lengthy post on this **[here](http://www.ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=345216)**. And I also posted another, similar complaint, **[here](http://reddit.com/info/012918/comments)**. 
Read [**"In Defense of the 12-Gauge Bean Bag Round"**](https://www.policeone.com/police-products/less-lethal/articles/118328/)
What a troll!
If only we were all so lucky.
&gt;oh, and it was FDR's nasty commie style programs that pulled the u$ out of the depression. LOL that's a good one!  You had me going there for a while.
I've worked in the hospital setting for most of my adult life, and I have to say I have asked myself this question many times, along with the questions, "Why has every surgeon I've ever met been a jerk?"   
Africa doesn't need food? It's hard to have protected, consensual intercourse when you're dead from starvation.
No, I'm sorry. there is a model built around a concept of private property that is the basis for their ethics, and thus a model of society.  A mere description of "a natural state of free exchange" would require a reality upon which such a description is based, and no such reality exists.  It is an invention designed to describe a model of society that would be desirable.
I dunno, I feel pretty lucky considering that I have complete control of my functions.
I suggest you read some of the links in your wikipedia article. Your supply and demand article postulates a [competitive free market](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Perfect_competition). A competitive free market requires: *Perfect and complete information: All firms and consumers know the prices set by all firms (see perfect information and complete information).*  Now the *whole point* about these fees is that consumers *do not have* information about fees at the time of the transaction. A banking system that provided this information at the moment of the transaction (*Warning - you have no more money. You will go into overdraft! You will pay a fee of $30!*) would meet the standards of a competitive free market, so your little rant about supply and demand would be relevant. Again, the banking fees *depend* on the consumer being ill-informed, often deliberately, either through fine print, or through not rejecting underfunded transactions. The consumer could, of course, work to be well informed all the time, but this (technically un-necessary) effort in itself is a fee of sorts. So my argument is that we need regulations that would allow consumers to experience the true glory of the efficient, fully informed free market. Banks would be free to offer overdrafts for $30, and consumers would be free to tell the bank to go stuff itself.
holly asshat batman!
Urm, duh... When you downsize a picture, you *have* to sharpen it. Otherwise, it gets unsharp. Less sharp than the larger picture. It's inherent in the downsizing algorithm, and you have to compensate it. 
LOL, I think those pills expired, Sparky {:  Don't worry, happens to me now and again, too, heh.
no kidding. Let me refer to my original post: &gt; So 240 is more dangerous And yet I get voted way down. Damn downvoting bots..
I am assuming the logic went like:  1. Thingummy with LED &amp; circuitboards  2. Bombs have LED &amp; circuitboards  3. We know that baddies want to bomb us  4. Must be a bomb! Help! Shut down the city. What are you Americans becoming?
Artistic Photography in Victoria BC
Common sense advises against commenting this deep in this silly thread, but... "exp pi - pi" *is* the original algorithm.  e^pi is spelled "exp pi", not "let e = exp 1 in e ** pi".
&gt; It says that network hosts have FQDN and they have IP addresses. But it doesn't say that FQDN and IP addresses are equivalent.  It is saying that you can use either in the *host* part of URLs. &gt; You can use either to map to that particular host. But that doesn't mean that they refer to the same resources. If example.com and example.org both point to 10.0.0.1, then you can write these three URLs down: * http://example.com/  * http://example.org/  * http://10.0.0.1/ All of these are different URLs.  The fact that you may be talking to the same server is irrelevant.  And if a library function says that these are equivalent URLs, then it is **broken**. Edit: For a more apt example, reddit.com and programming.reddit.com both resolve to 72.5.28.218.  Now try these three URLs and tell me that they are the same: * http://reddit.com/  * http://programming.reddit.com/  * http://72.5.28.218/ 
&gt; Compassinon [*sic*] and understanding should be the agenda of man. No argument there. What set me off is her **demand** for such.  It's selfish (and rather immature, IMHO) to **demand** that people make an attempt to understand you.
From what I understand, Menino's and Patrick's statements regarding hoaxes were made before Turner released their press release stating that they were part of an ad campaign. I'm willing to bet there is a hoax involved here.  These have been up around town for weeks (not just here, but in several major US cities) without issue.  I'm convinced that someone called the police knowing full well that they were harmless, but intended to cause a panic for a laugh.  Something innocuous taht has been in public view for weeks is suddenly reported several times over the course of they day?  Yeah...hoax.
Starving to death Terri Schindler makes me *hate* our government and species in general!
Exactly. As the old Vulcan saying goes, "Only Nixon could go to China." This is a condemnation of neoconservatism as only a reformed neocon could deliver. &gt; One answer is that the nature of global politics in the first decade of the 21st century has changed in important ways. Heh heh, it tickles me pink that the guy who wrote *The End Of History* later wrote this sentence.
"Modern CFLs do not use any more electricity when first switched on than a traditional light bulb, and although the quality and operating life of an CFL is not affected by on-off switching, manufacturers do suggest that for lighting periods of 5 minutes or more, CFLs are strongly recommended." http://www.aberdeenshire.gov.uk/energy/home/electricity.asp
For over 30 years, the Superbowl has been held on a Sunday. In the United States, the Superbowl is the largest food consumption day next to Thanksgiving. In addition, a large quantity of alcohol is drunken. This often makes it difficult to go to work on Monday. For this reason, I propose that we move the Superbowl to a Saturday.
Agreed, the tone of the article tainted and confused the message.
The Vietnam war raged for nearly a decade before anyone even noticed, and raged for nearly another decade before the US finally, reluctantly limped out. I guess we should regard it as humanistic progress that Congress is leaning toward a serious push to end the Iraq war after only four and a half years.
A Republican president checked by a Democratic Congress would be severely constrained in his or her capacity to get up to trouble.
You and everyone like you who doesn't believe in the constitution and would rather have a monarchy or dictatorship should get the fuck out of our country. Why do YOU hate America?
&gt; it's not idempotent because it's not the same as just calling it once Sounds exactly like what we're talking about to me. The broken comparison function that resolves the hostname returns different results if you call it repeatedly (or at least it can do). A proper comparison function would return the same thing each time no matter how many times you call it.  Calling it more than once doesn't have any effect beyond calling it once &amp;mdash; unless you count the wasted cycles, in which case nothing a computer does could ever be idempotent. 
Pride fighters are in a difference league than UFC fighters.  UFC is the most popular MMA in US, but Pride is much bigger globally.  Pride fighters are icons in Japan, they endorse everything from sodas, cars, clothes, whatever.   After watching Pride, I cant even look at UFC.  Crocop will kick any UFC guys ass.  Look what happened to Lidell, considered best pound for pound UFC fighter, when he went to Pride. http://youtube.com/watch?v=VrAfwtpUZGc   UFC is a joke. 
"CanUniMex" is already being formed: spp.gov
Holy shit this is a huge story!! or interview or whatever!!!
Absolutely, mod this one up!  Too much asbestos?  I say not enough!
How to embed google maps in a wordpress post.
Yeah, seriously. Talk about a chick-magnet.
For once I'm glad an article doesn't include pictures...
... At least there are fewer Lisp and Joel Spolsky articles these days.
Watch the [youtube video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yCNTvvMonYo).
You may want to change "Japanese spaceship toilet" to "bidet."  They are common in non western countries, they cleanse you anus much better than toilet paper and as a result requiring one to use less toilet paper.  To bad westerners are to prudish and un-adventurous to try using one at least once to see its advantages.
I used to feel the same way.  The big tube fluorescents still give me headaches, but I've replaced all the incandescent bulbs in my apartment with the newer compact fluorescent bulbs and I have to say that I'm really very happy with them.
Get this. Here in the USA, my sister-in-law completed highschool and got a so-so score on her SATs. She became a single mom. Through grants and special deals, and no cash of hers to spend, she was able to take online courses for 5 years and complete her Bachelor's degree in Psychology with relative ease. She never once had to show up in class. She spent money only on books, her PC, and an Internet connection. She barely exerted any effort. Now she can go out and get a bank on that degree. All the colleges were accredited. Now why didn't I think of doing this for my Bachelor's Degree instead of wasting time like I did for 6 years in boring lectures, in-class workshops, and so on? Why did I live in the disgusting dorms? Well, they didn't have online courses then, for one thing. So, for some highschool graduates, this is a very viable option and I recommend it highly over the traditional campus college routine. (BTW, the only drawback she had was that because of the way the online training was built, she had to use Windows instead of, well, [Ubuntu](http://ubuntu.com/), so I got called out to her place a good bit to fix her hung up PC, loaded over with spyware and junk, while my wife, kids, and I used our home PCs with Ubuntu without hassle.) 
It says in the first sentence of the article that most of them were Falungong practitioners. I guess you'll want to talk to your congressperson about getting a constitutional amendment in the works, too if you're in the USA.
ullaaa zhurra como tas?? jojoj tngo la mamera  puichhh  pichhh  jauujaua
I think you meant: !!What a \**Troll*\*, w8less kills puppies!!! edit:  Forgot the \*
It harms everyone who is truthful to a priest, but then has the priest ever so slightly doubtful because of incidences like this. More generally, it harms everyone because, like any lie, it makes us all more distrustful of each other. Not that I'm arguing it was wrong; only that it had a cost that must be weighed against its benefit.
No. You don't need to cut metal and take down a bridge to have a similar economic impact. When I was in high school they had to shut down part of the same freeway because some idiot truck driver plowed into a 50-year-old bridge support. The bridge didn't fall, but it was most certainly a failed inspection and repairs cost a ton. Sure, I guess you could disguise it as a pair of shoes. But people would probably be more apt to notice something weird about a pair of shoes taped to a freeway overpass than what appears to be a marketing gimmick. At least, outside the smartypants metropolis of Boston, anyway.
Carry a gun.
All in a day's work for...**LOCAAAAAAAL GOVERNMENNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNT**
Man this is hilarious they test them and every thing right on tv.
Attempting to keep up with technology? MP3 players allow you to manage your favorite songs and take them with you where ever you go. If you're on the go all the time and you want to listen to your favorite tunes while commuting to work, trekking across campus, or working out, then buying the right MP3 player is essential.
&gt; Housing is certainly affordable You wouldn't happen to be a real estate agent or mortgage broker, would you?
This is an insult to snarky, 17-year-old girls everywhere.
The road most traveled by is traveled by for a reason.
One alternative that has been suggested to improve conditions in Darfur has been pressure from China.  This article seems to argue unlikely.  At least the African Union is taking a step - big for them - to say Sudan must do something to improve the situation.
A sad day indeed.
Yeah right, because there are so many evangelicals in BOSTON, in the state of MASSACHUSETTS, in the NORTHEAST.
Ugh.  What do you mean by "*those people*". ;)
Cruise, a devoted follower of the bizarre Church of Scientology, said: "I was much happier in previous existences when I wrote plays, composed music, conquered nations, discovered continents and developed cures for diseases"I only took my present form because Bingodulla, whom all Scientologists worship as the Supreme Thetan, selected me to spread the gospel of Scientology to the glib, uninformed masses.
&gt;And shouldn't all you little leftwing commies be screaming about evil corporate America using public land for private profit? No, because everyone on reddit thinks Aqua Teen Hunger Force is a riot. Wait til it gets lame, then they'll start in about the corporate stuff.
She makes this statement because she believes that she already does understand the "west".  I'm not so sure she does.
&gt; depending upon the crime and certainty of guilt The problem is the court system cannot ever be 100% certain of guilt.  The Innocence Project has exonerated almost 200 people already. Even when you have videotaped evidence, like in the Rodney King trial, the accused may still walk free.  Plus, someone who is convicted may have the sentence overturned on appeal. The legal system should never be in the position of imposing an irreversible sentence.  The Innocence Project shows how true that is for the death sentence, which fortunately was suspended in a national moratorium for many years and on a state level in many cases for years after that. Finally, even if you know someone is 100% guilty of a heinous crime, that still does not justify anyone else's attempt to torture the person.  You do not stoop to their level, not because of how wonderful the bad guy is, but because of how good of a person YOU are. 
Very.
26. No Roger Zelazny? No Steven Brust?  There are some solidly mediocre books on this list, and some greats missing. And like most such lists, it is biased towards more recent books.   
Upvoted.  Revealing photo.
&gt; the quantum origin of consciousness Care to elaborate?
&gt; And my respect for Boston has plummeted. This has nothing to do with Boston per se, but rather with the TERRISTS ZOMGWTFBBQ! CALL DHS! ARREST EVERYONE! TAP ALL THE PHONES! FINGERPRINT ALL THE TOURISTS! TORTURE ALL THE PRISONERS! attitude of US authorities these days. See also [ohell's comment](http://reddit.com/info/1277f/comments/c1295m) for another view.
It may be old, but no one heard it then, because no one wanted to. The momentum is turning against Bush and the neocons, so if it means repeating a few stories that got buried in the run up to the war, then let's do it.
When they found them, they mistook them for bombs on bridges all over the city, and shut down some major interstates going through the city (and I think also some public transport lines).  So yes, I meant "shut down Boston".
She needs to find a clue...
We get checks from the government, and we spend it on beer! Mexican beer!  That's the cheapest of all beers.
Very happy? I replaced most of the lights in my house with these bulbs and faced a revolt from the other family members. The delay in turning on, the delay in reaching full luminescence, and the flicker did not make anyone else in my house happy. I, however, now feel a lot better when I see a light left on. I am waiting for the new LED bulbs, which use even less energy without the negatives of fluorescents.   If California bans incandescents I will probably try to make a living smuggling them in, since I am sure there will be a lot of customers ready to buy.  Note: Typed under the glow of fluorescent lights.
This guy is a douche bag. He's doing a horrible job of presenting "the real Japan" by making things up and exaggerating everything. 
I compiled 4 different flavors of this function with optimizations: The article's questionable code produces: 00401000  push  ebp   00401001  mov   ebp,esp  00401003  sub   esp,8  00401006  mov   dword ptr [ebp-4],0  0040100D  mov   eax,dword ptr [ebp+8]  00401010  mov   dword ptr [ebp-8],eax  00401013  cmp   dword ptr [ebp-8],3  00401017  ja    00401045  00401019  mov   ecx,dword ptr [ebp-8]  0040101C  jmp   dword ptr [ecx*4+40104Eh]  00401023  mov   dword ptr [ebp-4],0  0040102A  jmp   00401045  0040102C  mov   dword ptr [ebp-4],1  00401033  jmp   00401045  00401035  mov   dword ptr [ebp-4],2  0040103C  jmp   00401045  0040103E  mov   dword ptr [ebp-4],3  00401045  mov   eax,dword ptr [ebp-4]  00401048  mov   esp,ebp  0040104A  pop   ebp   0040104B  ret   4   I wrote what I thought was the most natural code: if((unsigned)selected&lt;4)  \t\treturn selected;     else  \t\treturn 0;   which compiled to: 01000000  push  ebp   00401001  mov   ebp,esp  00401003  cmp   dword ptr [ebp+8],4  00401007  jae   0040100E  00401009  mov   eax,dword ptr [ebp+8]  0040100C  jmp   00401010  0040100E  xor   eax,eax  00401010  pop   ebp   00401011  ret   4     Then i tried endian675's 'crap'   return ((selected &lt; 0 || selected &gt; 3) ? 0 : selected);  which generated:   00401000  push  ebp   00401001  mov   ebp,esp  00401003  push  ecx   00401004  cmp   dword ptr [ebp+8],0  00401008  jl    00401018  0040100A  cmp   dword ptr [ebp+8],3  0040100E  jg    00401018  00401010  mov   eax,dword ptr [ebp+8]  00401013  mov   dword ptr [ebp-4],eax  00401016  jmp   0040101F  00401018  mov   dword ptr [ebp-4],0  0040101F  mov   eax,dword ptr [ebp-4]  00401022  mov   esp,ebp  00401024  pop   ebp   00401025  ret   4   and Finally, I tried petevalle's return (!(selected&gt;&gt;2))*selected;   which generated:   00401000  push  ebp   00401001  mov   ebp,esp  00401003  mov   eax,dword ptr [ebp+8]  00401006  sar   eax,2  00401009  neg   eax   0040100B  sbb   eax,eax  0040100D  inc   eax   0040100E  imul  eax,dword ptr [ebp+8]  00401012  pop   ebp   00401013  ret   4    It seems clear that there actually is a substantial tax on bad code, namely number of instructions and binary size increases (in this case by a factor of 4). [you can see the size by looking at the last 2 hex digits of the 'ret 4' instruction's address. (4B,11,25,13) You can also see that the most obvious 'KISS' version of the code is the smallest!  The overly clever code written by petevalle is still longer than the obvious case!  Endian's 'crap' hard to read code is even a bit larger.    --I apologize for the formatting, but I'm done fighting with reddit's formatter :(
There's several good moral or philosophical arguments for why you're wrong and persons convicted of crimes shouldn't be harvested for organs. But I'm more interested in a practical reason why you're wrong which hasn't been noted: it creates extremely dangerous incentives.
It probably will never happen.  Sorry, just the most likely scenario. Can I interest you in my line of female ROBOTS?
I'd rather starve to death than to remain locked in for decades. Thwt must be just unimaginable hell.
That's because you're gullible and actually believe all the mindless propaganda here on Reddit.
It's considered good form to know what you're talking about before accusing someone else of not knowing. 
I think the dude was on a trip as he wrote that.
It was a character from Aqua Teen Hunger Force, so apparently a bomb is involved after all.
This is hardly surprising, but it is interesting to see the numbers.
&gt; "I am prepared to take any and all legal action against Turner Broadcasting and its affiliates for any and all expenses incurred during the response to today�s incidents." Good lord what a bunch of paranoid assholes. Is the population at large ever going to snap out of it? We are not under daily attack by Muslim terrorists and we need to stop acting like we are. I place the blame squarely on Bush, who constantly spews "war on terror" rhetoric during every speech and public appearance.
I think of it as an extra second of life. I'd rather fall 9,000,000 m. :-)
As long as they don't mess with my halogens..  Burn, Baby, Burn!
I'll grant that your arguments follow from your mechanistic, behaviorist axiom: that consciousness is a formal system. I don't agree, so I don't find your arguments terribly convincing in application to the real world (and frankly, your consistently condescending tone does little to improve their persuasiveness).   I've listened to what you have to say, and I've said what I have to say.   It saddens me that you cling to a cramped caricature of yourself as a deterministic machine, devoid of moral agency.   But it's not my job to wake you up. It's yours. Good luck.
Ummm... No. After looking over the right wing sites, all they think about this incident is that it's further proof that Democrats ignore real problems and focus on nonsense. Bush is famous for his malapropisms. When did Bush's "stupid quote of the day" turn into carefully designed slurs?
&gt; If all the stories on Reddit looked like that headline, I wouldn't come here anymore. Oh, darn. I don't see why Reddit has to have brief headlines like a newspaper.  It is not a newspaper. Most short headlines are terribly UNdescriptive and you either end up wasting time having to read a story that you wouldn't have if the headline had been more informative, or you miss a story you would have wanted to read. Upvoted.
I could see an interesting situation arising from that where a child is offered an organ from a child molester... I'm also curious, where would you stop?  Should all prison inmates have to undergo medical experiments?  And perhaps the nature of the experiments should befit the crime?  I can see that it would "help" society to do it but I'm not sure I want to live in a society where we treat prisoners worse than animals...
wadeez it
i need to make money
Description: Kansas City woman arrested for traffic citations.  Is 3 months pregnant.  Is obviously hemorrhaging and goes through 3 changes of pants in jail cell by jail-house employees.  Nobody will let her see police doctor, get first aid, or bring her to hospital. Obviously, she ends up miscarriages.  Not a single cop or city employee says a fucking word until tape of everything shows up a year later during her lawsuit. Fucking cops.  Fucking Kansas City cops.
And you display your superiority to him by calling him a dick? Are you really this stupid? If he was deliberately insulting, and it was wrong, why is it right for you to call him a dick?
wtf is with these pictures coming over again and again every month, for the last 5 years?
Because it's true.
actually e is euler's number, exp is short for exponential, so it's not read the same, but I get what you're saying anyway.  *keeps fighting*
That actually how Courtney does it, too.  She didn't do all the singing on her last album.
&gt; That would be a nice tool to start with when trying to make a modern engine for an old game... (Master of Magic, anyone? :) In booming wizard-like voice: "If that is the truth, then your work must stop!".
I know. It's something that I've been observing for the past few weeks of viewing Reddit. I lost my previous e-mail for my last account so I had to make a new one, but virtually anything I said that didn't go with the typical liberal Democrat mainstream thought gets modded down.
Damn, I am on it.
&gt;Widely and easily accessible porn Hmm, maybe I have a chance at winning the UN Peace Prize after all.
Try going to obama08.com or obama2008.com.  You'll get forwarded to Google for a misspelled search on his first name.  Weird.  If the names aren't owned by a squatter, then why isn't his name spelled right?
I'm going to give these to my gf.  IBTC, you know?
Yes, the world is allowing it to happen, well lets just go up to China a force them and their guns &amp; their bombs with their 1mill+ army to stop.   .....  You first.
Time to get Zen: Explicit is better than implicit.   Simple is better than complex.   Readability counts.   Special cases aren't special enough to break the rules.   In the face of ambiguity, refuse the temptation to guess.   There should be one-- and preferably only one --obvious way to do it.   If the implementation is hard to explain, it's a bad idea.
FuckTheSouth used to be an entirely different site talking about nothing political, just how the southern states are a parasite on the northern states, specifically New England and the like. Being a pure bred southerner (and proud to be) I quickly found a site that refuted each and every claim. Afterwards I could no longer stomach anything the author wrote. Once someone proves to me that they are incapable of unbiased writing, I always view their bullshit with a massive grain of salt if I view it at all.
I hope they stay covered up.  Have you seen how ugly those women are?  No wonder the Muslim men make their women cover up.
What tone? I didn't see any negative tone at all. Are you guys reading the same article that I am?
Really. To me it is just the opposite.
What's so American about unquestioning authoritarianism?
I was, but not anymore! My friends on the other hand...
&gt; As far as I'm concerned, if it's not documented, it doesn't exist. That's a useful maxim when managing a software project.  Not so useful when making claims outside of that context.
Dude is so repressed, posting these comments are probably the only forms of release he gets to experience.
Actually, Mexico is quite wealthy, but all natural resources belong to the Nation (whatever it means) and not to the people. The problem is in the distribution and the gap between the wealthy and the poor (few people have way too much and a lot of people have very little --- the US is heading this way by the way, just take a look at the economy in the last 10 years---). 
oops, wrong. they did it.
It took me a minute to get used to the delay in powering on, but I don't notice the spectral difference any longer.
Did we read the same article? A few quotes: &gt;if ordinary (western) people are this excited to understand what previously confused or frightened them, there's still hope left. A lot of hope. &gt;When non-Muslims look at this picture and cry "Contradiction! See, she's only pretending to be pious" I look and them and see a worldview irretrievably tangled in the idea that religion and sexuality are incompatible. Note that while she's lumping "non-Muslims" into one group, she refers specifically to those who see the picture as a contradiction: &gt;They simply don't have the tools to understand that the hijab is, for Muslim women, a symbol that separates public and private life I'm especially curious about this line: &gt; Why is that the West "must" strive to understand and compensate for Islam, but the reverse is not true? Nowhere in the article does she say we have to compensate for Islam. If you can find it implied, I would like to see where, because I didn't see it. The only place she uses the word "must" is here: &gt;... the hijab is not interchangeable with a nun's habit. It is not a western symbol, and cannot and must not be interpreted through a western social lens. Which doesn't seem all that extroadinary. Many people see the outfit as a fundamentally conservative form of dress, like a nun's habit. But there is no equivalent dress in western culture. &gt;Bullshit. Given a scene in front of you, how do you know whether it's a clue or not? I don't even know what this means. Why are you angry? 
angry wife, or teenager who hates his job?
You know as well as I that this has nothing to do with Bush's malapropisms. This predates Bush. The right thinks that they're being clever and insulting, while the rest of us scratch our heads and go, 'huh?' http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Democrat_Party_(phrase)
FDR and the Securities Act of 1933 (http://www.sec.gov/divisions/corpfin/33act/index1933.shtml) creating the SEC and fair capitalism in addition to the 1913 Wilson hand over to the Federal Reserve system (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Federal_Reserve_Act) which is a private corporation to issue the US money with interest was one of the biggest wins for Capitalism/free market in the US history (even though they look evil).  It was hardly commie, Social Security was also an insurance program rather than an entitlement (social security is mainly to create consumers well into old age).  Social Security is largely paid as an insurance policy/retirement fund.  Both of these were investments.  Check the stock market since 1933.  http://www.tiny.cc/33stock  due to FDR that commie.  Capitalists for corruption just hate him today because he created teh SEC that investigates things like backdating stocks and validating actual earnings.  The haters of FAIR Capitalism in the Dutch way.   
Not to mention that even falling, there is very little actual area to *fall onto* -- odds of rolling off/falling off are pretty high it would seem to me. I wouldn't do it thats for sure.
This is awesome dude
And a lot of people that use Maya work in a high-tech environment and there's probably a co-worker that knows a little bit of programming, and can extend the app.
I'm guessing angry wife.
Wow, you managed to hit a lot of talking points on that one.  "Post-9/11 world", "vulnerable", "scary", "attack at home". How about this: Stop being a bunch of scared little pussies.  There is no way to stop all the lunatics.  These promotional items were there for weeks before the "authorities" noticed.  Just get on with your life.   Think of how many attacks we've had SINCE 9/11.  Zero.  Now think how scared and whipped americans have been since then for no reason.  Nobody needs to attack when you're already cowering or curled up in the fetal position. 
Good read.  I would like to see iBatis vs ActiveRecord though.  iBatis seems a lot less complicated, can automatically generate most of the work, and doesn't have all the overhead.
and he has been leading a superpower of a country for how many years now?  This guy is a puppet.  To take him down and embarrass him is not going to solve the problem.  Who is pulling the strings and what is their agenda?
You're fuckin' A!  Kill 'em all and let god sort it out. Team America! FUCK yeah! Douche.
Win2000 is awesome. It is great for running networks and securing users. Almost as good as unix.
This really sucks. It seems to me a better strategy would be to let the peace activists out of the country and then not let them back in. Clearly, I need to give my main man George W a call.
Ah, I see, thanks. So they've added a gratuitous adjective to the description of the offending item to make it seem more ominous - as if the magnets had some role in the function of the sign. I wonder if the article's author is typing on his rubber-bumpered keyboard from his rollered chair.
When I see a woman in a headscarf and I can reasonably assume from her age and accent that she was born and brought up in the same western society as me, it's unambiguously a political statement and it means she rejects much more important things than sex with me or with anyone else, things including gender equality, freedom of conscience and freedom of speech.  (OK now you can mod me down)
I haven't gotten used to the fact that the 3 in the celing light being on (very bright) uses less energy than the standing floor lamp.  I keep wanting to turn the overhead off when we leave at night and leave the standing floor lamp on. Old habits die hard I guess.  I know better, but still feels wierd.
1. Fuck the South hasn't changed since it first appeared.   2. How absurd to claim things are false, and provide no references, when the thing you're claiming is false is filled with references. You do realize anyone who wants can check this out and find out you're full of it, right?
great article on a world war II spy who went undercover in occupied France.
Excellent example! Well done. *clap clap*
Source?
yeah, but what makes the fundamentalist atheist movement so unique is that they want to be in the middle of a war of faiths.  can't beat join 'em.
Download a PDF  of your favorite classical music piece for free. This is great site, with an easy to use interface with no hassle navigation.
Maybe it's the other way around.
Bah, just another trophy girlfriend! ;)
Terrible headline, fascinating subject. Edit: Aw, man. I hadn't even realized it was a Simpsons reference. All is forgiven.
The java source has always been available.
it says that one woman looks up or down for yes or no to each letter.  I don't see why she can't learn morse code, wouldn't that be alot faster?  you could have a computer track her blinking or something and output it as dots and dashes
Molly Ivins was a good person.
Couldn't resist Simpsons reference
I hope you die.  Have you heard how stupid your comment sounds?  No wonder reddit is modding you down. I'm only kidding.  Sort of.
The ignorance-is-no-excuse principle is even more absurd than that.  The entire body of law is written and rewritten faster than a trained legal mind could be expected to read and comprehend it. Even going to law school and dedicating most of your waking attention to comprehending all the laws that may obtain to your circumstances is task you could never get ahead on.  Lawyers learn broad principles and then spend many hours studying specifics to address specific questions, but _nobody_ does or can know the whole law. Here's an Amendment I'd like to see introduced at all levels: The entire body of statuatory law for government entity X(country,state,county,etc) is limited to a total word count not to exceed Y.  Y shall be set once every 20 years by testing the reading speed and comprehension of the populace and setting a word count such that the average citizen would require no more than Z hours to read and comprehend the entire body of law. If the body of law is at its word limit, any new law must first strike or simplify a preceeding one. (Pick a value for Z of something like 2000 hours for the country, 1000 hours for a state, and 400 hours for a county or city.) 
No, Slava is right. &gt; You call equals twice and get different results. That's referential transparency, not idempotence. Idempotence is when performing an operation repeatedly has the same effect as performing it once;  it doesn't "stack" or accumulate. In HTTP terms (as the article you linked to explains), GET, PUT, and DELETE are all idempotent, even though they're allowed/expected to generate different results for each request.  POST, on the other hand, is non-idempotent because it specifically allows accumulative effects, like deducting money from your bank account.
&gt; For example, my idea of hot needs glasses and has a big IQ. Well, HELLO, SAILOR!   
Java on Reddit?  WTF?  :P
will do!
Yeah.  It's pretty upsetting.
No you musn't. If you learn how to spell, your reward is simply to be annoyed by the 99% of the population who can't -- including your boss. &gt; AGH! See? 
Fasten your seat belts.
&gt; A proper comparison function would return the same thing each time no matter how many times you call it. Right.  The point is that what you are talking about here is not idempotence, but referential transparency/determinism. Even the broken, non-deterministic `equals` implementation discussed in the article is actually idempotent.
the one who was actually funny and not throwing public temper tantrums about republicans? I could live with that.
that was false advertising, i expected pictures of a gaping hole swallowing a whole town and the unexpecting populous
http://presidentbushisafuckinggenius.com still up for grabs.
I could have sworn I made-up a similiar line.  Now I know not to claim it as original.  Damn! The article was good though.
It's that well-known liberal bias of reality again.
Hitler was very Socialist in his own way.  He felt that everybody else's wealth should be taken and divided equally among the Germans.
Also known as a “[throwie](http://www.instructables.com/id/E9D2ZJ3FG0EP286JEJ/)”.
[Put up or shut up.](http://www.goarmy.com)   
Download video clips from YouTube, Google, MySpace, MetaCafe and DailyMotion, etc.
Good luck with the contraception and sex ed.  Africans are morally opposed to contraception, and teaching sex ed would require telling them that their native customs and traditions are flat out wrong. It's the right thing to do, but the people most likely to want to help Africa are the least likely to get in there and tell them to drop their supersitions, abandon their customs, stop screwing around on their wives, and not kill their wives if they ask their husband to wear a condom.
yeah, I am incredibly ticklish and can tickle myself easily just about everywhere I am ticklish.  I can just grab at my abdomen and get the crazy tickles.  Maybe my cerebellum is underdeveloped or something.
overlong? pshaw.....
Simple easy to follow howto.  Very handy.
I don't like the recording industry either, but some of this guy's defenses are downright silly. &gt;Robert Santangelo and his lawyer, Jordan Glass, responded at length on Tuesday, raising 32 defenses, demanding a jury trial and filing a counterclaim against the companies for allegedly damaging the boy's reputation, distracting him from school and costing him legal fees. Should we stop prosecuting suspected murders for fear of damaging their reputations?  Should we let suspected rapists complete college before their trial? &gt;His defenses to the industry's lawsuit include that he never sent copyrighted music to others; that the recording companies promoted file sharing before turning against it; **that average computer users were never warned that it was illegal**; that the statute of limitations has passed; and that all the music claimed to have been downloaded was actually owned by his sister on store-bought CDs. [emphasis mine] Ignorance of the law is not a defense.  At least one of my CDs has a notice prohibiting duplication on it (too lazy to check the others right now.)
No of course not, that's why it took two weeks before one passed by. :)
Was **not** a hoax.  It was an advertising campaign. A hoax would envolve something that actually looked like a bomb, placed with intent that people thought it was a bomb.  Not something that looked like a lite-brite and was intended to build "cult following" of a tv-show.
Funny Review on the movie
Is this symtom similar to the [Awakenings](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0099077/)?
Last August?  A federal court ruled that the elections commission broke the law during the election by having a closed debate on a publically funded college campus when they refused to allow the Green Party and Libertarian Party candidates participate in the debates.  Both candidates were arrested for trying to attend in an act of civil disobedience.  And the federal court ruled BEFORE the debates took place. If you think this is just Bush, you're dead wrong.  Those in power seek more power and to prevent erosion of that power.  Period.  That's all either of the two parties do, and as long as they keep trading power they both know its all just show to make the public think there is a choice.  As long as both parties agree tacitly to collect more power for their seat, they can relax and know that when their party finally wins, there will be plenty of power waiting for them to wield! Think about it.  How many laws that the Republicans passed have the Democrats repealed?  Yeah, that's right, ZERO.
wow...
Innocent until proven guilty only applies to criminal cases, not civil.  A similar difference lies in the phrases "preponderance of evidence" (civil) and "beyond a reasonable doubt" (criminal). Copyright violations can be either criminal or civil.  There is a higher bar to meet to have the violations be criminal, and many sued by the **AA don't meet that bar.
I'm modding him down. And for the record, Middle-Eastern women are -extremely- beautiful.
&gt;Note that while she's lumping "non-Muslims" into one group, she refers specifically to those who see the picture as a contradiction And who's that, besides sexually repressed nutjobs? She seems to suggest that "the West", as a whole culture, would naturally look at this photo as a contradiction. Why do I say that? Well, she identifies them as "non-muslims", for one; not "evangelical christians" or anything like that. Personally, this non-muslim saw a hottie who keeps it all under wraps until she gets home. You don't have to be a muslim woman to be like that, as many American men can attest. &gt;Nowhere in the article does she say we have to compensate for Islam. If you can find it implied, I would like to see where, because I didn't see it. The earler poster doesn't say it, but what strikes me is that it is common among Islamic authorities to frown upon the American way of life as decadent and, by some extreme viewpoints, satanic; it seems a double-standard to suggest non-muslims have something to learn about another culture they haven't experienced (a point of view I agree with), but muslims do not have the same obligation.
"China, why did it have to be China?" "Oooo, China very dangerous.  You go first."
While this is hardly conclusive, I've had suspicions along these lines for a while. Ever since Bush said "I don't think we'll ever find out who did this," with a big smirk on his face. For someone reportedly furious whenever his plans were leaked to the press, it was a pretty mild reaction.
The part about Golden Tee is blasphemy, and I hate regular golf.
&gt; A few quotes: I did read those the first time. &gt; The only place she uses the word "must" is here: &gt; &gt; ... the hijab is not interchangeable with a nun's habit. It is not a western symbol, and cannot and must not be interpreted through a western social lens. Hmm.. perhaps I did misunderstand her intent in the first reading.  My understanding of the hijab is that it remains a symbol of male domination over female, and that its use was forced upon females by males long ago, and that females support its use due to something like the Stockholm Syndrome. I had never thought of it as similar to a nun's habit, and so I interpreted that quote to mean that my viewpoint is necessarily invalid because of my western perspective. &gt; I don't even know what this means. Why are you angry? Not angry at all.  Did you read the quoted section above my initial comment? Here it is one more time, from TFA: &gt; But if I were walking down Shera' Talaat Harb with a camera and came across this scene, I would like to think that rather than interpreting it according to my own agenda, I would keep an open mind, and wonder whether--just perhaps--this was a clue that there were things I still had to learn.  The premise is that you go throughout your day, and when you come across a hot-button issue for *someone else*, you are supposed to recognize this as a clue, and then ponder.  And that if you simply interpret *somebody else*'s hot button issue according to your own agenda (which is what we humans do 99% of the time), you are closed-minded? I reject that.  I openly admit that if I saw the photo in question without having read this article, I would not recognize the "clue".  I am pretty sure I would interpret it according to my own agenda and move on to more important things.   Ultimately, I am saying that what she wants from me is unreasonable.
Not all of Africa is starving. It -is- an entire continent, you know.
Why ban them when you can tax the crap out of them?  You don't turn 99% of the citizenry into criminals*, and you get some revenue. *Oops, you already did that with the drug laws.
[PDNFTT](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Internet_troll)
79 - it was easier to count the ones I hadn't read.  There's a few turkeys here as well as plenty of just good, but not superior work, plus a lot of great work just completely missing. 
Why?
It seems like a lot of commenters are assuming the authorities found one and suddenly put out an APB for people to be alert. Judging by various reports, the first one was found and thought to be suspicious; around the same time independent reports of "suspicious boxes" on bridges started rolling in. The response may have been heavy-handed and now the authorities are trying to cover up for looking like idiots for disarming an ad campaign, but if you were the chief of police and separate independent tipsters started calling in similar looking suspicious packages all around the city, you'd be fired if you didn't roll out the anti-terror teams. And god forbid it turn out to be something real, people would be ready to lynch you.  I'm not saying it's right or shouldn't be changed, but the world is what it is these days.
Those interested in this may also enjoy reading about [table-oriented programming](http://www.geocities.com/tablizer/top.htm).
It's scary how they've managed to spin this into something it so obviously isn't. I predict it'll get a lot worse before it gets better just based on the reaction from today's event. The general reaction should have been "look at what a bunch of knobs the Boston PD are" but instead it's "whoever did this is going to Gitmo"
I wish I could watch the video ...  but the title starts with:  Best. Video. Ever. I'm always struggling with my conscience.  I just can't click on that kind of link.    
You've never met my sister... I don't wear a baseball cap...does that change my place in society compared to other men who wear baseball caps? I don't wear a suit...does that change my outlook on life compared to other men who wear suits? My sister doesn't wear a bikini to the beach...does that change her political or philosophical stance on fundamental concepts compared to other women who wear bikinis to the beach? What does someone's clothing have to do with anything besides their clothing???  Here, I'll save you the effort of thinking about it:  If you broadly assume your preconceived notions are factual, then it is easy to draw a conclusion that suits your perspective.   Life is easy to understand when you force its bewildering contents into tidy little boxes, neatly labeled for quick intellectual digestion.  The reality is, you can't judge a book by it's cover...
Some do. They are the 'good' group: motivated, willing to learn something new, and are on the right track. I enjoy lending them help. The rest just... want to get their work done and couldn't care less.
i think people should read the author's bio and some of her other articles linked at the bottom of the article.
Wait, what? Viagra helps to make new nerve cells?
Okay, I think I'll go take a look.
So, in 36 years they've caused one death, after which they were made safer. Accoding to your comment, "travelling at 75 mph, bean bags kill!" I hate to nitpick, but so far you've only submitted evidence that "Travelling at 75 mph, *a* bean*bag* killed someone a generation ago."
yeah, that was the first thing i thought of when i was reading through this. [more text, less graphics](http://www.negativland.com/albini.html) version of said link.
True, usually putting "best ever" means the proceeding link contains shit, but this is actually pretty damn good. Someone spent a lot of time making it.
When are we going to give in and annex the living hell out of this place?
it seems that they missed some things, but it was still an interesting read.  I want to move to a really small country some day.
Here lemme fix that for you.. "When living in a paranoia induced police state you have to think it through before you go placing unauthorized electronic devices on private property."
Non-sensical arguement. Conscription is slavery. And the argument presented utterly failed to take into account that conscription would mean a **lot more then just Iraq**. We're all highly embarrassed by our idiot President and his stupid fiasco's. Mission Accomplished to this man seems to a unending series of war and enemies, even if he has to manufacture them himself. But conscription is not the answer to stopping the Iraq war. It's time for the military to refuse to fight. Their Congress has utterly failed them, and the American people themselves haven't got the stomach to oppose the President in meaningful ways. It's up to the military now, but not by militarizing everyone between the ages of 18 - 30.  That's insane.
His approach is basically a reimplementation of a large chunk of CPython.  Instead of bytecode, you get ocaml, but everything is still looked up in hashes, etc. Also, the hash by ID thing... wow.  His optimization of constants him from noticing this:  foo = {"someword":0}   bar = "someword"   foo[bar] works just fine.  He might cry himself to sleep when he tries:  foo = {"someword":0}   bar = "some" #I would have just used "some"+"word", but       #he might have optimized that as well   bar += "word"   foo[bar] #key error Likewise, the 100 integer optimization makes this work:  foo = {2:0}   bar = 1   bar += 1   foo[bar] But don't try:  foo = {101:0}   bar = 100   bar += 1   foo[bar] #key error
that sucks.  At least you won't be out of a job anytime soon.
If it were so simple...
The cool part was how uninformative it was.   Have your say and move on is class. 
Great article
As loathsome as the PATRIOT Act is, it hardly compares to Hitler's "enabling" act.  They're called books.  Crack one open now and again.
Getting your conversion crossed. A 747 takes off at [150-180 MPH](http://www.aerospaceweb.org/question/performance/q0088.shtml. (290KM/H) The Veyron can do 253 MPH (per Wikipedia).
(semi ot)Is it just me or do things seem to be heading in a very ghost in the shell direction, not just this but just things in general. 2030 is starting to seem like a pretty plausable date for the actual realization of that world (not that it wasn't meant to be). anyway that's what came to my mind when I heard this.
It's pretty amazing that you can be [over 42](http://www4.army.mil/ocpa/read.php?story_id_key=9197) and still be so clueless.   What's your secret?  Fox News?  Rush Limbaugh?  A bucket over your head?  Ayn Rand?
I wonder if a ban on "incandescents" would affect halogens or arc-lamps? Both are extremely pleasant and bright, but draw a lot of power. I'd hate to think of people ditching 100W incandescents in favour of 400W halogens.
i think this is the search engine ive been waiting for  screw lycos
...which just means there's a lot more incentive to develop alternative energy sources.
This is coming from Canada, which which has military in Afghanistan. Perhaps they are trying to deflect attention away from the fact they could be accused of going after terrorists. With the Democrats being in power in the US now, I can't help but think countries like Canada that have been active in anti-terrorist activities will be back-pedaling and looking to divert attention away from that inconvenient fact.
Well, now you can define "blank" :)  Is it all 0s, 1s, a pattern, ... pi?  In a general sense a blueprint describes a state of the finished product.  For some things, like a gear, that is the only state.  But contained within the blueprint of a hard drive is the mechanism for it to alter itself from the initial state the blueprint describes. So, I agree with you.  The blueprint only describes the initial state of the hard drive.  I just found this line of comments fascinating enough to respond to.
You can't play bumper cars with golden tee
BBSpot sucks.
UFC has an uphill battle.  Pride offers fighters more money, better competition, greater exposure, and a far larger audience.  I have some inside knowledge on this that I cannot share here, however, I know that this year Pride is launching an agressive marketing campaign in the US.  It will be interesting to see what happens.   I'm just tired of watching a couple of tatted up wanna-be bad asses rolling around on the octagon floor trying to catch their breath.  Once the US sees the level of athleticism of the Pride fighters, people will be more willing to accept MMA as a legit sport.
Like [this](http://reddit.com/info/wjqu/comments)?
What the hell am I filling out right now I'm lost, . . . Gah!
A bit too long..yawn
1/30/07: Keith Olbermann takes a look at Bush's claims about thwarted terrorists plots and fact checks them. Pray tell, what shall he ever find?  Olbermann: Upon his appointment, Sir Norman Bettison made one of the strangest comments of the year: "The threat of terrorism," he says, "is lurking out there like Jaws 2." Sir Norman did not exactly mine the richest ore for his analogy of warning. A critic once said of the flopping sequel to the classic film: "You're gonna need a better screenplay." 
looks like they are trying to run away from themselves
I do not contest that you do not. However of course the site was not designed with your approval in mind; you are, after all, only a sample of one. If the litany of newspaper, magazine, and book designs does not convince you that the *population* reacts, perhaps [this oft-cited study](http://psychology.wichita.edu/surl/usabilitynews/72/columns.htm) might. But back to the original point, the design of the website is not necessarily faulty. It is hastily rash to say that there exists no reason whatsoever to justify narrow columns.
pshaw? radrik......
I think someone should point out that Gosling likely had nothing to do with this.
Nice photo of same sex marriage in Canada.
Go Bears!
I think the word "get" is missing from the message here? 
You may want to pull your head out of your ass for a minute (if it's at all possible) and actually take a look at the world around you. You might find it's different from what you're used to seeing.
or endian675.
I think I saw this in an episode of Beavis and Butthead ehehehehhehehhe tractors RULE
Nonsense. You're just not used to it. Fluorescent is the standard where I live (and in most parts of the world), and I haven't personally met a single person who's troubled by it. A delay in turning on? Do you realize how wimpy you guys sound? "OMG I CANT STAND 5 SECONDS IN THE DARK!!" F*** that, sir. Nothing personal here, but I just can't stand you people you inconsiderate energy hogs. YOU hurt the world. Stop being so selfish.
&gt; probably things would work much more smoothly if we just let powerful people do whatever they like. I strongly disagree with what *appears* to be your position that liberty is a nice platitude, but doesn't actually work. &gt; If the government doesn't have any special powers, it isn't the government. For example, I want the government to be able to levy taxes, but I don't want every citizen to be able to do so!  I think that some things you would call government could exist without powers that individuals do not have.  However, that's not the argument I'm making at the moment.  Besides, the reason that the government workers can levy taxes without being forced to pay restitution is that they have more military power at their disposal, ultimately. Also, it's not at all clear to me that the phrase "collective rights" has any referent. &gt; If you don't think breaking into John's house and taking his cure for AIDS is justified, and morally the right thing to do, I'm not sure we can even argue. In the circumstance you posit, it certainly seems like the morally right thing to do, but justice isn't about morals.  If you break into John's house and take his stuff, you should have to pay.  That's just. 
Quick: what's the difference between a small South American country  with a clever dictator and a North American superpower with a dumbass president?
I'd be impressed if he did it carrying a large format camera.
You have officially secured yourself a good seat in the after-life.  well done my friend.  Now hand deliver that to Wolf Blitzer!
Indeed.  The problem with this measure is that it's misdirected; the problem isn't incandescent light bulbs, it's energy use.  &gt;California Energy Commission member Arthur Rosenfeld said an average home in California will save $40 to $50 per year if CFLs replace all incandescent bulbs. OK.  So slap a tax on electricity consumption that works out to $50-$60 a year for the average home.  That way, people have incentive to change their bulbs (or innovate other energy-saving measures).  Since many won't, put the additional revenue toward other anti-greenhouse-gas measures.
Legalisation of abortion.  Sounds like a great solution: get a teenage girl pregnant, then force her to abort the baby the same way we do here in the West. Legalised child killing is only layering wrong upon wrong.  We have prevalent abortion and birth control, and look what it's doing to the West: population decline, while the "underdeveloped" countries easily reproduce themselves and will have a replenished labour force in the next generation.
Don't get me wrong, that was pretty cool. But I experienced deja vu about 10 times looking at those pictures...
You don't remember the Windows 95 rollout then.
Nice try but you can't argue this. A hard drive exists on multiple levels. There's its information storage which is supervenient to the hard drive. There's the middle layer which we recognize as the hard drive. And then there's the subvenient physical atomic and molecular states which underlie it all. These subvenient states include thermal motion, heat, and it demonstrates why an object exists on a specific level of abstraction. ;) Regarding intelligence, you may be interested in [Bloom's taxonomy of learning](http://www.coun.uvic.ca/learn/program/hndouts/bloom.html) which is useful to have even if only as a reference. Regarding complexity's relation to intelligence, you may be interested in [a formal definition of life](http://c2.com/cgi/wiki?DefinitionOfLife). Which demonstrates how necessary and yet non-essential complexity is to a definition of intelligence. So we ask ourselves, what is intelligence? Well, its essential characteristic is *representation* or *modeling*. And so I believe intelligence to be living representation.
Can someone explain why this is on the Library of Congress' web site? Your tax dollars at work! edit: Alright, I got to the bottom of this. This is a few excerpts from "Look At My Striped Shirt", a book published last year by some bloggers. It looks like McSweeny's for the non-literary crowd. [Here](http://thephatphree.com/)'s the site, and [here](http://thephatphree.com/features.asp?StoryID=239&amp;SectionID=11)'s a non-linkjacked version of the title article.
why, jet fuel is made out of oil and not too long from now we are going to run out, leaving coal and nuclear power to be the only viable options that we know of at the moment
Then this Asshat would have to pay.   Performance and Bush in the same sentence?   WTF
I still think she killed him.
Photovoltaics.  Currently they're not cost-competitive at all, but that's largely because expensive tooling &amp; R&amp;D costs are amortized over comparatively small production runs.  There's a chicken-and-the-egg problem with photovoltaics: because they have high fixed costs, consumer prices remain high, which means that few consumers buy them, which keeps the production runs small, which keeps the unit prices high, which means that few consumers buy them... The theoretical limits of photovoltaics are way above present needs.  Present thin-film technologies have an energy pay-back time of 1-1.5 years and an EROI (Energy Return on Investment) of 20-30:1, meaning you get back 20 joules of energy over the lifetime of the panel for every joule you put into its manufacture.  Compare that to present EROIs on oil of 10-20:1, natural gas at 10:1, tar sands at 3-4:1, shale oil at 2:1, and ethanol at 1:1. I did some back-of-the-envelop calculations on solar output and computed that a 100x100 mi. photovoltaic array in the Arizona desert could supply the entire energy needs of the U.S, including transportation, the electric power grid, and everything else.  That's at present efficiencies (I used 10% in my calculations; Google gives about 15% for most commercially-available models).  It does assume negligible transmission losses, which isn't realistic at all, but is adequate for figuring out a ballpark figure. There's also room for *significant* growth in photovoltaic technology.  If a widespread market developed, it's not unreasonable to expect that Intel-like performance improvements every couple years.  Nanotechnology has already shown evidence of efficiencies up to 65%; meanwhile, manufacturing costs should fall just like manufacturing costs of every other semiconductor has fallen upon widespread adoption. For storage - batteries are improving, but I'd really put my money on fuel cells.  Solar cells + fuel cells are the traditional method of powering vehicles which need to last forever, like spacecraft.  Well, that and nuclear reactors, but I don't expect to see them on automobiles any time soon.
nice title: how about 'see how American "soldiers" drive through Iraqi streets with absolutely no concern for the subhuman life around them'.  Hmmm...now that I think of it, your title might have been sarcastic.
I guess.  The whole reversal joke thing was just too easy, though.
theres nothing authoritarian about it... if someone calls from a highly sensitive region and starts to talk about blowing up the statue of liberty.....i want them gone
I guess [this](http://www.flickr.com/photos/vanderlin/358746229/in/photostream/) is the "obscene gesture" which cbs so thoughtfully blurred out of their news report.
We must go to war.
The irony is thick with this story.
You are ill informed. Democrats have restored pay-as-you-go spending rules, and enacted significant lobbying and ethics reforms.  We've made it legal for Medicaid to negotiate volume discounts on prescription drugs. We've passed bills to raise the minimum wage, cut college loan interest rates, promote stem cell research, and cut billions of dollars in oil subsidies, redirecting the money to renewable energy research. And that was in the first 100 hours. Investigations into Bush's unconstitutional "signing statements", and illegal domestic spying are under way. Senator Obama has introduced legislation to withdraw **all** US Troops by March 2008. Nancy Pelosi is not your Fairy Godmother.  Harry Reid isn't Santa Claus.  Winning elections doesn't make progress happen instantly by magic.  Politics is *work*. Be patient.   If you're bored, make some popcorn and go read [firedog lake's liveblog coverage of the Scooter Libby trial](http://www.firedoglake.com).
great list of ideas
Yes, this *is* a joke article. Please refrain from making a fool of yourself.
&gt; What’s your favorite TV show? &gt; Ellen:Next, **The L Word.** &gt; Currently single or taken? &gt; Ellen: No comment Awww... 
How about them people? He could have said these people, but those weren't the people the article was talking about.
Wow! This could be better than Google Source Code Search
There's nothing authoritarian about domestic spying without a warrant?  I bet you did great in civics class.
I don't think so.  You said things are scary.  You said "post-9/11 world". 
Dude it doesn't compete with lycos. Its just for java code.
&gt;You can also see that the most obvious 'KISS' version of the code is the smallest! The overly clever code written by petevalle is still longer than the obvious case! Let me doubt of that. Your simple version is compiled with two jump instructions, jmp and jae. Conversely, the compiled petevalle's version only uses arithmetic instructions. Therefore, I would believe his version is faster.
This is hilarious. I laughed so hard I almost wet myself.
This is crap. What the stupid Westerners won't realize is that black Africans don't care the girls are 1) raped, 2) pregnant at 15, or 3) have multiple pregnancies. The only thing they care about is that "the man is able to desert the girl". Black africans don't need contraceptives and sex education because **they won't use it**. Black women who only have a couple of children in Africa get told by their mothers and aunts that there's something wrong with them. So what is needed in Africa? Teaching them parenting from scratch so that the next generation won't be quite so mentally deranged and enslaved to cultural expectations.
After a couple of late nights I am really grateful for this neat solution. Brilliant, I say! Sublime!
I'm looking for the Army of the Twelve Monkeys.
Agreed. A used cd and a good optical drive that can read through scratches = FLAC goodness.
11 I think
kbarrett works for zoto.  He's making a comparison between zoto and flickr which is unfavorable to flickr.  Draw your own conclusions... 
Yes.
Like you couldn't do that in Java?  class MyURL extends URL {    bool equals (MyURL url2) {     ...    }   } 
interesting take.
To start with: Backyard? FU man. That is the kind of thinking that has gotten us into this mess we are now. So many years have mexico so called "leaders" bent over to their US counterparts that now many seem to think that we need to worry about them first. That goes for that dumbass of a president we have now too (dont worry US mexico is bent over for at least other 6 years)  You´re right, PEMEX has done nothing but created a few millionaires while getting indebted to the ground. It is unbelievable that we sell the oil to the US and the we buy it BACK as gas. (crappy gas)But do not buy into the idea that the solution is to privatize the company. That can only further the ever growing gap between rich and poor and tighten the grasp the US has on our economy. Nor is the "fiscal reform" the magic cure (albeit necessary it might be). On the other hand, don´t worry, they pay attention. It is to their interest to keep things such as they are, even behind the facade they put to their own people in the form of the "immigration problem". If they wanted to they could help empower the poorest communities here and get them going in a self sustained economy. But no, there is no profit that way.
I see huge potential for a hijab-based porn industry.
What exactly are you saying? That China *isn't* harvesting organs from prisoners? Because this is old news. Chinese soldiers have been telling us this for years. This is just the first time there's been an official government study.
Brochures By Design, "designing marketing materials to sell homes!"
I'm beginning to lose respect for new scientist, and i am an avid reader. This article has even less scientific backing than usual. There are no quotes of other incidences to compare the reaction these boys had, and it doesn't even mention if there was another possible culprit. I mean come on, the whole article reminds me of my first year psych class: can you name the 20 confounding variables?
I'm just curious, how many children are you planning on having?
My dad once told me a story that he made some sort of crazy jump in the grand canyon where he would have fallen a long ways if he messed up.  Maybe it's this...
Too late.
The printer-friendly version is so much easier on the eyes.
No they don't.
Interesting article. I was always fascinated by the "pay it forward" idea.  I read an article once that said witnesses to an act of kindness are affected by it in a positive way.
Only 50 *discovered*.
Consumer capitalism is a bunch of crap, replacing only the superficial trappings of culture, and never touching any of the underlying psychology. There are McDonalds' in India, that doesn't mean any Indians eat beef. The British were good at cultural modification because they were willing to slaughter a great many people. Not so much India which they considered semi-civilized but definitely in black Africa. The British honestly considered that "it would improve tribal Africans' lives to wipe them out".
That's economically sound, but the problem is that politicians have to run for office.  If you ban incandescent light bulbs, that only hurts people who use them, but a kilowatt/hr tax hurts everybody.  That's attack ad material.
&gt; how long is it going to take the US authorities to develop a sense of perspective about threats? Up until most americans are conditioned  to voluntarily report suspicious behaviour and demand panoptic surveillance. Shouldn't be more than a couple of years.
This sounds like a standard programming argument. How deep below the abstraction should you go? Sure, there's going to be a host of people who learn just the framework and never delve in to ruby, but they'll be significantly weaker developers for it, so it's really their loss. No need for hand-wringing over it.
Great stuff... sexy time!
&gt; "Twilight in the Desert" Written by Mathew R Simmons who is one of the major oil investment bankers in the US and was also an advisor to Cheney's Energy Task Force. Simmons is a major Peak Oil believer which means that Cheney, who obviously respects Simmons opinion enough to include him as an advisor, is at least aware of the ideas.  Cheney probably convinced Bush back in 2001 that invading Iraq was the only way to secure the US energy future and they had to do it for the good of the country. Bush probably squinted real hard and said, "Strategery".
They are common in Latin America and Europe too...  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bidet
This is how Fugi film owned Kodak in the 90s.  The whole of Kodak was working on capturing the most realistic photos possible. Fugi came along and said, up the saturation up the sharpness, make reality better. Kodak had to adjust. By the time they did everyone had moved over to digital.
I thought it was neat and super insightful!
&gt; What’s on your iPod right now? &gt; Ellen: Nelly Furtado, Sleater Kinney, The Organ, Patti Smith, Sassie. Apparently known for being Lesbands. &gt; What’s your favorite book? &gt; Ellen:The Happening by Annie Ernaux Game, set, match.  Navratilova style. 
Green building, home building articles.
I think the Unplug extension for Firefox is handier and more versatile.
Then maybe having a nuclear reactor in a piece of equipment that's prone to crash, however rarely, isn't such a great idea.  You'd be better off to use electricity from non-crashing nuclear power plants to convert CO2 into hydrocarbons and flying the old-fashioned way. 
Is that a bad thing? I thought the Ghost in the Shell universe had a lot of really great stuff in it.
[They just made an arrest](http://www.myfoxboston.com/myfox/pages/News;jsessionid=92CA6EB5B772D90C4FC05E2B00367C02?pageId=3.1). A 27 year old dude who placed the "billboards" around Boston. An arrest.  /updated link to video
And join an AA chapter? Give me a fucking break. The first step is *us* recognizing that Africa is full of psychos with typical psychotic, delusional and hallucinatory beliefs.
What is with all the whiny conservatives on here?
That is, assuming 5 is a possible input.  If I actually found this code in a real system, the first thing I'd do is look at how it's being used, because chances are the whole thing is unnecessary. Bad code is usually a harbinger of more bad code.
&gt; You don't think it's scary that 'suspicious looking electronic devices affixed to bridges and highways' took 2 weeks to be noticed? No.  Why would it be scary?  Non-bombs not exploding is not scary.   
After the very last Mexican has already immigrated to the US.
&gt; Downmodded for using **liberal** and **reality** in the **same sentence**. Duhhh??? 
And about 3 years old, but that's like yesterday in internet time.  No, wait....
And yet somehow Africans don't. Why do you think that is?
I'm aware that they're in entirely different ballparks.  I was only referring to the first paragraph for the comparison between Chavez and Bush.  Even then it's not so great a comparison, but I wrote what I did because that was where I thought txfer418 was going - right up until I read beyond the first paragraph of his/her comment.
What do you mean?
Funny how you can't have both morality and moral relativism.
All species of sea turtles native to Florida are either threatened or endangered and light pollution is a major contributing factor
directions of of my compass.... FIGHT!! 
Yeah, it's funny how these things happen. Gore fights global warming, Clinton works a restaurant. It's like one of those *where are they now* specials...
Ha, you not only missed the irony of your own accusation, you missed it again when I pointed it out.  I *downmodded* you, following your own advice.  Note which words you used in the same sentence.  
perhaps you, too, are being subtle, but I am lampooning those whose racism detectors are triggered by butterfly wings
おもしろい。  「あるあるは滅びぬよ。にせ科学でねつ造された健康情報こそ、日本人の夢だからだ！」
That should be a funny run!
Black Africans fear two things: * not having descendants  * being eaten If you tried to sterilize them, they would freak out and murder you. If you were strong enough to impose it on them, they would run away into the bush and die by the millions.
If you read this on a small display, it says  Africa doesn't need food, it needs contraceptives and sex   education When I read that first line I was about to volunteer.  Halle Booty, here I come...
I was very suprised by this article. Not half bad. Nice post.
Huh? You mean another article with the same URL??
Can there be any better example of the fact that the 'war on terror' is making us paranoid? This makes the police in Boston look like a bunch of morons.
I know.  Political reality is no fun.  But it's still worthwhile to *suggest* unpopular-but-superior policy options, I think.
&gt; Downmodded for using **liberal** and **reality** in the **same sentence**. Et tu? Or is that still too subtle?
It's a cool time to be a geek!
Welcome to the Kingdom of Fear. Hunter S. Thompson was absolutely correct.
Is there any other kind?
&gt;Nice try but you can't argue this. Just watch me. &gt;A hard drive exists on multiple levels. There's its information storage which is supervenient to the hard drive. Ah, see, now there is where you're confused. You're talking about the *idea* of a hard drive, in abstract. I am talking about a given individual instance of a hard drive.  The idea of a hard drive can't store 1GB of information, let alone 300. The idea of a hard drive can't store anything. I am not saying, and never intended to say, that the abstract idea of a storage medium must be as complex as what it *could* store. I am saying that any real data storage system is at least (lower bound) as complex as the data it actually contains.  If we attempt to describe the hard drive without describing the data it contains, we are imposing a subjective judgment about what is important about the hard drive's complexity, and we are "compressing" its information content in a lossy fashion. You see:  &gt;A hard drive exists on multiple levels.  No, it doesn't. We *understand* it on multiple levels, but it just *is*. Abstraction layers are a trait of our symbolic representation of a hard drive, not of the hard drive itself.  Obviously, the degree to which we care about data contained in the state of the hard drive (Do we care about just its design? Or the data it contains as well? Or even its thermodynamic state?) governs the degree to which we can compress that information. To store everything would require something very complex indeed. (Not mention be impossible, because due to Heisenberg's principle, we cannot even discern some information, much less store it.) But all of this is beside the point. The information which something is storing and/or processing establishes a lower bound on its degree of complexity, by definition. And that is enough to establish the point I was making, that simplicity can give rise to complexity, but not be intelligent.  Oh, and thanks for the links. The taxonomy of learning wasn't too interesting (there's lots of different attempts out there to sort that), but the definition of life was great, even though I think it's inadequate.  (It relies upon a definition of order. I have been trying to objectively define "order" for years now without much success. It always seems to fall back on notions of either homogenaity (sp?), or predictability, the former of which is merely level of complexity, and the latter of which is subjective because it requires a predicting agent.) 
This is recycled news. I saw a TV special about prisoner organ harvesting 5 or 10 years ago.
Cheny has terrible handwriting.
What drives are you suggesting?
Basically like every chef, everywhere. 
Yes, the second biggest one!
Ah, the ban. The bureaucrat's favorite tool for heavy-handed histrionics. They only ban things that are so awesome that everyone wants to use them. Things like assault rifles, acid, and internet gambling.  The major result of this policy would be to elevate the incandescent bulb into the stratosphere of mod.
If you want to do a comparison, feel free to go look it up. You keep acting like a broken record.  It makes you a very good socialist fundie, but it doesn't make you right. Why did we embrace socialism?  We didn't.  We never embraced it.  Our federal government instituted a program here and a new tax there until suddently it didn't seem so obvious. If socialism is so freaking wonderful, then why did Russia fail with it?  They had a working system and deliberately moved to Socialism and failed so badly that their entire country fell apart. "Finally somebody has the temerity to post an actual example of a non socialist state." You never asked for an example of a non-socialist state. You asked for 5 successful non-socialist countries in order to prove your confused point that socialist is the best system. The problem that you can't seem to get through your thick skull is that widespread does not make better. VHS vs BETA is a good example.  BETA recordings are far superior in quality, but it was never widespread. You've been under the complete misapprehension that widespread means best.  Does the most common religion mean it's better than another less common one? You're retarded.  Face it.
But can it pull off the perpetual motion thing that those brilliant Irish guys pulled off???  WHAT, WHAT are ya Steorn at???
Never Forget http://farm1.static.flickr.com/149/376047928_528888a184.jpg
I've explained to you why the protesters were not justified.  Although in this case the protests (and the underlying cause -- belief in a fairy tale) lead to only a few deaths, there are many instances where religious and ethnic hatreds have caused many more deaths, such as the genocide in Rwanda, the Genocide in Darfur (by muslims against non-muslims -- death toll is possibly as high as 400,000 currently).   Also, when freedom of speech is limited, freedom of thought is also limited.  It is important that non-free societies not be able to limit thought and expression in free societies.
Football can produce really big surprises. Powerhouse Barcelona was beat by the humble Zaragoza in their own stadium. I can't believe it.
AAhhhh...
Direct book list link. http://home.austarnet.com.au/petersykes/topscifi/lists_books_rank1.html This is much better, Hitchikers is up there and Asimov now as well as Dune.
I kinda like that reddit can have longer titles. Obviously one that long is excessive, but for the most part I think having the ability to have longer titles makes things more interesting around here.
&gt; The reality is, you can't judge a book by it's cover... And I bet you stop for every scraggly, bearded male hitchhiker too. Appearance is a statement, whether you're conscious you're making it or not. It's an indicator of what is inside.  Notoriously unreliable, perhaps, but an indicator nonetheless, and often the sole indicator. Life is easy to understand when you force its bewildering contents into tiny little cliches, neatly packaged for intellectual digestion.
I thought it meant they were either an old lady ot they had cancer. Oh well. guess I was way off!
I thought it meant they were either an old lady or they had cancer. Oh well. guess I was way off!
No, it discourages people from coming up with more succinct titles.
It won't come out *ever*.  That's the problem with sucky things that become widely used.  They're impossible to fix. In the meantime, I'm glad I know about it so I can avoid putting URLs in TreeSets or Hashtables or anything else that calls equals().  Gah.  I wonder how much of our code has performance problems resulting from this.
An early morning mishap turns ugly for these two poor guys...
The Veyron reminds me of another [two-tone car](http://world.honda.com/news/2002/image/4021105_1d.jpg).
apotheon, &gt;Nobody "lets" them. Wrong. You clearly do. You completely failed to address the actual media figures that claim to be "libertarians" that are no such thing. On the right you have Instapundit, and many many others. On the left Kos. Are any of these people actual card carrying libertarians? I seriously doubt it. &gt; I've heard many complaints... Great, do something about it! Protect your name and image. Case in point while you have been doing whatever you "do", [Matt Yglesias and several other blogsphere members took on the republican "democrat" label](http://www.talkingpointsmemo.com/archives/012199.php). This is the beginning of what you need to do be considered a real party. When any two bit person can claim to be libertarian and then spew whatever they want to say about your "party" stands for, the party becomes meaningless. That was my whole point on Joe Lieberman, many many people spent a lot of time clarifying just how little he has to do with the actual Democratic Party. These are just two instances. [This is still on going down to even the level of details of how other media refer to him.](http://www.rawstory.com/news/2007/What_exactly_Liebermans_ID_0131.html) &gt; Yeah, I've noticed, what with the very imperialistic political impulses of the Democratic Party's last two Presidential nominees. You're parroting marketing materials, not speaking of proven facts. Really? Case in point why no one take libertarians seriously, rather than try to debate points with which you disagree you insult people. This is one of Instapundit's main claims to fame. The casual dismissive insult. Maybe he's more of a libertarian than I have been giving him credit for. Is there a progressive movement attempting to take back the Democratic Party? [There are several](http://redstateson.blogspot.com/2007/01/pinning-ones-hopes.html). There was a huge debate across several blogs two weeks ago attempting to understand this very thing. [Starts here.](http://www.tpmcafe.com/blog/coffeehouse/2007/jan/15/what_is_this_new_movement) &gt; I can't stop them. You sure can. You start up a web page, you document how they are not libertarian, you call them up and letter right and get their attention. Case in point [Spocko v KSFO](http://www.spockosbrain.com/). In fact this is probably more important than organizing and I bet you could get a lot of funding to do it. &gt;In my own town. Where is that? Again you are very non-specific.  &gt;Currently, Northern Colorado. Previously, Tampa Florida. Before that, Southern California. Where? Which Congressional districts? Which state house districts? What are your chances? Who are your competitors? Where is your local organization in each of these areas?  I campaigned for Ned Lamont who ran for Senate this fall, in both Enfield and Suffield CT in the very North West corner of CT-2. I also canvassed for Joe Courtney, who ran and won the CT-2 national house seat, in Tolland, Ellington and the Rockville section of Vernon. In the process I also helped multiple state representative and state senate democratic challengers. In each of these places there was an organization at the most local level of interested people, and it was just as important to many of them to win the state rep and state senate seats as it was to win the Senate or House seats, because they know power in CT flows from Hartford. Some of these candidates for state rep and stat senate lost, others won, many did their own fund raising, for some it was a near constant struggle every two years to attempt to gain or regain state and local office. In discussions within the unsuccessful Lamont campaign, afterward concession election night, it became very apparent that City Council endorsements, or the lack of them were key to results in many towns. Of the vast majority of people who I dealt with at every level it was obvious they were interested, not just in CT but in a progressive national agenda, and that they were all volunteers. Many many came out of the wood work, because they felt strongly - something had to be done. And this was what they could do to change things. This is the real heart of the new Democratic movement.  It's not some DCCC, DSCC, DNC, or DLC marketing fantasy. It's real. Its actually happening, and as much as the powers that be in the Democratic Party and elsewhere will acknowledge it, *it scares the shit out of them*. The last thing these guys want is an active base. Who am I? I am nobody. A drop in the bucket of national awareness. There are many many people of similar inclination without such extensive involvement in monitoring news media or researching trends like I do, and then intervening. And for you to think that you are doing something by arguing via insult with me, show just how unrealistic your party is. I hope you do establish a web site, and I hope you are able to defend your party and make it credible, because frankly I agree with many of your political views, and it will be wonderful to have some libertarians around,who don't bend over, the next time a fascist veiled as a "conservative" attempts to take power again. You can ignore or dismissively insult my critiques of your organization. I doubt doing so will help you. I am a political maven. I eat live and breath this stuff, if I in 6 years couldn't find a credible libertarian outside of Lew Rockwell's tribe or Ron Paul, you have serious serious problems. And far worse is  the fact, that as I have been bringing this reality to your attention, you have gone out of your way to claim that I am part of the problem *based on my attempts to address it*! Breath taking really.  I wish you luck and good fortune but I fear for your ultimate success if this is how you deal with feedback.
Implicate Rove with what exactly?  Politically attacking Wilson? Mentioning Plame's name and CIA together when the press already knew that?  Richard Armitage in the State Dept was the one who leaked her name to both Novak and Woodward.  But the prosecutor didn't want him, and then realized the best he could do would be to settle for finding either a lie or a slip up in someone's grand jury testimony. Did Rove know? Probably, but was apparently vague enough in his testimony to have "dodged" any indictments.  Did Bush know? Again, probably - his presidency is not one with too many aspects that he DOESN'T  know.  But he was never questioned, all he did was make 1 public statement (truthful? - unknown, but lying to the public isn't illegal , he isn't worrying about reelection and Cheney isn't running) and then basically kept his mouth shut. (and thanks to Nixon, IF there were any conversations he had... he probably switched the recorders off!)
Too bad the article didn't mention that compact fluorescent bulbs contain poisonous chemicals.
Protected by the American constitution. The constitution of the America they hate.
[This user](http://reddit.com/user/bonkydog/) loves to crapflood the headline space. Here's a nice, current [bonkydog](http://reddit.com/info/125u8/comments) example.
Why even add a tax?  Electricity costs are already getting people to switch to cfl's.  Walmart stores are pushing them, in fact.  Why is it necessary to do legislate *anything* here? The problem with banning or taxing incandescent bulbs is that it could hurt future improvements in technology.  There's at least one bulb being designed that works on the incandescent principle, but uses 1/12th the amount of power.  All frequencies except for visible light is reflected back to the center of the bulb. Why is it necessary to legislate saving energy when that energy savings translate to money savings?
Speaking as an American and a citizen of the world, I have to say that I agree with you completely!
Well, according to the blog author, Gosling is listed as the author via the @author tag.  So he has reason to believe that it's Gosling other than Gosling being popularly known as the inventor of Java.  Edit: here's the [old Javadoc](http://tns-www.lcs.mit.edu/manuals/java-api-old/java.net.URL.html).  The author is listed clearly as James Gosling there, so yeah, it looks like Gosling had everything to do with this.
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
It's deeper than that, I believe. I never did much algebraic number theory, but I have some vague memories related to exp(pi*sqrt(163)), and that the explanation involves looking at the q-expansion for a modular function (the j-function probably) associated with the imaginary quadratic field Q[sqrt(-163)]. The key is that this field has class number 1.
Might as well enjoy the ride down.
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - Gitterbugs - www.gitterbugs.com  - Live Dating Network - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
I've put cfl's in places where I usually have lights on for long periods of time, but left low wattage incandescents in other spots such as hallways or stairs. If my state bans incandescent, I might just go back to fully incandescent out of personal objections to idiotic legislation.
The "very wrong" thing about it is that it couldn't possibly encourage anyone to buy more Ikea furniture. Just the ad agency people screwing around.
Since its only for Java, its kind of useless for those of us who work in .Net, C++, Delphi, VB....
Evolution didn't plan on us living much past 40.
I suspect the ban is restricted to incandescent light bulbs intended for residential use. This would make sense. No one is going to try banning them for use in theatres, for instance.   
Long titles make up for not having a space for further description. Long titles are good. Cryptic titles that don't allow you to know what you'll find after the link are annoying.
Dude, you live in Dallas. I know 4 people that lived in Dallas. They left. I know zero people that have gone to Dallas.
It gets people's attention and then says "Ikea" and shows furniture. That's really all an ad has to do.
The author suggests that the filtering may be fine and well for an amateur, but is dismayed that professional work will be bastardized. Yes, because professionals rely on the free services of Flickr. Anyone shooting digital that knows what they're doing, likely has the acumen and basic grasp of technology required to set up a site with a host or on their own. If someone is that serious about photography, I don't see them relying on Flickr to showcase their talent. Maybe I'm missing something here. Your photos are being hosted for free, put up or shut up. (?!)
&gt;I did read those the first time. Sorry. I was using the quotes to make my case, not to insult you. &gt;Hmm.. perhaps I did misunderstand her intent in the first reading. My understanding of the hijab is that it remains a symbol of male domination over female, and that its use was forced upon females by males long ago, and that females support its use due to something like the Stockholm Syndrome. I agree with you. &gt;Ultimately, I am saying that what she wants from me is unreasonable. I agree that it's difficult to push past your current viewpoints (avoiding "prejudices" and its associated PC bullshit) and look for other interpretations. But that doesn't mean it's a bad thing to do. Is it reasonable to look at an entire culture and assume they're sexually oppressed without looking for evidence to the contrary?  If you looked at that photo, shrugged, and moved on, I don't think she's addressing you. She's talking to the people who say, "See, she's only pretending to be pious" and see them as sexually-repressed hypocrites.
In many applications, CFLs are equal to or better than incandescent bulbs in every way that counts. They save consumers boatloads of money, and will only save more and more as CFLs continue to improve, as CFL costs continue to fall, and as energy prices continue to rise. Their popularity is, unsurprisingly, soaring. I think the problem of old-fashioned light bulbs will solve itself, without legislative assistance.
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Another free dating web site to add to the list of many others. Like these ones  - [Gitterbugs](http://www.gitterbugs.com) - www.gitterbugs.com  - [Live Dating Network](http://www.livedatingnetwork.com) - www.livedatingnetwork.com
Don't get me wrong.  I love the man's work.  But he isn't the world's foremost expert on everything, like some of the people on reddit seem to think, as evidenced by his blogs making it to the front page on a regular basis.
Here is the [video of the poor fellow](http://www.myfoxboston.com/myfox/pages/News/Detail?contentId=2236957&amp;version=3&amp;locale=EN-US&amp;layoutCode=VSTY&amp;pageId=3.1.1). I understand the havoc it caused but I feel sorry for the dude. On one hand it shows how something this trivial has become such a scare post 9|11. The other hand can say that people did what they thought they should do in a post 9|11 world.
&gt; I'll make my points **pithy** A favorite word of Bill OReilly. A big hint about where you get your "information" on the issue. I have to hand it to the right-wing-wackos. Any group that can convince US citizens to actively rationalize away their own rights is in posession of some truly evil genius.
HotGigs Inc., an innovator in  web-based staffing solutions, has upgraded its online staffing exchange  HotGigs.com (http://www.hotgigs.com), adding new tools and capabilities, such as  the ability to compare billable hourly rates for a large variety of  consulting professions.  HotGigs.com provides a real-time online marketplace to help North  American employers and staffing firms efficiently outsource to North  American workers. The release of the new site coincides with HotGigs' 2007  growth strategy, following on the company's landmark achievement of  registering its 50,000th consultant, listing more than $500 million in  billable contract opportunities from North American companies and staffing  firms.
Something's seriously wrong when Zelazny's _Lord of Light_ isn't listed.
Speedballs!
those chinese are bad mother F-ers! if you're going to violate basic human rights, you might as well do it with flare. hats off to 'em!
&gt;And who's that, besides sexually repressed nutjobs? She seems to suggest that "the West", as a whole culture, would naturally look at this photo as a contradiction. Why do I say that? Well, she identifies them as "non-muslims", for one; not "evangelical christians" or anything like that. You may be right, she may be grouping and stereotyping the entire west. But does she seem like the kind of person with such a shallow worldview? I don't see the evidence for it, but I could be wrong. &gt;The earler poster doesn't say it, but what strikes me is that it is common among Islamic authorities to frown upon the American way of life as decadent and, by some extreme viewpoints, satanic; it seems a double-standard to suggest non-muslims have something to learn about another culture they haven't experienced (a point of view I agree with), but muslims do not have the same obligation. I don't think she ever suggests that muslims don't have the same obligation. I don't think she even mentions the matter. It's a four-paragraph blog post on a specific image and her reaction to it, not a full-length article on prejudice in muslim and western cultures.
11, but most of the sci-fi I've read doesn't fit this particular category it seems
huge fear of mine!
Well, not so much efficient as more desirable. Not much point to installing an expensive cfl bulb if I only use it twice a week to run down to the basement for a few moments. Banning incandescents might also have the unfortunate affect of raising the price of cfls.  Right now, the bulbs have to be hand made by glass blowers.  There's a limited capacity for them right now.  With a limited supply and drastically increased demand, the price will go up. There are also other uses for incandescents where heat is necessary.  What kind of legislator really wants to ban Easy Bake Ovens? Sorry kids, you can't play with your Easy Bake Oven anymore, because the heating element is now illegal here.
Because they were lied to.
So Audrey Hepburn in a headscarf is supposed to mean... what. http://www.movieposter.com/poster/MPW-4828/Hepburn_Audrey.html 
Agreed.  They're cheaper, so they should take off on their own.  It isn't the job of government to do this.
No link - but AdultSwim just put up a splash screen apologizing for the ad campaign.  It also stated they have requested that all the campaign be pull in the other 14 markets it was done in.  In a separate splash screen, they thanked the Boston authorities for their prompt response to the incident (and if I recall, apologized directly to them as well).
[You say a lot of stupid things.](http://reddit.com/user/LouF/)
No, I don't need to tell you shit. You, sir, are retarded.  Nothing I say to you has yet gotten past the metal plate in your skull. You keep trying to make the point that socialism makes us successful, and you tried to use the idiotic challenge of finding any successful country that doesn't have socialism. Regardless of whether the US is more successful or not today, my argument is that we're more successfull today than 100 years ago not BECAUSE of socialism but IN SPITE of socialism. Your argument is like comparing a lawyer with AIDS.  10 years ago he didn't have AIDS.  Today he does, but he is also makes more money today than he did then. THEREFORE, AIDS MADE HIM SUCCESSFUL! Idiot. 
When I said 'longer' I meant bytewise: the KISS version is 0x11 bytes while the petavalle code is 0x13 bytes. As far as speed goes, we'd have to benchmark it to be sure.  On  a modern intel chip I suspect that a near jump into the cache is quite fast; and since clock cycles for individual instructions are probably overrun by memory fetch times, shorter code would  on average be faster since there is less fetch.   The context would certaily matter. 
Ya.  Some idiot in the legislature sees them taking off and decides it's necessary to ban the old ones.  I hope even the tube senator makes fun of him for this one.
Why is Rob Levin on there? He wasn't really a Wikipedian, was he?
Because as I'm sitting at work and scanning a front page that currently has 104 stories on it, it's nice to get a brief summary to decide on what I want to read and what I don't.   If I have to read 104 paragraphs like that one, it is no longer an efficient process.
Rising seas, crop failures, and more violent weather will hurt a lot more than your eyes. Grow the fuck up. 
Sorry for the double reply, but what what you said just made me realize something which I thought was pretty neat, and I wanted to see if you liked it: The original question was that of 'intelligent design'. So I was thinking about that in the context of your characterization of 'intelligence' (representation or modeling). And it occurred to me that for an act of creating life (or complexity) to be intelligent, it must not only be carried out by a intelligent (or complex) agent. That agent must also use that intelligence to carry out the act.  In other words, if I create a new bacterium by gene-splicing (or whatever microbiologists do; I'm not a microbiologist), then I am an intelligent designer, and what's happening is intelligent design. However, if I do so by using antibiotics, and thus accidentally selecting for resistant strains, then, despite the fact that I am intelligent, I am not an intelligent designer, but an agent of evolution. A piece, if you will, of the environment. In other words, to be an intelligent designer, I must represent or model what I am creating, before or as I create it. Therefore, referencing my previous argument, I must be at least as complex as the degree to which I model the product of my creation. (The rest being left up to chance and natural selection.) So 'intelligent design' as a theory can only explain how complexity gives rise to more complexity. It cannot explain the origin of complexity. Only chance or evolution (both simple processes) can *add* complexity. Design can only preserve it.  (Note that I am not using complexity and intelligence as synonyms here. I am merely asserting that intelligence requires complexity, and thus that which is intelligent is a subset of that which is complex.) Thus we see, that "intelligent design" doesn't really explain the same things as the theory it's supposed to be an alternative to. The essential question is "how do we start with a simple thing, and get one that is complex in an organized way?". Intelligent design assumes that you already have a complex and organized thing.  This is not to say that intelligences, like humans, could not deliberately create something more intelligent than ourselves; just that we can't do so using only design. In order to add complexity, we must harness iterative selection processes, such as evolution.  
I was in Berkeley once, and I turned on the radio. "Time Zones" was playing on the college station, and I hadn't the faintest idea what it was. That was one of the few times I've decided "okay, I'm dreaming" and tried to wake up.
What about dimmable CFL ?  Why are they still so expensive ?   Lets face it... sometimes you need a dimmable light.
Where would you like me to begin? The Administration knowingly presented false information as fact. The goal of this willful misrepresentation was to persuade the American people to authorize a war of aggression on a sovereign nation. You're blaming the victim of the lie for the crimes of the liar.
this article should have been entitled:  What the US should be copying from Chinese Prisons
? 
Lots of pop-ups...   Grr...
Yet again innocent lives are sacrificed in the name of ridiculous superstition.
Misleading title. Boston was hardly "shut down" today. Certain intersections or subway stops had temporary shutdowns, but sayign "... Shuts Down Boston" is pretty off.
I *love* when sports fans whine about pro athlete salaries. You watch the games on TV, the teams get ad revenue. You buy tickets to the games, and you buy licensed merchandise... where do you think the money goes? And for that matter, where do you think the money *should* go?
Some credit card companies will [change the interest rate on existing credit cards](http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/pages/frontline/shows/credit/eight/) if your credit score drops. So your existing consumer debt, if you have any, can get more expensive to carry if your credit score changes.
great article directory and great article 
You don't tunnel to your home computer, you tunnel to switzerland with relakks or one of the free ones similar to it.
you've now been introduced to the most pathetic poster on reddit.  dopeseekr
A woman on a bus in DC talked to me for quite some time about how members of her religious group, the above-mentioned [Falun Gong](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Falun_Gong), were being kept in prison and harvested for organs.  I smiled politely and listened for the duration of the ride.  This is, it seems, what she was talking about.
Are you arguing that your code is equivalent? Care to finish it off if not?
What do you classify people like Jonathon Coulton, who has his own site, records his own music, sells it both online as downloads and on cds at gigs? I don't believe he's merely a hobbyist. I think he does it full-time.  But he's also not under someone else's label either.
&gt; A great writer named Neal Stephenson said that America does four things better than any other country in the world: rock music, movies, software and high-speed pizza delivery. Courtney Love **read** *Snow Crash*? Wow.
&gt; Sorry. I was using the quotes to make my case, not to insult you. Well, I wanted to respond, and that was the only thing I could come up with ;) &gt; I agree that it's difficult to push past your current viewpoints (avoiding "prejudices" and its associated PC bullshit) and look for other interpretations. But that doesn't mean it's a bad thing to do. I agree 100%. &gt; Is it reasonable to look at an entire culture and assume they're sexually oppressed without looking for evidence to the contrary? No. &gt; She's talking to the people who say, "See, she's only pretending to be pious" and see them as sexually-repressed hypocrites. I guess that seems like a straw man argument to me.  I think the general Western view is that Muslim females **are** dominated and sexually oppressed, if not repressed.  The contradiction is between what the woman is coerced into doing by her culture and the naughty librarian under the surface. I wonder (and perhaps rightly so, given the article's first comment concerning the sex manual) if the photo's subject is really contemplating sex with her husband and not how many drooling studs she could enslave just by donning that red number in the window. But then, that's my damned western perspective talking.
I always find it funny that people who normally call Bush an idiot are also willing to say he's the mastermind of everything that goes wrong. I have a feeling the truth is somewhere in between.
"It sounds like something out of the laboratory or Doctor Weird."  That is just too goddamn funny.  (for those who don't know, Aqua Teen actually has a character named Doctor Weird.)
&gt; And I bet you stop for every scraggly, bearded male hitchhiker too. Why would you assume that? &gt; Appearance is a statement... I agree... &gt; ...often the sole indicator... That would be unfortunate if true... &gt; Notoriously unreliable... True... &gt; Life is easy to understand when you force its bewildering contents into tiny little cliches, neatly packaged for intellectual digestion. My point is that you would be in error (deluded) if you thought that by classifying things according to what you believe them to be, while it might mean you sleep easy at night because you 'know what is what', it didn't mean you weren't deluded... I mean...I'm a raging, god hating atheist.  My sister is a good Muslim.  Since I have perspective, not bringing Christian baggage to the table, I don't automatically categorize her as a terrorists just by looking at her in  her hijab.  But if you were a Christian, I guess you'd just automatically see Terrorist and that would be your sole indicator...an unfortunate mis-categorization...
&gt; Fantastic wording. And very accurate, too. When I worked in tech support, the only thing we dreaded more than an XP Home user was someone running Windows ME.
Great presentation, but a straight link to [gapminder](http://gapminder.org) would have been better.  Myself, I usually like reading more than listening (much faster), and if you start with the main site all options are available.  And you can immediately jump in with the tools and start looking for stuff of particular interest. 
Check the foot notes.  He's been paying attention.
wow, i'm not even going to say "with due respect," that is perhaps the most ignorant comment on the issue i have ever seen.  so the fact the there are, oh i don't know, 1.2 billion muslims in the world, and that 1,199,990,000 of them are peaceful ones that have no intention of hurting or killing anyone, that fact doesn't negate the fact that, as you said, the Muslim world is trying to kill us?  I love this country, but i love what this country was founded on more, i love the freedoms that the founding fathers instilled in our consitution and when our government tramples on them, well, it wasn't what our country was created out of, i'll say that much
trolling? yes, but i still think it's a good piece of rhetoric on the issue, a well written piece, that while it was a little too subjective, still proved a very good point: that our civil liberties are being slowly taken away
You're stuck on the word 'formal'. It merely means precise and unambiguous. But the addition of ambiguity to a system doesn't exempt it from Godel's proof. It merely muddies the water a little. Nonetheless, I think the important problem you're having here is what you assume must be my emotional reactions to my beliefs about what is true. Your characterizations of "mechanistic", "behaviorist", "cling", "cramped", "caricature", "deterministic", "machine", and so forth suggests that somehow you believe that scientific realism is a terribly negative, despairing viewpoint.  It reminds me a little bit of a Christian arguing to an atheist that god "has to exist, because otherwise the world would be empty, random, and meaningless, and have no purpose". Such a person, stuck in his worldview of all joy and meaning coming from a 'god', can't conceive of a life without that notion being anything other than horrible.  But the negativity is in your mind, not mine. Is sex any less pleasurable because it's endorphins, and not love as a mystical state, that's making me feel good? Are my thoughts any less interesting and enlightening because they are being calculated by three pounds of fatty neural tissue, rather than a soul made of pure light? Is the sky any less blue? The grass any less green? Is the sun any less bright because it's a big ball of hydrogen fusion instead of the chariot of Helios?  So what if my impulses truly are deterministic? (Which I do not, and cannot, know for sure.) They're still *me*. Wringing your hands about it is like moping that "I'm being controlled by my brain!". Silly person, I *am* my brain.  You've subjected me to any number of iterations of the "Aw, c'mon, everybody knows that!" argument, but I lack the basic fear of a material universe, so I have no particular drive towards engaging in fuzzy thinking in order to reject one.  It doesn't "sadden" *me* at all that I live in a universe that is as it appears to be. In fact, it frees me from the pressure of having to reconcile baseless beliefs with contradictory evidence.
Brilliant, rancmeat. After September 11, Canada has deployed significantly in a country overrun with a repressive regime, the Taliban. Canada is actually getting work done, and getting results where they are needed -- the U.S. (at least, the part of the U.S. aligned with Dubya, mainly the mouth-breathing part) instead took the opportunity to try and turn Iraq into Texas. Not sure why you think Canada has anything to hide about Afghanistan. Canada's efforts there are under-recognized and under-reported, as has chronically been the case in recent history: http://beatles.ncf.ca/canada.html In case reading is too much an effort, here's a key fact from the link: "1% of the world's population [Canadians] has provided 10% of the world's peacekeeping forces." Why I am bothering replying to a -5 (and sinking) comment, I don't know. Ignorance is too tempting a target.
This guy is a terrific writer.
There are so many inaccuracies, half-truths, and weirdnesses here that I couldn't possibly deal with them all. And I'm sure other Redditors with more time than I will have a field day with them. I just want to point out this one: &gt;Bloggers across the Internet find this stunt funny and find the fact that the first responders didn’t get the joke equally hilarious. That could just as easily be phrased "Loads of people everywhere" find this stunt funny - or, honestly, it's not so much that lots of people find this funny, as that we're baffled by the astonishing overreaction. (These things have been there for 2 to 3 weeks, in 10 different cities... anyone who thinks this reaction was warranted needs to explain why places like Chicago, Atlanta, Seattle, Los Angeles and Philadelphia didn't go crazy and shut themselves down.) *People everywhere* are questioning the rationality of Boston's response... but when they're called "bloggers on the Internet", we don't immediately process them as "people with valid opinions", do we? 
There was an blog a few months back here about a guy that regularly flies without ID.  The airline always tries to insist that he has to show ID, but they can never show him which law requires it.  If you push, without swearing or acting in a way that lets them call security, they give up. But it's still wrong that they try to claim it's a law.
Have read 19. Enjoyed maybe half of these.
&gt; My point is that you would be in error (deluded) if you thought that by classifying things according to what you believe them to be, while it might mean you sleep easy at night because you 'know what is what' it doesn't mean you aren't deluded... So true.  However, I reciprocated your quote because it felt like a cheap shot to me when you flung it originally. &gt; But if you were a Christian, I guess you'd just automatically see Terrorist and that would be your sole indicator...an unfortunate mis-categorization... I think you're way off the mark here.  I'm not sure who brought terrorism into the picture, but the reaction against the hijab is not because of terrorist implications, but, as bangles said: &gt; it means she rejects much more important things than sex with me or with anyone else, things including gender equality, freedom of conscience and freedom of speech.
This video of the 2006 WSOBP is awesome. Why didnt they have things like this when I was in school? The 2006 Champion is Team France consisting of Jason Coben and Nicholas Velissaris both of Ann Arbor, MI. The best part: when Team France, winner of the $10,000 grand prize, slurringly say "We're going to go back and we're going to start our own business, baby."
I think he means that perspective changes the way you view the world. Opinions do not change reality, but sometimes, depending upon how much of it you see, reality can change opinions.
Now watch as asshats en masse up mod this one to the front page. *edit:* thanks tofocsend
huh? the guy is very wrong about one his rebuttals. the iphone does indeed have two models. as for the battery -- so far no one outside of apple knows what's going on inside the device. there very well could be two batteries.
Bullet trains are awesome. Seriously though, I like the ad, but I'm voting this down anyway, because I want more "real" news (no offense, spike) on reddit.
Well Karma certainly likes him.
To Whom This May Concern:  The following review I am providing is regarding my organization's usage and outcome of the allthecode product :  Recently,a sales angent representing themselves as AllTheCode approached my organization to evaluate and comment on the product on the basis of a 30-day risk-free trial of their pre-release edition of allthecode.  After a relatively quick (could have been a little bit faster), I received a allthecode pre-release appliance from allthecode and the initial setup of the machine was relatively simple, simply connect the power, ethernet cable to my switch and connect to the appliance to configure a few settings (such as integration with Visual Studio Team Foundation Server).  The initial setup ran overnight, "parsing my project files," as the status panel mentioned before I left my office.  After a relatively quick walkthrough with my team of developers on how to use the product inside of Visual Studio 2005, my developers went back to work with very little interruptions (a minor hiccup occured part way through the evaluation, however this was caused by an improper binding on the source code control system on our side).  At the end of the day, I asked a few developers what they thought of the software and they commented that it was quite useful.  One mentioned that within Visual Studio they could use a search bar that allthecode places in Visual Studio to quickly look for references within the source code.  Yet another developer told me that on numerous occasions that allthecode was able to guess (many of times correctly) that a function that implements similar capabilities already existed inside of the code and was able to place a reference to the code, rather than having a developer writing needless code.  These features coupled with many minor, yet handy features at the end resulted in a overall developer producitivity increase, which resulted in our developers catching up to schedules (they were about 2 days behind when they first started using the product).   All in all, the product allthecode while it certainly is not as polished as other appliances I have used, has demonstrated a significant deal of technical sophistication.  Finally, for what it's worth the overall developer productivity in my software company was quite noticable (approximately a 15 percent developer productivity boost I reckon).   I would also like to mention that I have not experienced the allthecode website, so I cannot directly comment on the website, however if the technical sophistication of their appliance is present on the web edition of allthecode, then it should be quite clear that allthecode is right for your organization, as the appliance was clearly applicable to my development team. Sincerely, James Simpson  President  Straightway Technologies Inc.
I have a lg.philips lcd  LP141X8 (B1), I hope to be able to plug my LP141x8 into my desktop PC graphics card. Can I do this?
No, you're right, it's not. And that's the worst tragedy of all.  Because the Democrats supported the war. Oh, they didn't really believe in it. They didn't really believe all the crap they hearing. They knew they were being lied to, that the facts were being distorted.  But they didn't have the balls to say so. They didn't dare risk their precious political careers to fly in the face of the latest poll. The sad fact is that the truth no longer matters, only what you can persuade people of.  So here we are, left with a choice between two power cartels, the party of brains but no *cojones*, and the party of *cojones* but no brains. The best lack all conviction, while the worst are filled with passionate intensity.
I'm not normally a big fan of 'lol, windowz crash' humor, but I'll admit I bust out laughing when I saw that gag.
We need to get more links like this on Reddit IMO.  I had fun flaming him.
That's pretty damning, enough so that I went and read her speech.  I think the end that you left off is fairly important, though: &gt;So it is with conviction that I support this resolution as being in the best interests of our nation. A vote for it is not a vote to rush to war; it is a vote that puts awesome responsibility in the hands of our President and we say to him - use these powers wisely and as a last resort.
(Of course, *I* just left off this:  &gt;. . . use these powers wisely and as a last resort. And it is a vote that says clearly to Saddam Hussein - this is your last chance - disarm or be disarmed.  )
It was probably one of her [writer friends](http://www.betterthanyourboyfriend.com/living-with-courtney-love.htm) that wrote it.
Yellow, black and rectangular.
I support the silliness of this. But no, no one else should ever do this.
trying...
Maybe they could do a split with the Christ Punchers
Bah. The current Administration is the same pack of arrogant, power-hungry cretins they were in 2000. the only difference, the only reason everyone is rushing to assure us that they are not conservative, is that now, they are not popular.  Where were you when nine old, privileged political appointees 'elected' them? Their plans were clear all along, but did you say then that you were being 'deserted'? Or were you too busy chanting "suck it, libs" along with the rest of the "conservatives", like this was a football match and your team had just won?  I can't be sure, because I do not know you, if I were forced to guess, I'd opt for the latter.
The reason so many anti-authoritarian bands bash Christianity (I'm thinking mainly on punk, metal, and industrial strains of music here) is because Christianity is the dominant Western religion, and remains a powerful, hegemonic force. Do you get that?
As an American who's lived in two other countries for the last 5 years... As bad as these things are, there are truly great things about America--incredible ethnic diversity, some fantastic cultural elements and accomplishments (think Sesame Street and NASA and everything behind them), awesome natural beauty and expansive land--that help to make it harder to leave, and easier for good people to consider staying--or coming. Plus most social mechanisms and services are relatively quite good compared to many countries in the world (though not compared to the best countries): police, health, sanitation, education. You may be scoffing, but try living in non-top-tier countries for a while, as I have, and you might ache for America. Some countries, like Canada and those in Northern Europe and Oz/New Zealand, look better, granted, but leaving one of the world's fairly better off countries, where you already have family, friends, and loyalty/attachment, is not to be taken lightly.
This was a delightful headline.
I was wondering when America was going to get over their hardon for this liar.
"Man developed in Africa. He has not continued to do so there." --P.J. O'Rourke
I think this display is awesome, but you can't blame the police. Bombs are very often hidden in other objects. How the hell are they supposed to know what's on the other side before they examine it?
&gt; I guess that seems like a straw man argument to me. I think the general Western view is that Muslim females are dominated and sexually oppressed, if not repressed. The contradiction is between what the woman is coerced into doing by her culture and the naughty librarian under the surface. I think you're right. My only comment would be that we should be careful not to obscure the liberal and less repressed aspects (which I, optimistically, believe are growing in some places) of the culture behind our general views. &gt;I wonder (and perhaps rightly so, given the article's first comment concerning the sex manual) if the photo's subject is really contemplating sex with her husband and not how many drooling studs she could enslave just by donning that red number in the window. You could very well be right, she may be a hypocrite after all. :)
But one thing has evaded Apple for years, and it’s something that a large number of people would love to see come to fruition: the ability for Apple users to coexist in a Windows based workplace. There have admittedly been great advances, such as the addition of Samba compatibility for traversing filesystems, IP based printing, Active Directory integration and the simplification of networking in general, but there are still some large obstacles that prevent Apple from being a welcome presence in the corporate arena.
Yup.  *shakes head* I wish we had security people who could tell that something designed to be noticed and covered in blinky lights is probably not a bomb, and I wish our country wasn't so prone to instant extreme panic over nothing.
Say five Hail Marys and six Hello Dollys. Or drink five Bloody Marys and you won't remember.
I know what you mean. I'm not muslim, but I didn't look at the picture and see a contradiction.
Boston, the town that was terrorized by lite-brites.  I cannot wait until someone starts selling these kits.
&gt; A vote for it is not a vote to rush to war... Who conned her into thinking that? Bush again?
You're right, its not new -- but gross human rights violations deserve continued coverage, particularly for the short attention span of the current generation. In the same way that the devastation in New Orleans is old news, its still news, its still a mess. Just because the media teat is squirting new milk, doesn't make old news any less a crisis. Its remarkable, but unsurprising, how the West is tip-toeing around China and kissing its ass and looking the other way in exchange for cheap consumer goods and a chance to further tap into the largest and least commercially exploited population on earth. A worthy read (the full PDF is floating around still) is Jamyang Norbu's "Buying The Dragon's Teeth." There are plenty of consciencious Chinese that are opposed to the methods of the PRC, but most of them seem to end up in prison with no trial, and ripe for the harvesting. Most Chinese students are not even aware of the Tiananmen Square massacre even happened. Ironically, Rupert Murdoch, who has gained the most by securing exclusive rights to broadcast into China, owns FOX, whose hot (but in decline) property "The Simpsons" has openly criticized China, veiled in satire, for its human rights abuses: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Goo_Goo_Gai_Pan
Wow....this tool is amazing I wish governments would use this so politicians could understand what the scientists are telling them.
Yes, I couldn't agree more. It does seem slightly redundant, although it'd certainly help to put this code in context.
I wouldn't eat where the chef couldn't keep his dick in his pants. Gotta be some kinda health code violation..
Adult version of MySpace is predicting $100 million in sales for 2008.
Hasn't Python been in Maya for years?
criticism of this should be relegated to criticism of this wonderful future we all share... where everyone has the time to meet the person of our dreams and all is happy holiday marriage time.
No he is not.  He needs to back up his assertion with something other than mere assertion. For example he writes, "Cheney is an outlaw, a Rasputin, a tyrant, a liar, but there is no check to check him, no balance to balance him."  Um, what evidence is there of this?  Hearsay and innuendo?   The entire article is mere assertion.
A mere 19 for me.  An interesting list, but it immediately makes you wonder... how's it derived? Is $2 a column of vote counts? By whom? What qualifies for consideration?  Yes, I browsed the site a bit, didn't find any answers...  Pretty cool that Riddley Walker showed up, even at 99.  I thought I was the only person in the world who loves that book.
1) It is hard to take your business elswhere, because virtually all banks have these harsh fees. The entire profit structure of the banking industry seems dependent on it. If you actually read the 'competitive free market' link I posted, you will find that another requirement for a free market is low barriers to entry, which isn't true in the banking world.  2) The imposition of these fees is a cost to the consumer, but the necessary legwork to avoid these fees is another cost. The banks are exploiting (indeed, creating) an inefficiency to be able to charge high fees.  3) You seem to be supporting free markets from a purely ideological perspective, rather than the pragmatic one most economists would take. An economist would support the idea of an efficient invisible hand *provided certain conditions are met*. These conditions are enumerated in my linked article. 4) Incidentally, just before you posted reddit changed its TOS and required anyone whose login begins with 'run' to pay $10,000 per post for the privilege of using this fine service. Naturally, being careful to keep track of the terms before every use, you read the TOS and will pay the posting fee, and then perhaps take your business elsewhere. 
It was like that with Reagan too - everyone joked about him being the airhead, but suddenly he was the plotting mastermind of the intricate Iran-Contra deal...
Wait, *I* am the first person to mention Jason Leopold in a comment?  I'm astonished no-one has brought up the Rove indictment article yet.
I meant more for his prose than his argument (which I didn't find any fault with, but it's fine if you do)
it means she's out of your league, chump. Like the title says.
No, they voted to give authorization for use of force if needed.  Force was used, but it arguably wasn't needed.
who is kevin rose, and why are you bothering to write detailed (if inaccurate) articles denouncing his (I assume its a male) claims?  insecure much? 
Submit your query to google groups, not here.
I wasn't speaking of you in particular.  Just of assuming to know what is in someone else's head in general. It pains me to see comments such as "unambiguously a political statement" in reference to a religious choice (a choice most people never realize they have any say over) when "political statement" is simply one persons perspective.  It pains me to think of one part of society not liking the other simply because of an inane, irrelevant ideas like the Holy Trinity, not believing in a personal god, or who inherited the religious guidance of Islam after the Prophets death... Appearances shouldn't matter.  Religion shouldn't matter.  I don't hold it against the Christians I know if they believe in a personal god...what difference does it make to me?  I don't hold it against my sister either: who am I to judge another human?  What difference does it make to me?  Why should I care if I see some European on the Mayan Rivera without a bikini top on ?  Why should I care if I see a Muslim women locally with a hijab on?  None of it makes any difference, unless you are bringing to the table a wide set of preconceived notions on how other people SHOULD be.  I try my hardest to not allow 'what I expect' to cloud what I see with my eyes...to not do so would be unfair to those around me! As long as people are decent, tolerant and honest...I don't care what strange things they do in their spare time... I purposefully and unfairly painted a wide brush (automatically see Terrorist) simply to contrast how perception combined with a  preconceived notion guide thoughts.  Around my neck of the woods, I'm sure most people automatically equate a hijab with terrorism...it is simply their initial knee jerk reaction, as it is all they are exposed to via their preferred news source.  --- It is easy to say that a hijab is synonymous with gender inequality, lack of freedom, etc etc when your opinions are formed by a small subset of reality.  Gender inequality is slowly coming to an end here in the United States, after a hundred years of progress.  Gender inequality will always hold on in provincial and small-minded people.  You can't simply say that all Muslims are 'this' or all Muslims are 'that'.  Consider Christianity: you have such a wide range of faiths and so many individual takes on such a wide range of topics within that broad title.  Likewise, it is the same with Islam...the local Islam practiced by the conservatives and radicals in Afghanistan compared to the local Islam practiced in the United States, for example... My brother-in-law and sister (aside from her 'political statement' of a hijab) are more liberal and open-minded than probably a good 75% of the those who live here in [Pennsyltucky](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=Pennsyltucky) I'm not saying that any one person or idea crystallizes the idea of Islam.  I AM saying that calling a woman of Western decent a political aberration or provincial because she is wearing a hijab is a very intolerant and closed-minded position to take.  Its very easy to say "I know what this is", but it is very hard to actually know what it is.  I don't pretend to know, I'm just trying to fight intolerance and closed-mindedness...I'm always amazed at how much hostility there is towards Islam here at reddit.  Strange that I'm not amazed at the hostility towards Christianity, I didn't' realize I had a double standard until just now... Fine, if I'm allowed to privately belittle and heap scorn upon Christians in general by chuckling at Russle's Teapot, you are allowed to think that Muslim women of Western decent are political dissidents.  I'm done defending Islam.
good
No, because we're afraid if we snap out of it, we might embolden the enemy.
It's a plot by Jeb Bush to make sure there's at least one state that appears more moronic than Texas.
You both make good points, and surely there is a happy medium. Upvotes for all!
Great for those starting out on a dating site.
Well it did encourage me, and several of my friends. Excellent ad, very well received around here.
good article. I have known Amazon more from here
Agreed.  I'd like everyone to take a second to remember this moment.
&gt;Daddy: God doesn't want us to perform blood transfusions. &gt;Little Girl: But daddy, doesn't that mean that I would have died? &gt;Daddy: Yes. &gt;LG: But, I don't understand. Why? &gt;D: Because we are told that it is wrong in the bible. This is God's will. &gt;LG: ...but this rule means that I should be dead! I don't understand why...it just doesn't make sense. &gt;D: Shut up and ring the doorbell. Stupid, fucking religous retards.
That's a big problem, and I'm surprised how he didn't realize how important it is. It's not hard to fix. He needs to add a hash method to his types, which can either use object identity for mutable structures (lists, etc.,) or a cached value for immutable.
No one would ever argue that Steve Jobs is a wonderful person. But he does get other people to make damn snazzy computers and peripherals.
Did you see how close that thing came to his mouth?
Bob Dole's funnier than Franken.
What happened to Arar was a crime even without the rendition to Syria. And it continues to be so... AG Gonzales won't remove him or his family from the no-fly list. What has he done? Where is the due process and presumption of innocence? And if he's that dangerous, why not ask the Canadians to arrest him and charge him? Because he hasn't done anything. We've been told that all this extra security we're asked to put up with is in the name of finding terrorists. If you ask me, if you're looking for a needle in haystack, the answer is not to make the haystack bigger. Still, you seem pretty closed-minded, and still have no sympathy for this guy. It's just fine with you if the apparatus of the state is used to harass the free movement of a citizen whose sole conviction is an anti-Vietnam draft board sit-in dating to 1970. Yeah, this guy is potential al-Quaeda... let's make his life miserable EVERY TIME he travels.
From the article: "Critics have charged that AMCs will reward companies for mediocre vaccines and could detract from research funding. Even supporters acknowledge that under an AMC, industry would still face significant uncertainty about the number of doses they could expect to sell." If this works as well as prior plans to use non-market mechanisms to force corporations to pursue unprofitable policies, then basically a few corporations will make a lot of money of sub-par work and people in developing countries will be screwed, just in a different way than before. It seems like their meddling with the suppliers in order to stabilize demand for certain drugs, but the plan doesn't even stabilize demand.  Also in regards to the "US doesn't have the funds to help" thing, didn't the US start some plan to give around $15 billion to other health programs? "The $15 billion in funding for this initiative virtually triples the U.S. commitment to international AIDS assistance. Funding will begin with $2 billion in FY04, and ramp up thereafter. The $15 billion includes $1 billion for the Global Fund to Fight HIV/AIDS, Tuberculosis, and Malaria, conditioned on the Fund showing results." http://www.whitehouse.gov/news/releases/2003/01/20030129-1.html (I admit, hardly the least biased source)
When you do it all day, you can cut it down to 30 secs a piece.
I thought this kind of crap only happened in anime. :p
&gt; What is with all the whiny conservatives on here? There's a surprising number. But conservative is such a bullshit word for them. The phrase "right-wing-wacko" is more accurate. They're the ones that would rationalize anything Bush does, would even go as far as supporting a "foreigner cleansing program", etc.
Yeah, it's wishful thinking.
Because one size does not fit all. What I got from the article was that the woman who wrote it, already dealing with the loss of her husband, slowly and painfully in a burn unit, had also to deal with people who presumed to inject their religious beliefs about death, that she did not share.
&gt; Stop being so selfish.   I.e., "Do what *I* think you should do, not what you think you should do."   
I've heard that some of the Plextor drives are good, but I haven't personally tried them.
The broken window fallacy isn't necessarily a fallacy if you add two competing economies. Let's say country A has a monopoly on making glass. Let's say country B has a big window. If country A pays someone from country C a little to break the window in country B, then country B has to buy a window from country A. This would result in the world being worse off, but country A is relatively better off. I'm not saying the Iraq war is profitable, but it could be with halfway decent leadership. I think the British had a lot of profitable wars back in the day.
That's a cool rocket!
Sad to say, Hollywood has zero political clout, and the entertainment industry will just have to suffer along with everyone else. You don't expect them to get special treatment, do you?
Is that F in LouF for FuckingMoron, or for Fuckwad?
Know u dont dood.  Spelings overated.  Specially 4 programerrs.  IDEz rool! 
Don't confuse length for quality! A verbose title that says nothing at all serves no purpose either.
radrik? cal_01......
Prose and style are just as important as factual information. Everyone knows that Cheney is horrible; there is no need to supply more evidence. Hence, the article is brilliant because he articulates the public opinion so well.
Yeah it's pretty funny how people do that to prove their argument.
um? excuse me? it doesn't matter which database won. un-tuned databases aren't a very useful basis on measure performance. Least not in anything resembling  the real world.  --vat
this ones hilarious, kids learning the facts of sex young
Around the world Sony fanboys are turning read in the face after reading this.
man this is a classic photo.... this one will crack you up!
So if a girl gets raped, she has no choice but to support the child, even if she or her family is incapable of supporting it?
http://www.krugle.com/ is better.
My question is... was there a sticker or tag or phone number on those devices? Wouldn't that have helped to identify this as a marketing move aka "hoax" BEFORE the entire city was slowed down.  Wasn't this a big waste of time(money) because it wasn't a confirmed hoax until MANY HOURS after these discoveries?
&gt; that simply discourages content creators from bothering to create content in the first place. Artists will continue to create because they are artists.  They are born that way, and the will die that way.  It is up to us as a society to place a value on art and music, and to support those that are creating it.
&gt;"If I was some 10 or 15-year-old who played a lot of games," said DiDio, "I'm going to want a state of the art sound card and video card. &gt;Senior citizens often want those same cards to zip pictures of their grandchildren back and forth to friends, she added. Because only state of the art sound and video cards can handle pictures of grandchildren. Right...
Mandate of the Indigenous Peoples NAHUACALLI  Embassy of the Indigenous Peoples  December 1, 2006    Mandate of the Indigenous Peoples  http://www.tonatierra.org/mandate.html    “We have arrived at the moment in history of the world where a dialogue among civilizations and world views is necessary at the global level.  Only so will the hope for Peace and Dignity with justice for our human society survive, established through a sustainable ecological relationship to the Mother Earth itself as foundation.  This is the Mandate of the Indigenous Peoples; it supersedes that of the United Nations system; it is an expression of the jurisprudence of indigenous international law: it is the path of Tradition and Liberation.”  The UN Declaration on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples represents over twenty years of international advocacy and collective diplomacy by Indigenous Peoples of the entire world.  The Declaration provides long overdue acknowledgment of the human rights of the millions Indigenous Peoples globally, covering a vast array of issues including fundamental freedoms, identity, lands and territories, resources, and discrimination, among other significant concerns essential for the survival and Human Rights of Indigenous Peoples and our Nations.  The events of the past week in the 3rd Committee have produced a sense of international outrage, betrayal and injustice that is echoed across the world by the Indigenous Caucus.  The current situation is a travesty and a violation of the rule of International Law which must be corrected in order to establish reciprocity based on principles of justice with the government states of the United Nations system.  The text of the declaration came after 24 years of talks between government states, Indigenous Peoples and non-governmental organizations.  The action at the UN on November 28th, 2006 assures continued discrimination, violation of our rights as Indigenous Peoples and the vulnerability of our nations to pogroms of genocide. The failure to recognize our right of self-determination by the Third Committee of the UN General Assembly is an unacceptable criminal lack of protection and promotion of the fundamental principle of our basic human rights.  We join our Indigenous brothers and sisters around the world in strong solidarity in speaking out against the lack of respect, and failure of the UN member states to find common cause with the struggle for human rights of Indigenous Peoples.   We further call upon the leadership of the Indigenous Nations, Pueblos and organizations of our continent Abya Yala to move towards opening other avenues of engagement with the United Nations system, specifically as was called for upon the convening of the Continental Indigenous Summit Abya Yala of Mar de Plata, Argentina 2005:    ISSUE:   GOVERNMENT STATES  The United Nations and the Organization of American States - OAS ACTION:  To implement the initiatives of DECOLONIZATION, at the dimension of our continent Abya Yala, obligated the procedures under international law indicated by resolutions of the United Nations General Assembly 1514 and 1541, among others.   http://www.cumbrecontinentalindigena.org Finally we call upon our Indigenous Nations of our continent Abya Yala to extend and activate traditional initiatives of engagement with the Confederacies of the Indigenous Peoples of the world independently of the United Nations system, to the purpose of fulfilling our sacred obligations as caretakers of TONANTZIN, our Sacred Mother Earth.  Signed,  Tlahtokan Nahuacalli  Alianza Indigena Sin Fronteras  Seventh Generation Fund  TONATIERRA    ### Links: Indigenous Peoples Caucus  http://www.ipcaucus.net/ United States opposes declaration on Native rights  http://www.indiancountry.com/content.cfm?id=1096414049   The Geography of Self Determination  http://www.tonatierra.org/nauacalli-022706.html    NAHUACALLI: Mandate of the Indigenous Peoples   
Lisp macros without dynamic typing are completely pointless:  1. Lisp macros are more than just parse-tree transformations 2. Dynamic typing is inherently required to achive even remotely the elegance, simplicity and power of Lisp macros 
Great.  This is *exactly* what the Dems need.  I was elated when we won in November, and now it seems we're going to do our best to give it right back.
Direct ripoff of [this](http://monkeyfilter.com/link.php/13663) MonkeyFilter post.
Isn't the general solution just to deref HTTP 301s before storing the URL?
9.50 Min. take the time to watch. Better than porn.
I thought there was a charcater limit! Sheesh.
This is true for the conservative wing of the catholics only.  That's by far not the majority.   A lot of the doctrine is written in a way that makes it impossible for a layman to comprehend it literally.  It's complicated theological writing.  The beauty of that is: While the doctrine (the letters on the paper) never changes, our understanding of it (the interpretation) may change over time.  It's a little cheating: This way you can say "we have the truth" without being bound too strict to truths from a long, long time ago. (Admittedly, on some specific topics (like abortion, sexuality, etc.) the catholic church _is_ overall conservative.) 
for a short synopsis, see  http://www.sbs.com.au/whatson/index.php3?id=1397
&gt;"OMG I CANT STAND 5 SECONDS IN THE DARK!!" It's an OCD thing. The delay between hitting the switch and the light turning on can disrupt some people's thinking.
Sadly, I've read that many of these monasteries are soon to be flooded out by the making of the Three Gorges Dam, some are being moved but many are just going to be drowned by progress.
I'm not going to mention the common L word here, but really, high level languages have had compilers for a _long_ time.
Ah, now I got it!
anyone who's been paying attention knows who Cheney is and what he's been doing.  You seem to think that the author should fall all over himself to bring you irrefutable proof of his opinions...  It's not going to happen like that so you can keep to your cosy little bubble until reality intrudes.   
Bush conned a huge number of the American people by running a non-stop fear campaign, that I call "Operation: Mushroom Cloud". He lied and distorted the truth repeatedly, linked Iraq with 9/11, etc. Once he had a large percentage of the population freaking out he was able to cow the democrats into authorizing him to attack Iraq, as a way of *threatening* Saddam in a real way. Bush grabbed the gun and shot Iraq in the head almost instantly. The Democrats really fucked up by not being loud enough in their opposition to Bush's methods. History will not be kind to them, but history is going to roast Bush as a near-hitler. 
I thought this was going to have some code that would make doing this somehow easier than it otherwise would be. You could use any other fast, expressive GC language here instead and still get the benefits the article is talking about.
I was just showing this link to my friend, and he came up w/ this solution, which is smaller, faster and easier to read -&gt;  p1() -&gt;   lists:sum(  [ X || X &lt;-      lists:seq(1,10),       ((X rem 3) == 0)    orelse ((X rem 5) == 0) ]    ).  
前から話題になってる閉鎖ってやつですか？
I have a Plextor SCSI.
Damn. That guy can rant like a motherfucker. Sorry; some of it must have rubbed off.
its a very exiting thing
Great site !
I agree wholeheartedly. If they had implemented macros with regular haskell syntax then _that_ would be something special...
...wait for it...
Cryptonomicon, which is one of the 20 best books i've ever read, is not scifi
No invasion needed with the North American Union. Google it. Bush Sr. started it with NAFTA. Jr. is trying to push it through.
So have I...
It is so awesome that people take this seriously enough to downvote.
HELLO
The alarm clock article was good...But u left out  the vintage,time proven equipment.
I don't understand the havoc it caused. The devices don't look like bombs or anything else dangerous. Anybody who thinks terrorists would make bombs with glowing figures to draw attention to them sucks at thinking.
Obligatorily: [OI comonad](http://www.haskell.org/hawiki/CoMonad)!
About 5-years ago I replaced all screw-in incandescent bulbs with compact fluorescent type, except in my bedroom.  I tried them there, but they vastly increased my insomnia, presumably because of the high-frequency flicker.   I'd be willing to try the new LED bulbs that are supposed to be coming out in the future for use in my bedroom, but I haven't seen them yet, and being frugal, I'd have to wait until they've achieved a certain mass-production scale up so price is reduced. Guess it's time to go buy a pallet of incandescent bulbs. Idiot legislators.  Maybe they're not idiots.  Maybe they want more people to go to doctors for sleeping pill prescriptions and to collect more medical info on people.
damn! best. woz-write-up. ever.
&gt;You mean, besides really not doing anything useful? Have you any idea what context the code is taken in?  It could be in a nuclear reactor's codebase for all you know, deciding the number of rods to be pulled.
like the devilish taste wasnt reason enough
&gt;It seems clear that there actually is a substantial tax on bad code There's no tax until it's  (a) been identified as as bottleneck, which unless the above is being called 100m times I suspect it never will be  (b) the alternative code has been benchmarked and the decrease in readability justified by the increase in speed
&gt;Using a screenful of code when one line will do is a waste. No it's not!  If it means that somebody picking up the code base in 5 years can understand it totally within 1 second.  If you're really worried about it, use your editor to insert a fold/#region/whatever-your-editor-offers.  I've been using those since the mid 90s, and I'm sure they were around before that. &gt;Next time you spell it out for us, spell NOT correctly. Ah, spelling nazi!  I wish you worked for me, because then I could fire you.
"Running" is past tense and implies the fear campaign is over. It continues today, with non-stop rhetoric that kindles the fear of terrorism.
oh wow
You deny Canada's actions in Afghanistan are anti-terrorist?   You don't find an article critical of China while making no mention of the US or the Bush administration seriously lacking in credibility?
Metafilter's a great site.  But it's not reddit, and I agree with you that succinct titles are best for this site. What bothers me most are posts with grammatical and spelling errors, let alone abuse of punctuation, parentheses, brackets, etc.  There's a place for that, and it's called Digg.  And Digg fucking sucks!
So what we need are giant forks.
&gt; Who conned her into thinking that? Her own ambition and careful parsing of poll data. 
The best ads don't use logic, they use association. Look at beer and cigarette ads.
FTA: This sign was posted outside Central Baptist Church on George St in Sydney’s CBD (’Downtown’ for those north of the Equator), Australia today. Similar signs have also appeared outside other churches of mixed denominations, and the underlying message is that “Jesus Loves Osama, but does not approve of him.”.
With his new powers, Chavez will be capable of enacting sweeping changes to government institutions, local elections, finance and taxes, banking, national defence, and the energy field as he attempts to establish a socialist system.
Yay for population decline! Like Bogey said, the problem with people, is there's too many of 'em.
&gt; Say something critical about Microsoft and Windows and no one bats an eyelash.  That's not true at all.  I've never been accosted for using windows by a linux user or a mac user in every day life.  But I've been openly harassed for using linux and / or OSX by windows users.  And windows users regularly hang out at linux-only sites that I frequent (or have frequented) just to harass the locals and try to dissuade people from trying to pick up linux skills.   The real difference is, since 90% of computer users are on MS-something, it's widely regarded as socially acceptable to be a condescending MS zealot.  That's the natural order.  You have to apologize for *not* using windows in most contexts, anything else is regarded as combative. &gt; But write anything even faintly judgmental about the Macintosh and in comes a flood of hate mail from Mac users. This in the very first paragraph of his article.  Nothing like a little controversy to get attention.
linux is just not a serious OS for doing real work, sure it's good if you want to use it as a server that sits in the corner and serve out some files or run some apps but you can't do any real productive work on it, it's still too much of a toy OS compared with Windows which is excellent as a server, buisness and consumer OS
this doesn't suck.
&gt; He needs to back up his assertion with something other than mere assertion. If we've learned only one thing from this administration, it's that policy is shaped by forceful assertion, not fact or argument. 
So - you call me an Idiot - how nice of you. Is it specific for left wing people to be so nice? Or it is just you? &gt; It has never been proven that Iran is attempting to build a nuclear bomb Iran is building a nuclear bomb. The centrifuges number and quality of Uranium they are trying to achieve is not needed for nuclear reactor. It is not question of politics it is physics. (You will not believe me because it does not suit your picture of life - but I don't care about you...)   For example president of France also thinks Iran is building the Nuclear weapon: &gt; CBNNews.com -- PARIS (AP) -- French President Jacques Chirac said in an interview with three newspapers that Iran's possession of a nuclear bomb wouldn't be "very dangerous" and that if it used the weapon on Israel, Tehran would be immediately "razed." I just do not agree this his position on retaliation. Because I do not believe that anybody will care. When(and not "if") Iran will have nuclear bomb they will use it. Yes I believe it. Because nobody will retaliate Iran. US? Thousands of peace protesters will say - it over now - let us try to talk with Iran. Europe? Europe will not care at all.   Now if it is convenient to you - the democratic leader is OK (Ahamadeen) if it is not convenient - the democratic leader is bad (Bush) - how sweet... Ahmadeen is true democratic leader - you are right - I wish the country you live in will have such a leader, your deserve it...   
please post again for me.i need download it.  thank you very much!!!!
No you can't:  `public final class URL [...]`
And what will be consequences? Europe will say - shame on you. UN will take one more resolution and will say Iran should not use nuclear weapon, Arab countries will celebrate the holiday of Israel destruction...
So where's the problem?
&gt; The best lack all conviction, while the worst are filled with passionate intensity. [Things fall apart, the center cannot hold.](http://www.yeatsvision.com/SecondNotes.html) He was writing at the conclusion of the first  world war, I fear sometimes that we are in the early stages of another such conflagration. 
I love how ads like these are totally normal in most european countries, yet manage to shock some people in the USA. I thought it was rather funny, can't really find anything wrong with it. It's just a kid playing with a dildo, if you're reading all kinds of fucked up pedosexual innuendo's in here than all I can say is; 'in soviet russia, problem is you!'.
I think Africa would flourish if it were left the hell alone, it is true. Of course, Africa would have to leave the rest of the world alone, too. Which the, and I use the term loosely and with prejudice, "first world" cannot allow. [The electronics industry](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coltan), [the arms industry](http://observer.guardian.co.uk/worldview/story/0,,644096,00.html) and [the oil industry](http://www.worldnetdaily.com/news/article.asp?ARTICLE_ID=47611) are three industries that have massive vested interests in Africa. There are numerous others, I'm sure. Resources are the reason that [China is stalking Africa](http://www.guardian.co.uk/china/story/0,,1936309,00.html). So to say "Leave it the hell alone" is too simplistic, and fails to note the role of the supposed "benefactors" and the massive returns they get from Africa.
My sentiments, also. When was I last glued to a statistical presentation?
I think you're missing what the author is trying to say: &gt; code authors worth their salt generally state very early and loudly in their documentation whether the library is thread-safe or not. Thread safety is not an on-off condition, though. &gt; you would put customer 123's data in a database [...] Which doesn't help when you need to concurrently access other resources too, which is what the author was talking about.  (Besides, even if you're just using the database, you can still get deadlocks.)
"I thought it meant they were either..." They were?  The use of the singular they pisses me off in any context, but in this context the subject is unambiguously female, so why bother with the convoluted singular use of a plural. "I thought it meant she was either..." 
Not bad for homemade.
no comment
...and they said homeopathic medicine didn't do anything! ;)
flickr also saves thumb files with minimal compression, that's very good!  many others photo sites save their storage space, but flickr is optimized for quality
&gt; Not true... advances are otherwise known as "Loans" and in any other context, would actually be considered as "Loan-sharking..." You've been misinformed - advances are only recoverable from music sales. They are basically underwritten by the labels and a completely different thing from a personal loan you might get at a bank. The major label business model is based on a small percentage of records becoming hits with huge fixed costs for each record - that's simply how it works and why looking at a single case on either side of the equation gives a misleading picture. &gt; It's all in the distribution.... some Indie Labels have ethics and sell a lot of records  I don't think there is a correlation between ethics and sales generally or we wouldn't be discussing this. There are distributors for most levels of sales, but in the last few years sales for very many small indies have gone below a certain threshold. This means they can't cover the fixed costs of producing the smallest viable runs (1k) and the distributors have given up trying with these kinds of labels. The irony is that these small outfits have turned out to be most susceptible to p2p while the majors can weather a dent in sales. &gt; As far as most musicians wanting the major deal, well, most serious musicians that I know live the rock and roll lifestyle, and by the time they have developed something listenable, they are so destitute that they will take anything... ethics or not.... Makes no sense. These musicians start out wanting the major deal and as I said, if the labels were offering poor value, they'd be get undercut.
&gt; Can you see how that would make impeachment difficult? Not at all. They may guilty of being temporarily pussified. But losing one's nerve when you're being intentionally frightened by your President is not so unforgivable. He claimed to know about all sorts of scary things no one else is privy to, which all turned out to be bullshit.   Bush has almost certainly committed *illegal* and *unconstitutional* acts while in office (i.e. stuff that Jefferson would kick his ass for). It's only correct that he be held to account -- impeached. 
どっかで昔読んだことはあったけど。  Economist (1)〜(4)で笑った。
One of reasons "Africans" (a catch-all term for a huge number of cultures, by the way, which differ remarkably, just like "white folks" have many different cultures) are opposed to contraception is the good work done by the Roman Catholic church and their stance on contraception. So perhaps it'd be better if we got western superstition **out** of Africa, rather than going in and telling Africans, yet again, why they need to be "civilized".
Excellent point. I've known many conservatives who are smart, reasonable people, and who don't whine every time things don't go exactly the way they want. Even right-wing-wacko might be too kind. How about just "babies"?
What a silly article. It's pretty obvious that swapping with XOR is slower than with a temporary variable (on my system,  almost twice as slow. Code at bottom of this post). XOR swaps are used on resource-constrained systems, where using sizeof(int) memory is actually a big deal.  #define real_swap(a, b) { int c = a; a = b; b = c; }   #define xor_swap(a, b) a ^= b; b ^= a; a ^= b;   int main() {  unsigned int ii, jj;     /* WARNING: Less-than signs are changed for Reddit! Fix them in your editor! */  for (ii = 0; ii ≺ 100000u; ii++) {    for (jj = 0; jj ≺ 10000u; jj++) {   /*real_swap(ii, jj);*/   /*real_swap(ii, jj);*/   xor_swap(ii, jj);   xor_swap(ii, jj);     }     }  return 0;   }
one for sale on ebay: http://cgi.ebay.com/ws/eBayISAPI.dll?ViewItem&amp;rd=1&amp;item=130075321405
So, if you see a women without a headscarf, it doesn't mean she wants sex. It means she wants sex with YOU?
Not really. Especially when the 5th result on a google images search for her name is her standing there topless with a cigarette looking like a cheap whore. So much for safe search :P. And when you turn filtering off 7 of the results on the first page are nudity.
Actual link: [here](http://groups.google.com/group/comp.lang.scheme/msg/18d1d6d4f84e70e3).  Great read.
Falun Gong has been claiming human rights abuse for years. They usually stand somewhere in China town holding a poster with a dozen blurry pictures of mutilated human being on it and claim those to be victims of Chinese government. Thing with them is that they are kind of nutty in the religious sense. I will need a second opinion before I read their posters seriously.
There's got to be a better page of firefox shortcuts than this.  Many who read reddit probably know most of these in the first place.
The smell of 1 million liberals creaming their pants is quite nauseating. Go watch Jon Stewart make jokes, and let the adults handle our great country
Some guy's opinion about sports.
Google JPEG artefacts...
What a smug asshole P.J. O'Rourke must be. "People go to Africa and confirm what they already have in their heads and so they fail to see what is there in front of them. This is what people have come to expect. It's not viewed as a serious continent. It's a place of strange, bizarre and illogical things, where people don't do what common sense demands." Chinua Achebe
When you say this is a culture, which of the thousands of African cultures in particular do you mean?
C-C-C-C-COMBO BREAKER
I don't know him but of course you're certainly going to get the occasional success story. What I'm saying is that there is no longer even a marginal business model and the very rare enthusiast who manages to scratch enough to pay the mortgage and feed the kids (sustainably) will be the exception that proves the rule.
Zing!
Erm… doesn't the NYT count as “the news”?
I'm *very* curious as to what he'd think of Scott Kurtz's attempts to get syndicated, on his own terms, using his established strip and fanbase as leverage.
What if by being kind to somebody you make them think it is part of some vast intergalatic conspiracy to get him to be nice to other people.  So, instead of being nice to he next person he meets, he decides to not be influenced by your little mind games, and instead shots the next person in the head, and then goes a rape spree?  Won't somebody please think of the children?
個人的にすごくうれしい。  いままでちょこちょこやってたのがサクサクに。  "あとで読む"ばりに使いまくってしまいそうでコワイ。
&gt; The lawmakers, all loyal to Chavez after opposition parties boycotted the 2005 congressional elections, … Oops!
I don't think the relative nuttiness of Falungong is an issue. I think they're a little out-there too. The harvesting of organs from prisoners in China is the problem, and that is known be happening regardless of what groups are the victims. The PRC is known for it's horrific human rights record for a number of good reasons.
They do. And they have a responsibility to do the right thing now.
&gt;Might as well just switch off the teleprompters and have him ad lib something about French existentialism. Wasn't Bush supposed to have read Albert Camus' [L'Etranger](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Stranger_%28novel%29) ("The Stranger" or "The Outsider") over the summer holiday last year? I wondered at the time whether it was just an attempt to make him look a bit smarter, and I don't know that his religious supporters would be so keen on him if they knew what existentialism was about.
wow that is totally unexpected... RIP to a wonderful lady
The damn government shouldn't have interfered in what is clearly a case of natural selection.
&gt; *Oops, you already did that with the drug laws. It's actually 100%. They made [DMT](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dimethyltryptamine) illegal.
For once I agree with the government. Religion (in my book) is a conscious choice which these babies are not able to make. Their parents should not be allowed to let the babies suffer or die because of the parent's own religious beliefs. The babies should be allowed to grow up to make their own choices not have their parent's choice thrust upon them.
Getting Bush reigned in if not out of the way, would be a great result. He's tearing up our democracy.
I dunno, I've seen more than a few obnoxious, overly aggressive drunk guys going to town on a Golden Tee. Also:  &gt;2. Red Bull, Malibu, and Pineapple Juice - When I drink this it’s like I’m relaxing on a beach or something, except I’ve got so much energy I want to fight a shark. Awesome. 
Cause everythig needs to be a secret... or we'd know how much they really fucked everything up... and not just the impreachable things we know of currently.  If we knew the real story, we'd rip each and every one of them limb from limb and kill their children to eliminate the bad genes from he gene-pool.
Isn't that what life is all about. Joining the ride as you head toward the inevitable oblivion.
Türkiye'nin en büyük şarkı sözü arşivi
Dugg for the dig at digg!
Religion kills.
No, I don't think they were trying to cause her pain. But they did--as did the woman who told her that if she didn't pray for her husband, he would die. To broaden the scope of the discussion, there have been a lot of discussion about atheism in recent years. My feeling is that atheists are starting to get a little annoyed with always being the one who is told to "get over it" when it comes to saying under God in the pledge, for example, or that atheists can't be patriots, or that they have no morals, or in this case, that by not praying, she killed her husband, and oh, now that he's dead, let me comfort you with a fairy tale. The thanks atheists get for sitting there in silence is that if you ever "come out" as atheist, you'll get uncomfortable stares, unwanted proselytizing, and in some parts of country, open hostility. Oh, and forget trying to run for public office. So I don't think it is too much to ask for people to be aware that not everyone is comforted by phrases like "he's in a better place."
Oops, I guess it was 23 seconds.  Still significantly more than an incandescent.  From your article: " As it turns out, the actual rule for fluorescent lights is about 23 seconds."
Unless they special-cased it, it also breaks the first  and most fundamental rule: `x.equals(x)` might or  [might not](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Round_robin_DNS) be true. 
According to the tests mythbusters did that is bogus PR.  " As it turns out, the actual rule for fluorescent lights is about 23 seconds."  Also, if the performance and lifespan aren't effected by on/off switching, why do they want you to leave them on for five minutes?  Sounds like double-speak to me.
Perhaps it's due to its long term exposure.
I know nothing about the Canadian constitution, but I imagine this violates some part of it that relates to freedom of religion.   Anyone have any insights? edit:typo
Please look up the term "viral marketing." Everyone here just watched an advertisement and we all came away knowing it was an ad for Ikea. The ad doesn't need to blatantly come out and say "buy furniture," it simply needs to spread like wildfire. Repeat the mantra: Ikea, Ikea, Ikea. Lather, rinse, repeat. I'm pretty sure it's working just fine whether you understand that or not.  Crap, I've just come to the realization that either you are an idiot, or you are part of the next generation... dare I coin the phrase, viral marketing 2.0: the followup? A devious marketing plan to distract us all from obvious viral marketing. Making us zig when we should zag. Duping us into believing... Nah, I think I'll stick with my first instinct.
kbarrett works for flickr, it's a hidden flickr ad
"This is a culture that believes unprotected sex with a virgin cures AIDS." you write like this would be a belief through the whole of africa when in fact it was (I don't think it is any more) a local superstition in a part of a country (probably Uganda). you need  to understand that in the worst countries of africa, aids is reportedly up to 50%. some of these millions of sick people probably believe in voodo or whatever, but they sure aren't the majority. Mode me down for vague facts and no links to suport it (just like you should vote down exobyte) but consider the chance that its true and don't believe everything you hear. 
Nor did they mention that CFLs are only highly efficient when left on for a long time. They don't work in high traffic areas such as washrooms (in-rush currents, on-time, etc cut down on efficiency by a lot). edit: In anticipation for the obvious mythbusters replies, I'm not saying that CFLs are worthless. Rather, I'm saying that they're not -that- good in certain applications. Plus, as an Engineer, I don't really trust a mainstream television show for debunking as their tests aren't exactly vigorous.
They are getting ready to introduce draft. They need to protect against potential dodgers of military/civil duty service.
Note to self: Stop drinking uric acid.
Politics got a little less funny today.
This really is a bad bill and shouldn't pass.   The problem with fluorescents is that they contain mercury vapor which is an ecological nightmare waiting to happen if everyone starts to use them. On the other hand, LED technology is just starting to mature enough where it can take over for incandescents without the ecological problems of fluorescents.  So while the general idea is good (get away from incandescents), the timing is just a little off.   Give LED technology a year or two to mature then come back to the table. 
Upvoted.
No. The fluorescents don't allow me to, I'm not sure of the best word, unwind(?) or relax(?), before turning off the light to sleep.  Perhaps 2-3 hours before turning off the lights for the night I'll turn off the fluorescent and turn on the incandescent (yes, I also have fluorescent in the bedroom). Because fluorescents make light with plasma between electrodes, the frequency of the power supply's or ballast's output seems transmitted in the light.   Maybe we'll just have to go back to candle light.
Oh, I agree. But I prefer Old Style and finesse. Kevin, if you're listening, I'm coming for your high score, man. There are all manner of drunk Golden Tee fans out there. Let's not stereotype.
&gt; Sounds like the poster wants to compare Strings. No. URLs are not Strings, and should not be treated as such.
You want to hear this in monotone?
I don't know about that. Surely stories like this damage the credibility of the authorities? - Even though the media source is doing its best to try to make it look like the PR company's fault, any person of normal intelligence can see the authorities over-reacted.
Two words, Dred Scott.
Your trolling is starting to slip in quality.
Brilliant! I see what you did there.
I think they should have left Darwin sort them out.
this ad has a good capacity of market penetration
The *Table Of Countries Showing Drive Direction* further down the page is pretty useful, and looks accurate.
I was being sarcastic ;-) I guess it just didn't come across the wire that clearly. I guess it's a sign of the times, while many advertising campaigns feel like semiotic terrorism, this is the first time we've seen an ad campaign being treated as a terrorist act. 
&gt;I think I'm allowed to dismiss what he says for reasons of character. Could you clarify this for me? Not sure what you mean by character. His character and if so based on what? The character of his crimes? Your own character?
And better roads / vehicles. The Africans I worked with in Ghana said people worried more about dying in an RTA on the next journey than from AIDS in 10 years time. And these were people who sometimes ate grass because they had no proper food. 
they said 6000 rupies -- less than 150 dollars a month. You know, maybe a retirement community of expatriate geeks wouldn't be out of the question...
They went bankrupt because those stupid kids wanted their money back.
In this adress there is a full report about the investigation - http://organharvestinvestigation.net/  Scary stuff, indeed. Moreover, those are not prisoners jailed for some crime...they just want to practice their belief. 
How do you propose stopping parents teaching their kids? And where do you draw the line? As a society we rely on parents to nurture and guide their children on their way to adulthood. Every generation is in some way shaped by the previous. This is a part of life, otherwise we all hand our offspring over to Big Brother following birth for 'standardized, sanitized and approved' upbringing. If the occasional nutbag teaching their kids about some imaginary friend in the sky is the tradeoff, I'm prepared to make that concession. The alternative is unthinkable.
Yes. Art will still get made. The RIAA has brainwashed people into thinking that artists only create if they can make a gazillion dollars, and only the gazillion dollar art is worth looking at.   Besides, people will always find ways to make money no matter what the distribution technology.  Does anyone truly doubt this?
China will soon pass the US as the dominant imperialist super power. Greed knows no boundaries.
"There's a place for that, and it's called Metafilter" Damn it!  Don't you know how much it hurts to shoot beer out one's nostrils? Your Hell will be blue.
So who's pro-life/pro-choice now?  Deliciously ironic. Also, if the parents' appeal succeeds... how do you undo the "wrong?"  Kill the babies?
Maybe muslim men should start waring headscarfs as well?
they should've all learnt morse code.   and translated &lt;dot&gt; to &lt;slow blink&gt; and &lt;dash&gt; to &lt;really slow blink&gt;.   it's probably be be more efficient then their current method.    --vat
No, I would say that the important part of trolling is trying to start a fight. I don't think that's what hopeseekr is up to. I get the impression that s/he seems to want people to see it the way s/he does rather than argue for the sake of it. S/he's just a tad too enthusiastic about it.
This article is pretty poor writing for BBC.  It completely misses the fact that a good deal  of Mexicans are still in fact corn farmers. It  was the 1994 NAFTA deal that allowed cheap corn  imports from the U.S. which nearly destroyed the  farming industry and led to massive protests.  I will be traveling down there this summer, and  I expect that I will see a lot of farmers who  are happy about the increase in corn prices.
Because recharging stations would need a warehouse to store spent batteries until they could be recharged. Think of how many cars a gas station services in 12 hours. That is how many batteries they would have to store and service along with a surplus to act as a buffer. In fact it would be more than what a gas station services because no way would a battery last as long as a full tank of gas.
Don't worry, I'm sure mommy wet-wiped it clean.
Cause the "adults" have done such a bang-up job so far.
good.  probably do more to highlight energy conservation than most other initiatives.  GHG's are a big issue, if we can't even do the little things, how can i trust that the big stuff is going to even get started?
Mommy? How prejudiced of you.
Apache still serves out 60% of the web - thanks [netcraft](http://news.netcraft.com/archives/2007/01/05/january_2007_web_server_survey.html) - and in the HPC / scientific computing sphere it seems that Windows is not a serious OS for doing real work.  So it depends on your definition of real work.
Great lectures, even if he's wrong.  That's definitely in line with what I remember, though I got it in a less hardcore form (I'm still only about halfway through this hardcore stuff).  I think his books have the condensed, layman-friendly version of these ideas.
Wanna know something even more ridiculous? I'm moderately familiar with most variations and interpretations of the christian bible, and never once have I seen anything resembling a prohibition on blood transfusions. It may be a big piece of fictional bullshit, but it certainly isn't a piece of fictional bullshit that advocates murdering your newborns rather than allowing them to borrow some RBCs from a willing donor. So, not only is religion stupid, but its followers make it look enlightened by comparison.
[Mark Pilgrim](http://diveintomark.org/archives/2006/06/26/essentials-2006) disagrees with you.
Superb
Fantastic chandeliers from top Italian maker - managed to track them down at Oliver Bonas.
Name an indie that's gone out of business due to file-sharing. In fact, many of the indie labels recently announced a partnership called Merlin which they intend to use to force their way into the major distribution channels. Oh, and much of their music is offered free of DRM, which they feel is a better bang for their marketing buck.
I'm sorry, I'm having problems with my hearing aid. Could you speak up, dear?
I suppose they'll remove the blood with the help of a vampire of some sort... perhaps FenPhen will volunteer his services, as he admittedly finds this whole tragedy "delicious".   
Well, you could (if it's true) prove it. According to wikipedia, e^pi is transcendental by the Gelfond-Schneider theorem, but it's not known if e^pi - pi is transcendental.
Acts 15:28,29
&gt; Only perfect spellers need apply. Mantra of a tech support guy I used to work with back in the day. He regularly had to explain to people that both their username and their password needed to be exactly right or the computer would not let them go online... Bad spelling and bad grammar will give people the impression that you are stupid or careless or both.   
[So that's where navel oranges come from](http://i5.tinypic.com/2zivnkw.jpg)
Can someone explain how an annual growth of $US798.1bn to $US13,487.2bn is achieved by an annual growth of 3.4%? Those raw figures give a growth of 6.29% which seems too high for actual growth. I know that there are some inflation issues in there, but inflation of 3ish% doesn't square those figures.
I don't. I would guess that they mean that vibrators are superfluous if you've got a man in the house, or that a Real Man(tm) would build something to store the vibrator in in stead of buying something at ikea. Neither of those theories make much sense to me.
Who cares? Why should they get special sympathy? Hundreds of millions of people in EVERY other industry in the WORLD since the BEGINNING OF TIME have been laid off when a new technology obsoleted their job. It is mind boggling that Big Media has managed to brainwash people into actually agonizing over this absurd argument.
Because a demogrant does the job better. Demogrant + flat tax, with the size of the demogrant a product of the collected taxes. The smart way to do progressive taxation.
Paris accueille cette semaine deux conférences déterminantes sur l'environnement. Le groupe d'experts intergouvernemental sur l'évolution du climat (Giec) se réunit pour valider un rapport  alarmant: la température augmenterait de 3 degrés dans le siècle.  Lire l'intégralité de l'enquête...
aight
It works like this. The bible, if ever it was anything worth looking to for guidance, was written thousands of years ago (and this goes even if it was written by god himself) for people who lived in a primitive proto-civilization. It doesn't say anything, one way or the other, about blood transfusions. Blood transfusions are harmless to the donor, and save lives, something that christians supposedly support. Ethically, it is a 100% wholesome thing to do. However, the losers that believe this shit need to make themselves feel important. And more to the point, they need to prove that you *need* the bible to do the right thing, when generally common sense is enough to figure out something like "don't kill your baby". So they find some obtuse passage that mentions drinking blood or something. Now mind you, drinking blood like other people drink milk or orange juice probably is wrong. Doesn't matter if it's from a person, or only from an animal. Of course, their superstitions are against it because some rival religion probably did something like that, not because you shouldn't be doing morbid shit like that. Ok though, even if they have the right idea for the wrong reason, I could let it slide. However, they need to not agree with me, the heathen atheist on the fast track to hell. And they need to preach to the congregation, else people start thinking for themselves. So, some dumbass "interprets" the word "drink" to mean "ingest in any physical way". Now, if you're a preacher up on the pulpit with your greasy slicked-back hair, chances are you don't need a blood transfusion (well, not right this moment anyway, but if you're one of these, thinking ahead isn't one of your strong points). So what does it matter if you interpret some obtuse passage as meaning transfusions are verboten? From a logical standpoint, it's pretty fucking retarded. Is it the volume that makes it bad (1 pint or so)? Because, for instance, suppose you are in an car accident, someone gets cut up, and blood gets splattered on you... do you go to hell for getting some in your mucus membranes? Maybe that's ok, but what if you get cut too, and the other person's blood splatters into your cut? Now, they didn't have cars back then, when the apostles were out running around raping sheep, but they did fight some nasty wars. And have alot of other ways to get hurt. So something like this was at least possible, mind you. And God didn't find a single damned reason to tell them they'd go to hell if they let this happen. He might be an imaginary friend, but on this one issue, he was an imaginary friend with just a little fucking sense. So, only thing I can figure, is that it must be the volume of blood. Let's hope when Gragtar the swordsmen gets his head chopped off, that you don't get hit in the face with arterial spurts, eh? But it's somehow even **worse** than that. Did you know that these whackjobs won't even allow you to have your own blood drawn and stored so it can be used for a scheduled surgery? That's right, even if it was originally your blood, somehow it can't be put back in. Now, if a JW's guts are hanging out, the surgeon can sew their tripe back up into their abdomen, no big deal. But if the tissue is red and liquid, you're fucked. Apparently, people who are religious have absolutely no sense of what was poetry, what was exaggeration, what was fraud, what might still make sense, and what just can't possibly apply to the modern world anymore. And even when they claim they do, they pull absurd shit like this out of their ass.
I draw the line at babies for a start.
skim through the comments. priceless.
An excellent basic intro to planning for the future
lambda calculus の訳は「ラムダ計算」
Try buying a decent CFL - the ones in my house come on instantaneously, have a warm yellow glow like an incandescent, are near full brightness by the time I look up from the light switch, and don't have a noticeable flicker...and I've made up the price difference between a CFL and an incandescent bulb simply because the CFLs last for a very long time, without even considering the power bill saving.
&gt; Windows which is excellent as a server, buisness (sic) and consumer OS If that was a joke, it was both funny and well executed.
&gt;You are to abstain from food sacrificed to idols, from blood, from the meat of strangled animals and from sexual immorality. You will do well to avoid these things. Farewell. This is an english translation, likely of a latin translation of maybe greek of hebrew (OT, right?). But, as a man who actually has a reading comprehension above the 4th grade level, this seems pretty clear to me. (Whether or not it applies to the modern world at all is debatable, of course). Don't eat food offered to the pagan gods. **Don't drink/eat blood.** Don't eat animals that were strangled. And don't be  sexually immoral (Though that last one could mean anything almost, considering what the world was really like back then). The important one is that second one. Know how I know it means "eat and/or drink" ? It's called context. Fucking goddamned context. Abstain doesn't mean "don't open a vein and pour another person's histocompatible blood into it in an attempt to save your own life, even with the permission of the donor". It couldn't have back then, and it doesn't now. People were allowed to do lots of things with blood back then, for instance, wash it off of a body for burial, or to care for someone that was injured. So don't give me any of that "in the broadest possible meaning" bullshit.
Mi piace molto la tua definizione ...
lo voglio !
Please, send this in to the author, that is much needed!
I don't know why you are being modded down, it's just your opinion and well...ok, I agree with you :) The stories in Hyperion were so good, and the breakup just makes the book very easy to read. I've read the book five times or so. I never get tired of Kassad's escape from the Ousters on the medical ship and the stories of Rachel and Siri get me every time. As for Fall, I liked it but it was definitely not as good. It was a page-turner for me though. I always liked the "evil AI" story bit (not a big Matrix or Terminator fan but I'm glad someone in Hollywood liked it too) and I thought the book was a good wrap-up after the setup in Hyperion.
Let's hope it isn't too late for the poor girl. A few harsh words does not merit being pushed to a nervous breakdown.
Back in 2000-2002, her columns reminded me that there was a lot more in Texas than Shrub.
All of his problems essentially stem from trying to interface Linux with closed, proprietary software (aka Microsoft products). The exchange server connection in Evolution is at best, a hack... basically a screen scraper using the Web Outlook interface. But what else can you do when your server is designed to only be compatible with Outlook. Try using Windows in a real unix network environment, and you'll quickly realize which is the toy OS.
Hello! We want to exchange links with you. Please add our link (dating site) to your site. URL  http://www.bigdatingdirectory.com Description  Directory of dating links for all taste. Find dating resources for singles, swingers, love for free.  Reciprocal link  http://www.bigdatingdirectory.com/link_exchange.php  E-mail:  admin@bigdatingdirectory.com Thank you!   Reagrds bigdatingdirectory.com support team!  If you will want to change link with us, please will notify us! 
Trying to open Visio documents, or communicating over Windows Messenger, you quickly realize that MS designs most things that way. ;)
I discovered him a few years ago. Great author. His books are hard to find in the States, though, at least the older ones. Last time I searched for Consider Phlebas on Amazon it was only available used. I've been hearing about him more and more, and I think he'll just be getting more attention as time goes by. On a related note, I can't find *any* good sci-fi where I live now in Latvia, but one day I stumbled across The Algebraist by Banks and I didn't even know it existed. It was like stepping in shit, looking at the bottom of your shoe and finding a piece of gold stuck there. Or something like that.
what about the cars ...?
Privet
what is this?  I thought you were going to bring some real knowledge... don't do this again.  Street art has come alot further than this, uh... quickie?
&gt;I have a 14-year-old niece. She used to want to be a rock star. Before that she wanted to be an actress. As of six months ago, what do you think she wants to be when she grows up? What's the glamorous, emancipating career of choice? Of course, she wants to be a Web designer. It's such a glamorous business! Yeah sure, working in IT its such a glamorous business.
What to ask a wedding photographer
k2.net
Have you ever heard of the Seattle Windshield Pitting Epidemic of 1954? Well, if you have not, you are about to find out how human beings can create a collective clusterf*#k of idiocy.
This is an oldie but a goodie. She didn't write this, she gave a speech on it and it's been written down by a variety of journalists. She is weird but this was certainly a sober moment for her. Although it's hard to cry for a star whose talents are rivaled by hundreds of thousands of others but are foisted into fame by a massive marketing department, it is unfair to what degree the RIAA's businesses can now own someone. It needs to be stepped back several notches - copyright shouldn't last 70 years, paying someone to sing an album shouldn't be equivalent to paying someone to shovel a ditch (you own the ditch afterwards, but should you really own every facet of the music - doesn't the singer have SOME right to it - like to sing it freely afterwards?). People hungry for work handed a contract with a lot of money attached will generally say yes. You would too. The law needs to prevent abusive contracts in the first place.
He's my number one favourite political writer.  Gets better and better.  Enhances my own vitriol which had been slipping lately.  I needed that, AnnotatedRantDude! Thank you.
Seriously: What is it with muslims and Australians?  Over the past few weeks I have read atleast 9 articles that bring the two to a head.  I am not muslim or Australian, and I cannot get this understood.  Let them wash their feet in their own washroom.  Appreciate the security of your non-footed sink.  Problem solved.
I read a lot of them, but maybe less than half. I was surprised at some of the entries and omitions. The Time Ships was interesting, I recently read that book and it was enjoyable in that you don't expect much from it when you pick it up, and then find you can't put it down.   I'm still struggling with Perdido Street Station. The world is fascinating and all, but the plot kind of drags in places and China's writing style can grate sometimes. He is fond of descriptive sentences such as "the stygian liquid whorled around him like some cast-off lover".   Oh, and while I'm on steam punk, The Difference Engine is the most boring book in existence. It currently holds the dubious position on my window sill next to the toilet, the no-man's land where my half-read books go to die. If someone has made it all the way through and can tell me if the finish is worth it, please let me know.
ok lng
it looks like Jim Sampson's neck has been twisted 180 degrees in [that photo.](http://www.networkperformancedaily.com/images/jimsampson.jpg)
I'd have my president lie about BJ rather than playing 'modern dictator behind the best democratic country in the world' any day of the week. 
Looks like a good approach to demonstrating the language. Waiting impatiently for the next part!
Careful, you're about to tread on people's rationalization of why they voted Bush/Cheney back in 2004.
This is the most audacious and absurd of Republican arguments. Some of us opposed Bush the whole time. But Congress, and many in the nation, gave Bush their trust. He broke that trust, by selling falsehoods that he had ultimate control and responsibility for and leading us into a disaster. Now he and the Republicans direct blame toward everybody else?? The utter gall is unbelievable. When a sleazy used car salesman says, "Ha, too bad I sold you a lemon, it's your fault for buying it", it's understandable because HE'S A SLEAZY USED CAR SALESMAN.
&gt;Try to stay away from the ad hominem Well, your post didn't--you called him a fanboy just because his technical views don't match yours. I apologize if I came across as offensive, though. &gt;in replying to my accusation about Joel getting rich on people's ignorance, you say that I think I am the shit and am therefore annoying, completely missing my point about Joel. (Aside: I don't think I'm the shit, I didn't say I was the shit, and I didn't imply it, either.) Do you have a comment about "reading about people who provide inferior stuff getting rich on people's ignorance"? I missed the point indeed, because I'm not really acquianted with his software, so I didn't get your implied point--that it's inferior, and that he's become rich off of it based on people's ignorance. What I did get, however, was the explicit point that Microsoft products are generally inferior and that people buy them out of ignorance, making Microsoft rich. I completely disagree with this statement, and I happen to find many Microsoft products unparalleled by rivals *for my needs and priorities*. &gt;However, he still is, as far as I know, a big proponent of using Microsoft products, like VBscript and IIS. Which are famous among the competent programming community for being inferior to their open-source counterparts. Furthermore, he repeats (elsewhere) Microsoft's FUD about how open-source projects can't innovate, they can only copycat, etc, etc. First, he doesn't make mention of this in this article, and thus the article has no mention of the so-called fanboyism. Yet you said it was nauseating to read such fanboysim in the article. Second, don't you think calling him a fanboy for preferring IIS/VBScript instead of criticizing his technical argument is ad hominem?
i don't understand given the state of the country... do democrats not vote?
Let's accept your context argument for a minute. Say this instruction is effectively saying "Don't eat/drink blood".  What about this example. Your doctor says: Stop drinking alcohol.  Does he also have to say: "oh and don't take it intraveinously", or is that implied. The method of conception is irrelevant. Abstain means abstain.
Bad headline for 2 reasons: 1. It's 'lose' and 'addresses', not 'loose' and 'addresseses'  2. The article says nothing about users losing their gmail addresses anyway.
While he deserves the flak you're both giving him he changed his tune about just over a year ago I think. Everything I've read of his since, including this article, then has been quite good IMHO.
There's nine and a half minutes of my life I'm never getting back...
There was a supreme court case a while back, about a similar family in Oregon, where it was decided that the state's interest in protecting children's welfare supercedes parents' rights to practice their wacky religion.  I don't recall the details, but it would be interesting to look up.
i don't know. as "clean" as the language might be, their webpage is [a dirty shitbagel](http://clean.cs.ru.nl/About_Clean/Clean_Language_Features/clean_language_features.html). it's good to see a purely functional language with strong numerical performance (something GHC simply isn't optimized for).
Your right, I should check my spelling before I sumbit :( Anyway, norwegian news reports that @gmail.com addresses will  be lost:    http://www.digi.no/php/art.php?id=367328
And yet he asks not to be reddit'd :)
As opposed to other continents which are enlightened and free of any mysticisms... or have believes which are benign and justified. We are not more blessed with reason then any other culture.  We simply have better education, more stable governments, less corruption, and a more industrialized economy. Toughen rape penalties and allow abortion. Get those women career jobs and contraceptives.
Compton's New Sensation
Customer: Hey, you said this was going to work and it doesn't. You lied to me. Weasely salesman: That's not gonna fly. Too bad, sucka!
And here is the article cited by norwegian news:   http://arstechnica.com/news.ars/post/20070131-8741.html
I think the book you are thinking of is *The Diving Bell and the Butterfly*, by Jean-Dominique Bauby (the former editor of *Elle* magazine). And as NitsujTPU notes, he wasn't in a coma, he blinked his book out while locked-in.
Let's kick their asses and get the whole thing over with. Lets have elections, lets have another president asap. btw, im not american nor in favour of war.
Because electricity is very cheap and it's in our best interest to make it even cheaper. Cheap electricity is good for the economy. Especially California's - heard of Silicon Valley? Taxing the initial purchase is the right thing to do. Many consumers buy items on a simple price tag basis - why do you think WalMart has so many customers? If incandescents are taxed enough to be even 50% more expensive than CFL's, the change to CFL will be significant. Banning them is just stupid. Consumer choice is good, and the truth is incandescents are still superior to CFL's in some ways: Some have a range of hearing high enough to hear the CFL ring, some are such light conneisseurs that they can differentiate between a very good CFL "natural" light and an incandescent. I can't - most can't - but some can. Let them keep buying their lights, but make them pay for the environmental harm. And let the tax money be used to build Renewable Energy sources.
&gt; If somebody lies to you and you act on that lie it's not your fault. Well truth is, yes it is. Not your sole fault, but it's still partially your fault. However _**it does not prevent you from accepting and correcting your mistakes, and holding the one who lied to you in the first place accountable for his lies**_
To be honest I found this navigation confusing. I much prefer hyperbolic trees.
I generally agree with the article. My last XP install was still tight and snappy, and so far, the only value-add to Vista for me is ... aesthetics. Its a refreshing update to the old Windows look, but its not revolutionary, and in some cases -- a little distracting. There's not that much in the way of eye candy, but either way it runs no slower than my XP install. The complaints about the Control Panel and networking are legitimate. Some typical settings are hard to find, and lesser-used ones needlessly in your face. Finding where to put in my wireless settings was difficult -- despite my network broadcasting its SSID and being selectable, there's no obvious path to "pick the network, select the protocol, enter the key." Not much more to say yet, other than, its the Next Windows, and it's Better Looking. I suppose I would be underwhelmed if I had bought into the hype. I was hoping for a more streamlined and simple approach, however, but, if anything, its gone the other way for the sake of candy coating.
NEWS 01.02.2007
Amazing insight to the human condition from observing highly socialized natural exhibitons.  Science-1 and God-1.  positive sum competition?
Wasn't the Iraq invasion exactly as illegal? These guys HAVE to be impeached before they kill us all.  This is NOT an alarmist, crazy statement; I long for the days when it Would Have Been.
&gt; From a logical standpoint, it's pretty fucking retarded. Is it the volume that makes it bad (1 pint or so)? Because, for instance, suppose you are in an car accident, someone gets cut up, and blood gets splattered on you... do you go to hell for getting some in your mucus membranes? That's utter tripe. It's quite clear [0] that it's the _intent_ that matters.  Do you willingly take the blood, or did you do everything reasonable to avoid it.  Trying to discuss volumes, and accidents just makes it all the more difficult to rationally discuss the issue. [0] And I say this as an athiest who thinks that Jehova Witness's are utterly nuts on this issue.  But a bad argument is bad, whether I agree with where it ends up or not.
I think the article misses a trick. In an ideal world I'd specify my data in a relational way and all the extra guff would be generated for me. Hints about relationships (a la Rails belongs\_to, has\_many etc.) and the basic structure should be enough. Trees and DAGs are the bane of the Relational model. Makes me wonder if something based on algebraic datatypes, maps, and folds would work better... IMO most of SQLs crap (especially from a language design perspective) was sorted out by XQuery.
There's always going to be these cargo-culting "programmers" taking bits and pieces of broken code off "script" sites and knows-enough-to-be-dangerous tutorials. Sure they're very loud and annoying, but it's nothing to worry about. Us Perl fans owe the PHP/Rails guys a huge debt of gratitude for taking them. There should be an Open Source fund for whatever language community has to deal with these people, the way public schools get additional funding for special education programs. 
Constitution? 'It's just a goddamned piece of paper'. http://www.gnn.tv/threads/10799/Bush_on_the_Constitution_It_s_just_a_goddamned_piece_of_paper
At a late-night meeting tonight at Columbia University, a body of students representing several organizations, including World Can't Wait, voted 17-5 in favor of a strike against the war on February 15th. Many of the specifics are yet to be worked out. There should be an article about it in the Columbia Spectator, Thursday's edition–  http://www.columbiaspectator.com/.
&gt; What about this example. Your doctor says: Stop drinking alcohol. &gt; Does he also have to say: "oh and don't take it intraveinously", or is that implied. The method of conception is irrelevant. &gt; Abstain means abstain. Wrong, here again context comes into play, the doc' tells you to stop drinking alcohol because having alcohol in your bloodstream is hurting you (fucking up your liver and stuff), so "stop drinking alcohol". Context tells us that in your stupid example the doc' means that any way of having foreign ethanol in your bloodstream should be abstained from. The bible's quote, on the other hand, refers to abstention from pagan rituals, which at the time included (and some still include) drinking the blood of animals in a physical sense (not injecting it into your veins). The bible talks about the act of _ingesting_ blood for religious reasons/rituals, not about about the act of getting blood into your own bloodstream (be it your own or someone else's). But thanks for your posts, you wonderfully show redditers how incompatible religion and clear thinking are.
yes, but haskell is so NOW!
where do you morons come from? It is a fact that very few people within the beltway didnt know this plame worked for CIA. This woman was not a spy. She assigned her husband, a lunatic Bush hater,to a job to see if Iraq was trying to buy nuke materials in Africa. People within the administration could not figure out why Joe would say Iraq wasnt trying to buy nuke materials,when in his cia report he said they were.  Bush had made some mistakes not the least of was purging the cia,fbi,and state dept beauracracies of political enemies who are hell bent on destroying the US
&gt; And where do you draw the line? I draw the line between "crazy parents who endanger their child's lives and health be them physical or moral" and "parents who don't endanger their child's physical or moral live and health".
The two things most Redditors seem to hate opposed to each other: religion and government. It's a hard choice to make, isn't it? 
&gt; I think they should have left Darwin sort them out.  s/Darwin/Natural Selection/ Darwin doesn't sort anything, esp. since he's been dead for the last 120 years or so.
it's a direct link you smartass
DOGS NAME
So what? Should we give a fuck? &gt; Hay guy, my religion tells me to randomly slaughter human newborns, you can't jail me or prevent me from doing it cause it'd go against my freedom of religion! Would you let that guy split newborns in half and bathe in their blood, invoking freedom of religion?
There is absolutely nothing wrong with that ad. It's clever and raises a laugh. Spot on.
Come on V. You generally write better than this.
As your posts continue to show how incompatible a discussion in a reddit forum is with civility and respect.
er... how about: "Who needs a man when you have a vibrator?"
I Think you are right, but The BC government is arguing that the baby's right to live should trumps the parents freedom of religion. I whole heartedly agree. 
Yeah, population decline, what a fucking tragedy. Obviously what we want is population expansion like they have in the Central African Republic for instance, in fact why don't we move there, nice population expansion must be good. Let's go there and have a wonderful life. 
HAPPY NEWS FOR XP USERS!!!!!!!
I'll upgrade when i get a new 1500 € computer and none of the games i play now will run on nothing but Vista's DX10. Untill then... btw: im no pro gamer, only sunday clashes of PES6 with friends and some BF2-ing every once in a while. My development machine is running Ubuntu EDGY and wouldnt even consider changing it :)
Back in the late 80s all the lazy functional programming researchers set aside their toy languages to work on Haskell, the new, free and open source language standard, all except the Clean guys. In the end, Haskell is popular because it was free, and had a large core of researchers kicking it along. Clean had a small base and was non-free. Languages live and die on the strength of social issues: communities, licenses, and random disruptive events. Also, uniquness types are harder than monads ;-) Also 2, Clean's Dynamic type is really cool (it supports polymorphic dynamics).
How slow is the ruby code and why, surely there's something less heavy-weight than bloated ActiveRecord for Ruby. Can you do this with a little shell script and some fast C-based XML parsing programs? How about Perl/LibXML2? Sounds like someone is just trying to be haskewll. I think that's fine, but it seems lame to be in denial about it. Come out of the closet you Haskell-fanboy, don't worry, it's 2007!
It's not fair.  One reason many try to charge/sue them for being a monopoly. But not being fair doesn't make it any less true.  For a very large segment of the business desktop market Linux is not usable.  This is, as you point out, due to MS products and not Linux. Hardly anybody bitches about how MS Word won't open Open Office documents properly.
Oui c'est pas mal. Dans les deux dernières entreprises où j'ai travaillé, c'était déjà interdit de facto, parce que les dirigeants ne fument pas eux-même. :) Ca sera surtout bien dans les cafés je trouve. Parfois on a l'impression de manger du charbon avec toute la fumée ambiante...
I missed every new post between 1- 4:32 am.  great game.
What little I have studied the language, it seems to be extremely cool functional language. Even when I'm not great fan of functional programming, it still has many new ideas and features you can learn from. I almost feel compelled to try it out. The consept of *uniqueness typing* is really neat. If object, an array for example, has only one reference to it, function that has that reference can modify it without breaking functional abstraction.  Another cool feature is it's take on *dynamic typing* kind of thing Dynamics. You can load code and data runtime.
You are right, the difference is that the people involve in the German side will probably end up resigning. People in Germany actually give a shit about the rule of law (well, about Rechtstaat anyway).   
Did ANYONE get a recording of Fox News' coverage of this? It was absolutely precious how clueless they were about it. Rough quote: "BOMBS DISCOVERED IN BOSTON" - banner on the screen - then: "The suspicious devices have been determined to be not bombs but rather depictions of cartoon characters found on the Cartoon Network. They are friends with the Aqua Teen Hunger Force, composed of a vanilla shake, a pack of fries, and a meatball - food one eats when smoking the illegal drug marijuana, although they do not admit that on the show. The character depicted here claims to have 5000 dimensions, and enjoys taking illicit drugs. His god is an Indian cyborg." The reporter said it all with a dead serious face, as if he had just reported a rape. Then - after showing the image of Ignignokt for over an hour with his pixelated middle finger up - somebody finally figured it out and blurred the middle finger! It's going on YouTube if I can get it. Same username as here.
Quick history lesson: * [U.S. government lied to justify the Iraq war](http://www.alternet.org/story/16274/) * [US-led invasion of Iraq was an illegal act that contravened the UN charter](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3661134.stm) * [Abuse and torture of Iraqis by U.S. troops](http://www.antiwar.com/news/?articleid=8560) * [About 90 percent of Iraqis feel the situation in the country was better before the U.S.-led invasion than it is today](http://www.upi.com/InternationalIntelligence/view.php?StoryID=20061229-101021-1168r) * [655,000 Iraqis have died as a result of the U.S. invasion, more deadly than Saddam](http://www.informationclearinghouse.info/article15316.htm) 
You are right, but it's not Zen.
I have alot more respect for courtney love after reading this article.
I see new nfs comming - NFS Baghdad
This will probably be so heavily redacted it will be worthless.
doing it with any kind of camera is idiocy
Not one book by Ray Bradbury?
via  http://blog.laubach.at/smalltalk/blogView?showComments=true&amp;entry=3347782296
Trees and DAGs are especially simple in the relational model:  Simply use a relation like "graph(parent-node, child-node)". If you want to use this as tree, add a constraint that every child-node has to have exactly one parent-node in this relation. 
symbian ftw
YHBT YHL HAND
Exactly. It's a stalling technique. They'll trickle things out slowly to temper Congress.
Devils advocate time  1. What are the practical consequnces of ignoring this belief? If we make people undergo care will they be ostrocised from their community/family? Even if they are not will other people with those beliefs refuse to undergo treatment? "I think i will not go to the doctor with this broken leg incase they make me take blood". What overall will this decision do to the JW community?  2. We stop certain medical procedures all the time, why do we get to choose which ones?. Brain implants,stem cell research are not easily investigated because of our moral views.   Not swapping blood makes sense from a community health point of view. HIV and Hep c epidemics are largely the fault of swapping blood. It might seem cruel but we should consider the overall effect of these beliefs and of ignoring them.  http://liveatthewitchtrials.blogeasy.com/article.view.run?articleID=330526
Indeed it is. Still, it would've been a much better idea to post the actual link on reddit, rather than the blog post.
or she's just having a bad hair day..
Análisis musical y poético de Unravel.
Er...how about: *Someone has to know how to change the batteries!*
He's comparing RAID5 on XServe RAID device to S3. That's hardly the cheapest route you can go. Just because he knows how to build a great photo site doesn't mean he's a storage expert. He could probably beat S3 considerably by using a [distributed file system](http://danga.com/mogilefs) and true commodity disks. Besides the technical aspects, I would never want to out-source such a critical component of my site to some huge and unmovable company's beta product. Who knows if Amazon will decide to cancel the project when some new random VP takes over that department. 
Never under estimate something with staying power measured in mAh.
&gt; Free software and open source software programmers are not allowed to benefit from commercial/closed-source/slave software because they can't look at the code. So to spite them, the GPL institutes a "no touch" policy of its own... fair enough.  The problem is that this hits more liberal, non-GPL open-source software just as hard:  while the GPL is benefits from the latter, it doesn't allow the reverse to happen. &gt; So why would we allow commercial/closed-source/slave software to benefit from GPL code? Because what's good for your users is also good for you.  Consider some prominent examples of open-source software with proprietary off-shoots (and the companies behind them):  * FreeBSD:  Mac OS X (Apple), Interjet (IBM/Whistle), many other/embedded systems (Juniper, Wind River, BSDi)  * PostgreSQL:  Mammoth PostgreSQL (Command Prompt Inc.), EnterpriseDB, Bizgrez  * Python, Lua:  too many major products and games to list What these examples all have in common is: 1. Far from threatening the open-source projects in question, these companies have been (and are) a major boon to them, providing source code, employing developers, funding events, sponsoring infrastructure and publicity, and so on.  They do this not out of some altruistic whim, but because it's in their own best interest to tend to and improve the technology they depend on.  2. With the GPL's intervention, none of these would be possible;  the open-source projects would be poorer as a result.
What fear's that...  ...being sodomized by a chrome-plated, mechanized dildo?
I believe Google's Sketchup has an embedded Ruby interpreter.
Je pense que je vais voter pour lui, moi aussi.  Ce que dit Sarkozy fait plaisir, mais il promet tout et son contraire. Et Ségolène, j'ai l'impression que son avis sur les choses, c'est souvent celui de son auditoire. :-/
Merely "nice"? We demand "amazing"!
[Roger Penrose and Stuart Hameroff's theory of Orchestrated Objective Reduction](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Orch-OR)
&gt; How slow is the ruby code and why, surely there's something less heavy-weight than bloated ActiveRecord for Ruby. Python?  (SQLAlchemy?)
bof...
I use Linux as a desktop at work (on a standard windows domain) - All the problems that are mentioned in the article about Exchange / Evolution are true - Not that I'm bothered because I use Thunderbird which seems to work fine. As regards the rest of "Windows" functionallity - I can log onto my networked "my docs" folder automatically and use 99.9% of the office docs I need to - The 0.1% being our expenses form (which doesn't work properly in genuine MS Office either) - The main problem I have is the speed at which Openoffice opens... easiest measured in weeks...
cool
CONDENSED VERSION: I am such a geek that for ten years I have used non-Windows (presumably just Linux) only intermittently -- each time long enough to determine that I can't function in my MSOffice-bound office.  My story has a title connected to the story only by the words "ten", "years", "linux", and "workplace".  I easily confuse my workplace with 'enterprise', and 'the workplace'.
Yes, Ihave heard from several users that stated that it does.
Mine too.  Its top speed is sixty minutes per hour.
Not the "best video ever" but very well done. Must've taken a lot of work.
ちょっとタイトルよくなかった。  非同期のグラフなんかが出てくるとわかり易いです。
I agree. A vibrator isn't a substitute for a man and both are far from being mutually exclusive.
She was a spy, the CIA had warned that her identity was not to be known.  There were operations still underway that if her identity were revealed, would put other agents lives at risk.   Cheney had made it known that he intended to use this nigerian document as evidence against Saddam.  The CIA was very suspicious of the authenticity and decided to investigate further. The Joe Wilson did not lie when he said he was sent by Cheneys office, rather, he was deployed because of the inquiries into the document by Cheneys office.   Plame did not SEND her husband, other agents do not send other agents into the field.  She RECOMMENDED Wilson because he was an ambassador in Nigeria for many years and still had knowledge and contacts in the area.  Once the document was fully exposed as fake, the administration lost their golden token in the case to go into a war they desperately wanted.   Tell me this,  if the Nigerian document was a fake and exposed as such, WHY would Cheney be so upset?  For all the spin and propaganda, the fact is the document was a fake.  Why does it matter how it was found out?  Why smear Joe Wilson for doing his job?  Shouldn't they be shaking Joe's hand for finding out that the intelligence they were about to use to send people to a war was utterly and thorougly false?   
No way I 100% ABSOLUTELY disagree, I can't speak for the rest of the democrats but I know that the situation over there is seriously messed up and has lot more potential of getting more messed up than Vietnam did.  This is very serious business and I want to impeach him more than any other Democrat, but I also know that the region right now is so volatile that any major movement is gonna spark a definitely nice size persian-arab war.   This has NOTHING to do with blowjobs.
... come to think of it, how do you know the vibrator doesn't actually belong to Dad? ;-&gt;
Indeed.  A few years ago when I looked at Haskell, someone suggested Clean -- and I disgarded it as quickly as I saw the license.
I have lived all my life in a country that is much worse off than the USA (Uruguay). And, if I had the chance to leave (it's beyond my economic capacity at the moment), I'd do it without thinking about it. And I would go straight to some European country or Canada, or even Australia. I spent a month in the USA (Miami) and I really didn't like it. The only thing I would pay to see again? Barnes&amp;Noble. We don't have bookstores that big around here.
http://reddit.com/info/121mf/comments/c123pj RTFC!
Mercury also has this, at least apparently -- and it also threads them through code like a monad.
"This seems to jive with earlier rumblings of new colored Wiimotes" Colour me pedantic, but 'jive' ????
Your setting up a straw man so you can knock it down, the example you provide is murder plain and simple, whatever the motive (religious or otherwise), and I imagine that this is covered by the Canadian constitution, as it is by the Irish &amp; American constitutions (right to life?). That is not what happened, the government(state government) violated a constitutional right.  A similar case here in Ireland a few months ago where a Jehova's witness giving birth was given a transfusion against their will on the order of the government(a Judge I believe). The argument was that the childs right to a mother was greater than the mothers freedom of religion.   That decision was also unconstitutional, a constitutional freedom which should be protected and defended.    edit:typo
Good point
Well, it's certainly not like Euler's identity, which is really just a special case of Euler's formula e^ix=cosx+isinx. The proof of that is straightforward using the taylor expansions of e cos and sin. More interesting is if you use different values of x, you still get nice looking expressions  eg  e^i(pi/2) - i =0  or e^2ipi -1 = 0 and so on Euler's identity is just the value that gives you the most satisfying looking expression. As a quick aside, the locus of points eix in the complex plane is a circle where x is the angle between the real axis and the radius, if you let x=pi, ie 180 deg, then you find yourself at -1, no big suprise. I'm afraid that Euler's Identity gets less exciting when you know a small amount of Complex Analysis
&gt; If somebody lies to you and you act on that lie it's not your fault. Just curious...how do you know for sure that the Intelligence Services didn't lie to Bush in the first place?  By your reasoning, wouldn't that mean that this war wasn't his fault if they had?
Sorry, not sure I get you...  at the bottom of the report it talks about:  &gt; Under the 1994 North American Free Trade Agreement, Mexico used to get cheap corn imports from the US, but Mexico's Economy Minister Eduardo Sojo has said that with more US corn being diverted into ethanol production, supply is dwindling. so (unless it was added) they seem to be aware of this. Seems to me, that although Mexican farmers may be happy with the price rises, the bulk of the people are not.   
&gt; (It's interesting that the Pragmatic Programmers put forth the idea of language-of-the-year in 2002, dubbed Haskell the language of the year, and haven't updated it in 5 years. ;-) That's *sad*, not ":-)"-interesting.  LOTY failed completely after one year, because -- rather than kick its happy little community to the curb, choose a new language for a new year per its explicit designs, and then begin repeating what it had learned with evangelization and wikimentation -- it just disintegrated into democracy.  Everything everyone said about LOTY, all of their values and rationals and goals, disappeared when it turned out that a significant part of the community only had one leap-into-the-new in them, and thereafter mainly wanted to conservatively build on and try to get paid for what they knew.
&gt; It is not a western symbol, and cannot and must not be interpreted through a western social lens. I understood her 'demand' in the intellectual sense.  Like a math teacher might demand that you don't divide by zero or a history teacher might demand that you read the primary sources. They don't necessarily mean you have a moral obligation to do that (although they might say that also), but that it is required to have a hope of understanding. It makes sense - really, how can you have a chance of understanding what the hijab means if you only look through a western lens?
I have to admit I am very impressed at how simple Advanced Installer is to use
The state is arguing that it is the ultimate guardian of all of our children. Parents are only allowed to raise them if they stick to an approved range of options. Do I feel the state did the right thing? Yes. However, I can't escape the feeling that I would never impose my will on a random group of parents undergoing a difficult medical and religious decision.  But I guess the state is friend to all of us. So it's OK for a pall to intervene.
Good one, you are correct :)
alrite guys im alice 15- 16 in august  i go 2 gordons skl but i am goin 2 guilford college to do a course for hair dressin   dno wot else to write but if u wnt add me on msn  alipal123@hotmail.com
I laugh. Can you also argue you're banned from intravenously injecting yourself with shrimp?
Thats hilarious. Those crazy priests/ministers will do anything for people to come to church.
Ah I knew that, forget.  Thanks for correcting.  I'm just get wigged out that the general notion that accused == guilty is so prevalent. 
I think his point logically makes sense. If you accept the premise that ingesting blood is bad and God doesn't want you to do it, it would be a case of severe hairsplitting to suggest that injecting it into your veins is OK.
Everyone should see this!
In the United States, JWs seek hospitals and doctors that are sympathetic to treatment without the use of blood. There's a hospital in New Jersey that will even do open heart surgery completely blood-free. In areas far from sympathetic doctors, you may be correct that this will carry some incentive to DIY.  Of course, the JWs with common sense should seek the doctors who aren't sympathetic to their cause and get the best treatment available. That way, when they get blood transfusions they can claim it was done against their will and therefore not their fault. The father in this case should be happy about the outcome, it's the best of all possible worlds. Living children and no personal responsibility for the act.
sad people downvoted you to oblivion. We don't know they where unauthorized, ad campaign could have asked permission/paid for them to be displayed.  Kind of sounds like they didn't which is sad cause that will cause them to loose any legal fights. From article it sounds like most the places where public property (like bridges) and not private. Being scared of batteries and wires is retarded.  Bombs don't necessarly have batteries and wires sticking out.  And most important there is alot more harmless shit with batteries and wires than there every will be bombs. The equivalent would be being scared of all dogs and rounding them up for euthenasia/arresting their owners cause a few dogs bit or killed someone somewhere.
They have strange toliets and fart in the bathroom. With this insight I feel like I do understand their culture better.  Thanks!
I think its not nice at all to the people who have lost there lives in the fight against terror. Those crazy priest/ministers as you say, have got it wrong.
the best IKEA one is when the lady is getting banged from behind while she talks to the camera...
The Nazi party was composed of socialists and nationalists, just like the name says. In 1934 the Nazi party [purged socialists](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Night_of_the_Long_Knives) in the bloodiest way through the use of the SturmAbteilung (storm division), a paramilitary wing of the Nazi party. Hitler was not a socialist, he simply used them to gain power. If Chavez is as effective as Hitler himself in building its economy, this would be another brilliant opportunity for American investment and capitalization.  The only thing left to do is to dissolved labor unions.
I love the rich cut and thrust of these discussions. A: I can't use OSS products in my workplace for [these specific reasons]. B: Yes. This is because MS sucks. You should be an OSS only shop. A: Sure, but these problems exist now, and my employer won't stop using Exchange suddenly next week. B: These problems are MS' fault. Where do you get off complaining about OSS? A: I'm not complaining about OSS, I'm describing the problems that exist. Help? B: You people *so* suck Gates cock.
Nicely chosen quote
good article on buying cars, advice and tips 
The example above is murder, but what the JWs did was negligent homicide.
keen to learn more about and hear more of Naked rhythm
But the great thing of LoA wasn't that it had most information, but that it was a place knowledge was stored and people who cared about could go there and share that knowledge with others of a like mind.  It was sum &gt; than parts. LoC has lots of shit, more getting online even.  But Wikipedia is the "commons" for everyone to come and learn and share more than LoC ever will be. But I agree wikipedia ain't all that, but it was on topic.  I actually think it's the internet that is the massive store and "commons" that is revolutionizing human advancement.  If it weren't for copyright, things like Lexis, and scientific journals wanting to restrict distribution we would be experiencing and even greater accelleration of human endeavour.
She seems to be pointing out the potential social basis and benefits of religion.  I sort of agree-- Religion seems to be part of the social fabric in nearly every human culture. I really would have absolutely no problem with it if you weren't required to believe utterly ridiculous and inane things about the age of the Earth, evolution, cosmology, medicine, etc. or subscribe to authoritarian militaristic political views in order to participate. I don't really have any problem with Buddhism for example, or any number of other (relatively) peaceful and philosophical religious views.  I also usually don't have any problem with Judaism, since most Jews are not crazy.  Judaism is probably on average the most rational western religions.  But Christianity and Islam are death cults. 
Disagree.  In this case, the blog post provided useful context.  This is not always the case, but here was an exception. I agree that it's a good post, though.  Are the denizens of comp.lang.scheme always that much more polite than the [morons like "Cobol" Bourguignon](http://groups.google.com/group/comp.lang.lisp/browse_frm/thread/88a36fb2c239a44e/89405e202723a377?lnk=raot#89405e202723a377) on comp.lang.lisp?
The codespace tax is there no matter what (and often hard to notice in a profile, if in general less code just fits in the cache(s)). Readability potentially suffers too -- I find needing to examine four cases, and wondering *why* they didn't do it more simply ("There must be something I'm missing") add up to more time than *most* of the simpler versions. I'm for multiple simple lines vs. one complex line. But that's not the decision here.
i totally agree. hoax  –noun  1.something intended to deceive or defraud. there was no intentional deception.  anyone who knows about ATHF would know what these are.  just because these morons didn't understand wtf these things were doesn't put make these guys criminals. so by this logic, if i leave a brown sack lying on the sidewalk, someone could think it was suspicious (omg, what could be in that bag??? a bomb???), requiring the bomb squad to blow it up (we can't take any chances now, can we?) and i can be arrested for a half eaten baloney sandwich. I also agree with Flemlord.  this administration has us all looking over our shoulder.  everything and everyone is suspicious (esp. anyone who LOOKS like they come from the middle east). and wtf is up with these scare mongers always using the phrase 'post 9/11 world'?  STOP IT!  we get it already.  the US was attacked.  stop reminding us that we need to be scared all the time.  not everything is an damned terrorist plot. 
i was hoping he would pan the camera towards the back revealing the W8's Flux capacitor. Unfortuanately without having this compnent the W8 is somewhat lacklustre. EDIT: damn, read to the bottom of the comments and the flux capacitor had already been mentioned and heavily upmodded. I missed the boat. EDITED AGAIN: spelling
&gt; The father in this case should be happy about the outcome, it's the best of all possible worlds. Living children and no personal responsibility for the act. He should be happy that he didn't end up locked up in a padded cell where he belongs.
I know now cause I read the article. I had thought fire in theatre was "inducing riot". "Panic" is just so vague, I mean wearning black eye-makeup, a trenchcoat and my megadeath t-shirt to the mall back in the day probably induced alot of panic. It's like one of the laws they have on the books so they can arrest protester and marchers who happen to be dressed as clowns or have puppets.
Was.
